http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/topstories/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/nm/20070531/ts_nm/lebanon_tribunal_dc Syria may trouble Lebanon after U.N. vote: Hariri may trouble Lebanon after U.N. vote: Hariri could spark trouble in Lebanon in response to a vote to set up a tribunal to try the killers of Rafik al-Hariri, the former prime minister&#39;s son said on Thursday. Pro-Syrian politicians and parties, including President Emile Lahoud and Hezbollah, said the had ridden roughshod over Lebanon&#39;s constitution and could provoke further divisions in a country still haunted by its 1975-90 civil war. The Security Council voted on Wednesday to set up the court after failed efforts to get its statutes constitutionally approved in Lebanon, where a political crisis has paralyzed normal government for months. Syria said after the vote that it could lead to more instability in Lebanon. Saad al-Hariri, the son and political heir of the slain premier, told Reuters the tribunal would end the impunity that political assassins have enjoyed in Lebanon for four decades. "How could the tribunal affect the security of Lebanon? How could punishing the people who killed Rafik al-Hariri... affect the security of Lebanon?" Hariri said in an interview. "If Lebanon is going to be unstable it is the doing of those who say that Lebanon is going to be unstable," he said. "They (the Syrians) won&#39;t be able to destabilize us because they tried before and they have failed." Hariri and his allies in the governing coalition accuse Syria of orchestrating the February 14, 2005 bombing which killed Hariri and 22 others in Beirut. They also say Damascus was behind a string of other attacks on anti-Syrian figures. Syria rejects the accusations. President Bashar al-Assad has vowed not to hand over any Syrian citizens to the U.N.-backed tribunal, saying any Syrian suspects will be tried at home. Lebanon&#39;s President Lahoud said the Security Council&#39;s move could prove divisive. "We hope the tribunal of international character will not be, in the way in which its statutes have been approved, a reason for more distance between the Lebanese," he said. Efforts to set up the tribunal have been at the heart of a deep rift between pro-Syrian politicians and others who see the court as a means to curb Syrian influence in Lebanon. Parliament Speaker Nabih Berri, another ally of Syria, has refused to convene the assembly to vote on the court statutes because he contests the legitimacy of the government, which is controlled by anti-Syrian leaders and backed by Western states. Berri said the U.N. vote had ignored Lebanon&#39;s constitution and the need for Lebanese consensus. "You have picked internationalization instead of the state," Berri said. A Hezbollah statement said the council vote had "opened the door to international interference and hegemony" in Lebanon and that the resolution had breached national and international law. Hariri said opposition leaders, including Berri and Hezbollah&#39;s Sayyed Hassan Nasrallah, were being threatened by Syria and coerced into opposing the tribunal. "What we would like to see the opposition do is to stop being afraid," he said. "What kills me is that a party like Hezbollah is not afraid of but they are afraid of Syria." Syria&#39;s allies in Lebanon have argued that the United States will use the tribunal as a political tool against Damascus. Together, Berri&#39;s Amal movement and Hezbollah represent most of Lebanon&#39;s Shi&#39;ite Muslims, giving the standoff a sectarian dimension and fuelling tension between Sunnis and Shi&#39;ites. Hezbollah and its allies have always said they support the tribunal in principle but wanted to discuss its mandate. Hariri was killed by a suicide truck bomb attack as his motorcade drove along Beirut&#39;s seafront corniche. The road was opened on Thursday for the first time since the attack. (Additional reporting by Tom Perry) Hezbollah, Syria denounce U.N. tribunal AP, 40 minutes ago Syria may trouble Lebanon after U.N. vote: Hariri Reuters, 48 minutes ago 'We have no rights and no future' at The Guardian (UK)., May 30 The cauldron may bubble over again at The Economist, May 29 Syria condemns Lebanon tribunal Council Backs Tribunal For Lebanon at The Washington Post The question: Why is Lebanon so unstable? at The Guardian (UK)., May 24 at The Guardian (UK)., May 24 patient ID'd as Atlanta attorney, 31 U.S. has triggered new arms race Most Viewed: Top Stories All aboard for the Harry Potter rollercoaster U.S. "imperialism" means new arms race: Putin says fourth Iranian American detained in Iran May toll for U.S. soldiers in Iraq climbs to 122 Punta Gorda: 3 Years Later AM ET hours, 19 minutes ago New Study Links Cancer To Ground Zero Toxins CBS 2 New York AM ET Panda dies after release from captivity AP AM ET Cars drive along on the road in Beirut May 31, 2007, where former Lebanese Prime... Syria and Lebanon Relations Syria Critical of U.N. Tribunal The United Nations will investigate the assassination of Lebanon&#39;s former PM. &raquo; More ABC News video UN backs Hariri murder court The UN has voted in favour of setting up a court to try suspected killers of Lebanese ex-PM Rafik Hariri. &raquo; More BBC video &raquo; Show all news video An answer for my critics Hershey Vs. Pot Dealer in Trademark Suit Ala. students graduate in wake of vicious storm video puts a blogger behind bars. Kevin Sites in the Hot Zone An Afghan child bride gets help from Hot Zone readers. Limited. or redistribution of Reuters content is expressly prohibited of Reuters. Reuters shall not be liable for any errors or delays in the content, or for any actions taken in
http://news.yahoo.com/s/nm/20070531/ts_nm/britain_russia_litvinenko_dc Litvinenko suspect says British spies real killers suspect says British spies real killers AM ET MOSCOW (Reuters) - The man charged by Britain with murdering former Russian agent Alexander Litvinenko denied involvement on Thursday, saying British intelligence and a self-exiled Russian multi-millionaire were far more likely suspects. In comments likely to deepen a Russian-British feud reminiscent of Cold War spy scandals, Britain&#39;s chief suspect Andrei Lugovoy rejected Litvinenko&#39;s deathbed charge the Kremlin had ordered his poisoning with highly radioactive Polonium 210. At a packed news conference in Moscow, Lugovoy said he suspected British intelligence, the mafia and Boris Berezovsky, a multi-millionaire Kremlin critic who fled Russia for London, could have been involved in Litvinenko&#39;s murder. "The main role was played by British secret services and their agent Berezovsky," a confident and combative Lugovoy, himself a former KGB agent, told a news conference aired live on state television. "The poisoning of Litvinenko could not have been but under the control of British secret services," he said. Asked whether he had firm proof of British intelligence involvement in the murder, Lugovoy replied: "Yes." But Britain hit back by saying its request for Lugovoy&#39;s extradition from Russia -- which Moscow said it could not meet -- had nothing to do with British intelligence. "This is a criminal matter and is not an issue about intelligence," a Foreign Office spokesman said. "A British citizen was killed in London and UK citizens and visitors were put at risk." Looking tanned and dressed in a dapper pink shirt, Lugovoy said the Kremlin&#39;s enemies and the Western press were portraying him as a "Russian James Bond" in a campaign to tarnish Russia&#39;s image. Private security guards were protecting Lugovoy at the news conference and sniffer dogs checked the room for weapons or explosives before he entered. Lugovoy portrayed a shadowy world of secret codes, hard drinking and meetings with British spies plotting to compromise Putin. "There was an open attempt to recruit me as an agent of British secret services," he said. "The British basically asked me to start collecting any compromising material on President and members of his family." Berezovsky, who has said openly he wants to fund a revolution to change the government in Russia, denied he worked for British intelligence and said the Kremlin was using Lugovoy as its mouthpiece. Lugovoy spoke in a media centre where government officials often give news conferences and Russian television, which toes the Kremlin line, gave him extensive coverage. "Everything about Mr Lugovoy&#39;s words and presentation made it obvious that he is acting on Kremlin instruction," Berezovsky said in a statement. Speaking by telephone to Ekho Moskvy radio station, Berezovsky said: "This (Lugovoy&#39;s) statement makes everything clear, it has become obvious that the whole campaign the Kremlin is staging around Litvinenko&#39;s murder is a campaign of state lies." In a statement read out by friends after he died in a London hospital, Litvinenko, a former Russian Federal Security Service (FSB) officer who obtained British citizenship, said Putin was behind his poisoning. The Kremlin has described the allegation as nonsense. "A real war has been stirred up against me and Russia in the western press," said Lugovoy, who once guarded the Kremlin elite and now runs a private security firm in Moscow. He said that Litvinenko had been recruited by British intelligence and may have annoyed his handlers. "Litvinenko was an agent who had gone out of control and they got rid of him." Lugovoy also alleged Litvinenko had obtained compromising material which could jeopardize the political refugee status of Berezovsky. He said this could have provided a motive for his murder. "In this regard I can suppose that he did not abandon these attempts to blackmail Berezovsky and it is quite possible this led to tragic consequences," Lugovoy said. (Additional reporting by Luke Baker in London Full Coverage: Russian Spy Death Russian suspect says British secret service killed Litvinenko AFP, 18 minutes ago Suspect: U.K. involved in ex-spy's death AP, 1 hour, 29 minutes ago Excerpts: Lugovoi news conference The Economist, May 29 UK 'behind Litvinenko poisoning' Suspect Claims British Involved in Poisoning at The Washington Post It was murder, but calling it such will change nothing at Daily Telegraph (UK), May 24 Lugovoy charge will cause huge fallout at The London Times, May 22 patient ID'd as Atlanta attorney, 31 U.S. has triggered new arms race Most Viewed: Top Stories All aboard for the Harry Potter rollercoaster U.S. "imperialism" means new arms race: Putin says fourth Iranian American detained in Iran May toll for U.S. soldiers in Iraq climbs to 122 Punta Gorda: 3 Years Later AM ET hours, 19 minutes ago New Study Links Cancer To Ground Zero Toxins CBS 2 New York AM ET Panda dies after release from captivity AP AM ET Andrei Lugovoy gestures during a news conference in Moscow May 31, 2007. (Denis Sinyakov/Reuters) Former Russian spy poisoned Lugovoi: British involved in spy&#39;s death The Russian businessman whom Britain has named as a suspect in the killing of ex-KGB agent Alexander Litvinenko claims he has evidence of British special services&#39; involvement in the poisoning death. (May 31) &raquo; More AP video Litvinenko suspect turns the tables &raquo; More Reuters video &raquo; Show all news video An answer for my critics Hershey Vs. Pot Dealer in Trademark Suit Ala. students graduate in wake of vicious storm video puts a blogger behind bars. Kevin Sites in the Hot Zone An Afghan child bride gets help from Hot Zone readers. Limited. or redistribution of Reuters content is expressly prohibited of Reuters. Reuters shall not be liable for any errors or delays in the content, or for any actions taken in
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/topstories/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_re_us/tuberculosis_infection TB patient ID'd as Atlanta attorney, 31 patient ID'd as Atlanta attorney, 31 By COLLEEN SLEVIN, Associated Press Writer ATLANTA - The tuberculosis patient under the first federal quarantine since 1963 is a 31-year-old personal injury attorney who practices law with his father in Atlanta, a federal law enforcement official said Thursday. The official, who asked to remain anonymous because he was not authorized to talk about the case, identified the patient as Andrew Speaker. A medical official in Atlanta also confirmed the patient's name on condition of anonymity. The patient, who has a rare and dangerous form of tuberculosis, arrived at Denver's National Jewish Medical and Research Center for treatment Thursday, walking under his own power after flying from Atlanta with his wife and federal marshals. He looked healthy and tan, and "he said he still felt fine," hospital spokesman William Allstetter said. Doctors plan to begin treating the man immediately with two antibiotics, one oral and one intravenous. He also will undergo a basic physical exam, a test to evaluate how infectious he is and a CT scan and lung X-ray, Allstetter said. Doctors hope to also determine where he contracted the disease. He will be kept in a special unit with two rooms and a ventilation system, Allstetter said. "He may not leave that room much for several weeks," Allstetter said. The man knew he had TB when he flew from Atlanta to Europe in mid-May for his wedding and honeymoon, but he didn't find out until he was already there that it was an extensively drug-resistant strain considered especially dangerous. Despite warnings from federal health officials not to board another long flight, the man flew home for treatment. Health officials in North America and Europe are trying to track down about 80 passengers who sat near him on the two trans-Atlantic flights, and they want passenger lists from four shorter flights the man took while in Europe. Patients on the shorter flights are not expected to be as much at risk, health officials said. Among those being tested are more than two dozen University of South Carolina Aiken students, school spokeswoman Jennifer Lake said Thursday. Two were apparently sitting near the man, possibly in the same row, she said. One of those students, Laney Wiggins, said she is awaiting her skin test results, expected Friday. "I'm very nervous," Wiggins told The (Columbia) State newspaper. "It's kind of sad that this is overshadowing the wonderful time we had in Europe." The man flew to Paris on May 12 aboard Air France Flight 385, also listed as Delta Air Lines codeshare Flight 8517, according to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention. He and his bride also took four shorter flights while in Europe &#151; Paris to Athens on May 14; Athens to Thira Island May 16; Mykonos Island to Athens May 21; and Athens to Rome May 21 &#151; but officials said there was less risk of infection during the shorter hops compared to the trans-Atlantic flights, which each lasted eight hours or more. It was while the man was in Rome that he learned further U.S. tests had determined his TB was the rare, extensively drug-resistant form, far more dangerous than he knew. They told him turn himself over to Italian health officials and not to fly on any commercial airlines. Instead, on May 24, the man flew from Rome to Prague on Czech Air Flight 0727, then flew to Montreal aboard Czech Air Flight 0104 and drove into the U.S., according to CDC officials. Officials are trying to contact people who sat within five rows of him on the two longest flights for testing. Other passengers are not considered at high risk of infection because tests indicated the amount of TB bacteria in the man was low, said Dr. Martin Cetron, director of the CDC's division of global migration and quarantine. The infected man told The Atlanta Journal-Constitution that doctors initially did not order him not to fly and only suggested he put off his long-planned wedding. "We headed off to Greece thinking everything's fine," he told the newspaper. Dr. Charles Daley, head of the infectious disease division at National Jewish Hospital, said the hospital has treated two other patients with what appears to be the same strain of tuberculosis since 2000, although that strain had not been identified and named at the time. He said the patients had improved enough to be released. "With drug-resistant tuberculosis, it's quite a challenge to treat this," Daley told CNN Thursday. "The cure rate that's been reported in other places is very low. It's about 30 percent for XDR-TB." "This is a different patient, though. We're told that this is very early in the course, and most of the time when we get patients that it's very extensive and very far advanced. So I think we're more optimistic," he said. "We're aiming for cure. We know it's an uphill battle, but we hope to get there." Associated Press writers Lara Jakes Jordan in Washington, and Mike Stobbe, Greg Bluestein and Daniel Yee in Atlanta contributed to this report. Public Health Agency of Canada: Full Coverage: Tuberculosis Scare TB on a plane? Sign of the times AP TB patient in Denver for treatment AP US probes how TB traveler crossed border AP Man knew he had TB before flying to Europe at CNN.com, May 30 Tuberculosis - Getting the Facts at FOX News, May 31 Upset air travelers criticize CDC on TB alert at Atlanta Journal-Constitution, May 30 Alabama gov. signs slavery apology Atlantic hurricanes forecast for 2007 Dedication set for Billy Graham library TB on a plane? Sign of the times TB on a plane? Sign of the times 9 Atlantic hurricanes forecast for 2007 son arrested on sex charge Alabama gov. signs slavery apology TB patient moved to Denver hospital AP - 20 minutes ago Children hanged: Language barrier slows 911 call AP - 42 minutes ago King of Spam Blocked minutes ago Bush asks for global emission goals by 2008 AP minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? Calculate new payment. Refinance and Save $1,000S $150,000 Mortgage for $483/month. Compare up to 4 free quotes. Refinance with Bad Credit Compare up to 4 free quotes. Serious refinance requests only. An airplane of Air France takes-off an overseas international airport, 24 May 2007. US health... Czech officials seek passengers exposed to TB Heath officials in the Czech Republic are joining in the search for passengers who may have sat near a man infected with a drug-resistant strain of tuberculosis. (May 31) &raquo; More AP video TB and border security A man with tuberculosis eluded authorities despite orders to stop him. CNN&#39;s Jeanne Meserve reports (May 30) &raquo; More CNN video &raquo; Show all news video TB patient moved to Denver hospital The Note: Testing Fred Thompson Ala. students graduate in wake of vicious storm PEOPLE OF THE WEB A convicted felon turns cameras on the cops. Yahoo! News "60 Minutes" He's a human calculator who sees numbers as shapes and colors.
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_sp_te_ga_su/ten_french_open Lleyton Hewitt advances at French Open Hewitt advances at French Open By CHRIS LEHOURITES, AP Sports Writer 1 hour, 28 minutes ago PARIS - Lleyton Hewitt rallied from two sets down for the fourth time in his career Thursday and beat 2004 champion Gaston Gaudio 4-6, 3-6, 6-2, 6-4, 6-2 in the second round of the Hewitt, a two-time Grand Slam champion, missed two months because of a back injury and returned at the Rome Masters in early May. He broke his Argentine opponent in the third and seventh games of the third set, and then again to open each of the two remaining sets. "He's got to be one of the toughest second-round players to play," said Hewitt, who lost to Gaudio in the 2004 French Open quarterfinals. "The first two sets he played fantastic." The 14th-seeded Australian made 25 unforced errors sets, but limited that to 19 in the final three. He also had 20 aces, while Gaudio double-faulted 13 times. "I felt like I had a lot of opportunities to go up a break Hewitt said. Hewitt stayed on course for a fourth-round rematch with two-time defending champion Rafael Nadal at Roland Garros. He lost to Nadal at the same stage last year. Hewitt has won the and reached the final at the . He has made the quarterfinals twice at the French Open, the last time losing to eventual champion Gaudio in 2004. Gaudio, who had reached the third round in Paris for five straight years, has only once won consecutive matches this year. Maria Sharapova, who missed nearly two months of the season because of an injured right shoulder, advanced to the third round in the women's draw, easily beating Jill Craybas of the United States 6-2, 6-1. "I feel it at times in the match," Sharapova said. "I try not to think about it." Up 2-1 at the start, Craybas held three break points at love-40. But Sharapova won the next 11 points, holding serve with the help of three forehand winners in a row, then breaking Craybas at love when the American dumped a volley into the net with the entire court open. In the second set, Craybas broke the second-ranked Russian in the sixth game, smiling and raising her hands after the winning point to accept the crowd's applause. But Sharapova broke right back to advance. Australian Open champion Serena Williams raced through the first set but was stretched in the second against Milagros Sequera, finally winning 6-0, 7-6 (3). No. 7 Ana Ivanovic defeated Sania Mirza 6-1, 6-4. No. 14 Patty Schnyder, No. 17 Katarina Srebotnik and No. 25 Lucie Safarova also advanced. On the men's side, No. 6 Novak Djokovic also reached the third round, beating Laurent Recouderc of France 6-3, 3-6, 6-3, 6-1. No. 16 Marcos Baghdatis, the 2006 Australian Open finalist, No. 7 Ivan Ljubicic and No. 20 Jarkko Nieminen also won. "Everybody now expects me to be the guy who can hurt the best two players in the world," said Djokovic, who has won three titles this year &#151; including one on clay. Later Thursday, Nadal was to face Flavio Cipolla in the second round. Amelie Mauresmo also was scheduled to play. On Wednesday, top-ranked Roger Federer advanced to the third round, stopping Thierry Ascione of France 6-1, 6-2, 7-6 (8). The 10-time Grand Slam champion breezed through the first two sets, but as conditions worsened and the sun began to fade, so did his control of the match. "I know that they want to get their match over and done with," Federer said. Organizers have been trying to squeeze in extra matches because of the rain delays on the first two days of the tournament. "What I don't like is if they think ... I'm the favorite, I should win this in straight sets," said Federer, who finally walked off court at 9:15 p.m. "What about if it doesn't turn out this way?" Michelle Wie withdraws from Ginn Tribute Spurs top Jazz to make NBA finals Ducks win to get halfway to Stanley Cup Kobe demands, retracts trade request NFL veterans seek help for dementia Rodriguez courts controversy in win Kobe demands, retracts trade request Spurs top Jazz to make NBA finals NFL veterans seek help for dementia 'Stray-Rod?' Tabloid pounces on A-Rod Dover 200 at Dover Int'l Busch Series on ESPN. Saturday, June 2nd, 2: 30PM EST on ESPN2. Reebok Run Easy, Learn What It's About Map your favorite runs, meet runners. Share playlist, photos and more. Special savings on Hertz rentals. Reserve online for our best rates. Australia's Lleyton Hewitt backhands to Argentina's Gaston Gaudio during their second round match of the... Star Lends Hand to Virginia Tech Veteran Detroit is suddenly in search of poise Sports news stories and photos &raquo; All Most Popular SOCCER ON Y! SPORTS Get the latest news, photos and schedules. Sports MLB ON Y! SPORTS Get the latest on winter meetings, trades and news. Sports Get the latest news, analysis and more. Sports
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_bi_go_ec_fi/economy JEANNINE AVERSA, AP Economics Writer 1 hour, 39 minutes ago WASHINGTON - The economy with growth slowing to a pace of just 0.6 percent. That was the worst three-month showing in over four years. The new reading on the gross domestic product, released by the Thursday, showed that economic growth in the January-through-March quarter was much weaker. Government statisticians slashed by more than half their first estimate of a 1.3 percent growth rate for the quarter. The main culprits for the downgrade: the bloated trade deficit and businesses cutting investment in supplies of the goods they hold in inventories. "We are still keeping our head above water &#151; barely," said economist Ken Mayland of ClearView Economics. For nearly a year, the economy has been enduring a stretch of subpar economic growth due mostly to a sharp housing slump. That in turn has made some businesses act more cautiously in their spending and investing. The economy's 0.6 percent growth rate in the opening quarter of this year marked a big loss of momentum from the 2.5 percent pace logged in the final quarter of last year. Chairman Ben Bernanke doesn't believe the economy will slide into recession this year, nor do Bush administration officials. But ex-Fed chief has put the odds at one in three. On Wall Street, investors took the weak showing in stride. The Dow Jones industrials were up 22 points and the Nasdaq gained 14 points in morning trading. The first-quarter's performance was the weakest since the final quarter of 2002, when the economy was recovering from a recession. At that time, GDP eked out a 0.2 percent growth rate. Economists were predicting the first-quarter performance this year would be downgraded, but not as much as it did. They were calling for a 0.8 percent pace. GDP measures the value of all goods and services produced in the United States. It is considered the best measure of the country's economic fitness. In other economic news, the Labor Department reported that fewer people signed up for unemployment benefits last week. New filings dropped by 4,000 to 310,000. That suggests the employment climate is weathering well the economy's sluggish spell. Another report showed that construction spending edged up by 0.1 percent in April, down from a 0.6 percent gain in the previous month. Spending by private builders on nonresidential projects and spending by the government on big projects each climbed to all time highs in April but that strength was tempered by continued weakness in residential construction. In the GDP report, many economists believe the first quarter will be the low point for this year. They expect growth will improve but still be sluggish. The National Association for Business Economics predicts the economy will expand at a 2.3 percent pace in the April-to-June quarter. In the first quarter, there was a larger trade deficit than first thought. That ended up shaving a full percentage point from the GDP. Businesses cut back on inventory investment as they tried to make sure unsold stocks of goods didn't get out of whack with customer demand. That lopped off nearly a percentage point to first quarter GDP. Those were the biggest factors behind the government slicing its initial GDP estimate released a month ago by as much as it did. The sour housing market also restrained overall economic activity. Investment in home building was cut by 15.4 percent, on an annualized basis, However, that wasn't as deep a cut as the 17 percent annualized drop initially estimated. And, it wasn't as severe as the 19.8 percent annualized drop seen in the final quarter of last year. Even so, there is no doubt that troubled housing market is one of the biggest problems for the economy. Although some businesses tightened the belt consumers did not. That helped to prevent the economy from stalling out altogether. Consumers boosted their spending by a 4.4 percent growth rate the most in a year. Consumer spending accounts for a major chunk of economic activity. Some economists wonder how much interest consumers will have in continued brisk spending, however, given rising gasoline prices that have topped $3 a gallon in many markets. More money spent filling up the gas tank leaves less to spend on other things. One of the reasons consumers have stayed so resilient even as the housing market has been stuck in a rut for a year is because the job market has been good. Employers &#151; still enjoying profits &#151; are keeping a close watch on spending but they are not drastically clamping down on hiring. Companies profits gained a bit of ground One measure showed after tax profits rising by 1 percent, up from 0.8 percent in the fourth quarter. An inflation gauge tied to the GDP report and closely watched by the Fed showed that core prices &#151; excluding food and energy &#151; rose at a rate of 2.2 percent That was unchanged from an initial estimate but up from a 1.8 percent pace in the fourth quarter. The Federal Reserve's key interest rate has been at 5.25 percent for nearly a year. Many economists predict the rate probably will stay right where it is through the rest of this year. Full Coverage: U.S. Economy Stocks up after takeover news, GDP data AP, 15 minutes ago First-quarter growth weak, future looks brighter Reuters, 37 minutes ago Dollar buying ever less of world's goods The Christian Science Monitor Why Wall Street is worried at The Guardian (UK)., Mar 14 Economic Growth Stalls in First Quarter at The Washington Post U.S. Economic Growth Weakest in Over 4 Years at The New York Times The Upside of Recession? at Newsweek via MSNBC, Apr 24 The scientific way to beat the market at The Los Angeles Times (reg. req'd), Mar 22 Wachovia to buy A.G. Edwards for &#36;6.8B Northwest exits bankruptcy protection Stocks up after takeover news, GDP data FDA nixes fast track for cancer vaccine First-quarter growth weak, future looks brighter Wellpoint CFO ousted, violated code of conduct Wachovia to buy A.G. Edwards for $6.8 billion Leaner Northwest Airlines exits bankruptcy First-quarter growth weak, future looks brighter Northwest exits bankruptcy protection Wal-Mart Report Spells Trouble AM ET Dell to sell &#39;in Wal-Mart&#39; BBC AM ET College Loan Rates to Increase AM ET Traders floored by NYSE change CNN - Wed May 30, 10:05 PM ET Make Money in Growth Stocks. We have a Winner for You. Chase® Home Equity Loan Low rates. No closing costs. No app fee. No annual fees. Apply online. Online Currency Trading - Free Demo 24-Hour trading, award-winning software, charts and more from GFT. GM plant is nation&#39;s most productive Silicon Insider: High Tech Labor Day S&P&#39;s run: A record for a new era Optimists take charge, and summer interns rule. &raquo; Read Today's Column Get advice on how to manage the outcome of your income. Finance Get the latest news, features and photos.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/topstories/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_hi_te/ipod_robot Japanese robot dances to iPod music robot dances to iPod music By HIROKO TABUCHI, Associated Press Writer AM ET TOKYO - A new Japanese robot twists and rolls to iPod tunes in an intricate dance based on complex mathematics, a technology developers said will one day enable robots to move about spontaneously instead of following preprogrammed motions. Equipped with Kenwood Corp. speaker systems, Tokyo-based venture ZMP Inc.'s 14-inch long Miuro robot &#151; which looks like a white ball wedged between two halves of an egg &#151; wheels about in time with music from an iPod portable player, which locks into the machine. At a demonstration in Tokyo on Thursday, the 11-pound Miuro pivoted about on a stage in time to beats of a pop music track. Its dance wasn't preprogrammed, but generated by the robot itself. Scientists involved in the robot's development believe the technology could one day lead to robots capable of spontaneous motion. Miuro uses algorithms, or mathematical rules, to analyze music and translate the beats into dances, according to ZMP President Hisashi Taniguchi. "We aim to create a new form of life that moves freely and spontaneously in ways human beings can't predict," Taniguchi said. "We're hoping to turn Miuro into the ultimate virtual pet," he said. Unlike older Miuros, which hit stores last August, the new prototype is fitted with software based on what scientists call chaotic itinerancy, a mathematical pattern similar to the movements of a bee circling from flower to flower as it collects nectar. That allows the new Miuro to act spontaneously and unpredictably &#151; "just like a child playing," said Tokyo University researcher Takashi Ikegami, who developed the software. Other improvements will let users set the Miuro like an alarm clock so it wheels into the bedroom and blasts music at a certain time, for example, according to Taniguchi. Future versions of the Miuro will also use inbuilt sensors to proactively seek out people to play tunes to, he said. ZMP has already shipped 500 units of the original Miuro, which isn't equipped with the intelligent software but instead responds to a remote-control handheld manipulator. The 108,800 yen ($895) original Miuro can also receive wireless signals from a personal computer to play iTunes and other stored digital files. Separately sold options add a camera that beams images to PCs or lets owners control their Miuros by mobile phones. Miuro, short for "music innovation based on utility robot technology," is only on sale in Japan. ZMP did not give a date for the release of the new prototype. Chip sales expected to grow by 2.5 pct. Five cos. win gov't telecom contract Man described as a top spammer arrested Gates, Jobs make rare joint appearance U.S. soldiers face tough VOIP call Man described as a top spammer arrested Five cos. win gov't telecom contract Google takes big step to make Web work offline Palm unveils new laptop-like gadget Gates, Jobs make rare joint appearance Technology & Health Video Captive Panda Found Dead in Wild minutes ago Apple says YouTube coming to Apple TV AP minutes ago Palm unveils new laptop-like gadget AP minutes ago Convertible crash test results CNN AM ET Vonage - Official Site Save $300 a year on your phone bill. A better phone service for less. new suv with dvd entertainment system Learn all about the 2007 Ford Edge and the exciting new technology. Mcgrathpress.com - New Technology Every McGrath employee who touches your job is focused on customer service, ready to do whatever it takes to ensure your complete satisfaction. A prototype for the new model of the 'Miuro' robot is on display in Tokyo... coffee table computer &#39;I Became My Own Big Brother&#39; Swedes open embassy in Second Life See what's new in Windows Vista. The day's most popular tech news. grandson team soothes souls with online hugs.
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_bi_ge/telecom_contract Five cos. win gov't telecom contract cos. win gov't telecom contract By DIBYA SARKAR, AP Business Writer WASHINGTON - Five companies &#151; AT&T, Level 3 Communications Inc., Qwest Communications, Sprint Nextel and Verizon &#151; on Thursday were awarded a federal telecommunications contract worth up to $20 billion over 10 years. The winners of the so-called Networx Enterprise contract must now compete with each other to win business from agencies looking to improve their voice, data and other telecom services. It's the second telecom contract awarded by the General Services Administration in about two months. In late March, Qwest Communications International Inc., AT&T Inc. and Verizon Communications Inc. were winners of the much larger Networx Universal contract, the government's largest telecom contract ever awarded. That deal is potentially worth up to $48 billion over a decade. For Sprint &#151; the only bidder shut out from the Universal contract &#151; getting on the Enterprise contract was critical. The company had been providing telecom services to federal agencies for the last 18 years. GSA officials said Thursday they expect agencies to spend roughly $20 billion over the life of both contracts &#151; or less than one-third of what's allowed. Universal requires companies to not only maintain current agencies' needs, but also offer advanced services, such as Internet-based telephone service, network security and video and Web conferencing, domestically and internationally. Enterprise has far fewer requirements than the much larger Universal contract and covers a smaller geographic area. Technology consultant Warren Suss of Jenkintown, Pa., said the question now becomes which contract the various agencies choose. They must either choose one or the other. If agencies choose Universal, which offers more mandatory services and greater breadth and scope of technologies, then he said it could be an "uphill battle" for Sprint. However, he said Sprint's current customers in the federal government may want to remain with the company to ensure transition from the previous government-wide telecom contract to Networx is smooth and easy rather than go with another carrier. Qwest senior vice president Diana Gowen said getting on Enterprise was vital for the Denver-based company, which was considered a longshot to even win a spot on the first Networx contract. She said being on both contracts puts the company in the best possible position. Like AT&T and Verizon, Qwest expects to get orders from agencies in late August or early September. "I have folks out there today stirring the pot with every single agency," she said. In morning trading, shares of AT&T rose 23 cents to $41.21, while shares of Level 3 Communications Inc. fell 5 cents to $5.86 and shares of Qwest gained 12 cents to $10.38. Sprint Nextel Corp.'s stock price fell a penny to $22.85, while Verizon's dipped 3 cents to $43.79. to buy A.G. Edwards for &#36;6.8B Northwest exits bankruptcy protection Stocks up after takeover news, GDP data FDA nixes fast track for cancer vaccine CFO ousted, violated code of conduct Wachovia to buy A.G. Edwards for $6.8 billion Leaner Northwest Airlines exits bankruptcy First-quarter growth weak, future looks brighter Wal-Mart Report Spells Trouble AM ET Dell to sell &#39;in Wal-Mart&#39; BBC AM ET College Loan Rates to Increase AM ET Traders floored by NYSE change CNN - Wed May 30, 10:05 PM ET Chase® Home Equity Loan Low rates. No closing costs. No app fee. No annual fees. Apply online. Online Currency Trading - Free Demo 24-Hour trading, award-winning software, charts and more from GFT. Internet Phone Service from Viatalk Compare Internet Phone Service Plans, Features, and Cost from ViaTalk. GM plant is nation&#39;s most productive Silicon Insider: High Tech Labor Day S&P&#39;s run: A record for a new era Optimists take charge, and summer interns rule. &raquo; Read Today's Column Get advice on how to manage the outcome of your income. Finance Get the latest news, features and photos.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/topstories/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/nm/20070531/ts_nm/iran_nuclear_dc U.S. spars with Iran before Iran-EU nuclear talks spars with Iran before Iran-EU nuclear talks By Mark Heinrich and Parisa Hafezi MADRID (Reuters) - The United States told on Thursday it must change its nuclear course or be isolated, but Tehran remained defiant as it held talks on its atomic program with the U.S. Secretary of State said it was time for Iran to abandon uranium enrichment work, but EU foreign policy chief Javier Solana acknowledged before he met Iran&#39;s top nuclear negotiator in Madrid it would be hard to clinch a deal. "It is time for Iran to change its tactics. The international community is united on what Iran should do and this is to suspend (enrichment of uranium for nuclear fuel)," Rice said during a visit to Vienna. Solana&#39;s meeting with Iran&#39;s Ali Larijani at a former hunting lodge on Madrid&#39;s outskirts looked like a last stab at easing a standoff over Iran&#39;s atomic activity before world powers sharpen U.N. sanctions. But no one held out hope for any breakthrough one month after the last inconclusive session between the two men, despite two sets of modest U.N. sanctions against Iran. "It is true that as time goes by, if the situation continues, probably the agreement will be more complicated," Solana said before the talks. "I will try to ... see if we can pave the way in order to get into formal negotiations." Major powers insist Iran stop enriching uranium as a confidence-building precondition for negotiations on trade and other benefits. Larijani on Wednesday ruled out a nuclear halt as demanded by the , offering only to assure its program is not a disguised bid for bombs as the West suspects. Iran says it only wants atomic power to generate electricity. Foreign ministers of the Group of Eight leading industrialized nations, meeting in Germany on Wednesday, expressed "deep regret" Iran had kept on expanding enrichment activities and raised the prospect of more painful sanctions. "If Iran continues to ignore demands of the Security Council, we will support further appropriate measures as agreed in Resolution 1747," the ministers said in a statement. Security Council resolution 1747 gave Tehran a 60-day deadline to freeze all enrichment, a process of refining uranium for power plants or, if taken to a very high degree, weapons. Iran ignored the deadline, which expired last week. RICE RENEWS U.S OFFER Rice reiterated a U.S. offer made one year ago that if Iran gave up uranium enrichment work, Washington was ready to reverse decades of American policy and talk to Tehran on any issue. "But that can&#39;t be done while Iran continues to pursue and to try and perfect technologies that are going to lead to a nuclear weapon. As I have said before, the question is not why won&#39;t we talk to Tehran but why won&#39;t Tehran talk to us." An EU diplomat in Madrid said talks were important largely because the alternative was worse, adding: "The point is to keep the negotiating track open ... There are no signs of movement from the other side at this moment." China, one of the five permanent U.N. Security Council members with power of veto, stressed its preference for further diplomacy over punitive action against a major trade partner. "Diplomatic effort to resolve the problem in a peaceful way is the best choice," Chinese Foreign Ministry spokeswoman Jiang Yu told a news conference in Beijing. Solana is empowered by the five permanent Security Council members -- the United States, Russia, China, Britain and France -- plus Germany and the EU to explore the scope for formal talks on a package of economic, technological and political initiatives if Iran shelves nuclear fuel production. (Additional reporting by Sue Pleming and Karin Strohecker in Vienna, Lindsay Beck in Beijing, Jason Webb in Madrid) Fourth Iranian-American detained in Iran AP, 23 minutes ago Calls for Iranian flexibility at nuclear talks with EU AFP, 24 minutes ago Iran, US talk on Iraq: now what? The Christian Science Monitor Tehran officials charge three Americans with spying at The Guardian (UK)., May 30 Iran links Iraq and nuclear issue Psychological warfare between the US and Iran The Christian Science Monitor Next Step on Iran at The Washington Post patient ID'd as Atlanta attorney, 31 U.S. has triggered new arms race Most Viewed: Top Stories All aboard for the Harry Potter rollercoaster U.S. "imperialism" means new arms race: Putin says fourth Iranian American detained in Iran May toll for U.S. soldiers in Iraq climbs to 122 Punta Gorda: 3 Years Later AM ET hours, 20 minutes ago New Study Links Cancer To Ground Zero Toxins CBS 2 New York AM ET Panda dies after release from captivity AP AM ET Iran's top nuclear negotiator Ali Larijani (front row, R) arrives with EU foreign policy chief... - Nuclear Weapons An answer for my critics Hershey Vs. Pot Dealer in Trademark Suit The Christian Science Monitor Tasks for next World Bank chief: heal rifts, tackle poverty video puts a blogger behind bars. Kevin Sites in the Hot Zone An Afghan child bride gets help from Hot Zone readers. Limited. or redistribution of Reuters content is expressly prohibited of Reuters. Reuters shall not be liable for any errors or delays in the content, or for any actions taken in
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/topstories/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/nm/20070531/ts_nm/iraq_dc Iraq bomber kills 20, Sunni militants clash bomber kills 20, Sunni militants clash FALLUJA, Iraq (Reuters) - A suicide bomber killed up to 20 men queuing at a police recruitment centre west of Baghdad on Thursday, police said, and al Qaeda militants battled a rival Sunni Arab faction in the south of the capital. Police and hospital officials said 20 people had been killed and at least 20 more wounded in the Falluja bombing, but the U.S. military said only one policeman had been killed. The deaths of three more U.S. soldiers were announced on the last day of May, already the deadliest month for U.S. forces in more than two years. A total of 3,473 have died since the U.S.-led invasion in 2003, 122 of them in May. committed nearly 30,000 additional troops for a major security crackdown aimed at averting all-out sectarian war, but he is coming under growing domestic pressure to bring the soldiers home. In Baghdad, the Iraqi government said it was working closely with British authorities to secure the release of five Britons kidnapped from a government building on Tuesday in a raid blamed on the Mehdi Army militia of Shi&#39;ite cleric Moqtada al-Sadr. "The government condemns this crime and is doing all it can to ensure the immediate release of the kidnapped Britons," it said in a statement. Lieutenant-General Raymond Odierno, the deputy U.S. commander in , said U.S. troops continued to search for the Britons -- a computer expert and his four bodyguards. "We are doing everything we can. We treat any coalition partner like we do a U.S. soldier that was kidnapped," Odierno told a On Wednesday soldiers hunting for the hostages used armored vehicles to smash their way into homes in Sadr City, a Mehdi Army stronghold. The Falluja suicide bomber, wearing a vest packed with explosives, walked up to a queue of about 150 young recruits as they waited outside a police station and blew himself up, police spokesman Hamid Abid said. Bilal Mohammed, a doctor at Falluja hospital, said 20 had been killed and 20 wounded. Recruitment centers for Iraqi security forces are common targets for such attacks, which are mostly blamed on Sunni Islamist al Qaeda. Falluja, 50 km (35 miles) west of Baghdad, is in restive Anbar province, a stronghold of the Sunni Arab insurgency. Some Sunni Arab tribes in Anbar have been encouraging young men to join the Iraqi security forces as part of a new strategy to combat al Qaeda in the area. Al Qaeda in return has responded by attacking those it accuses of cooperating with authorities. In Ramadi, capital of Anbar, a suicide truck bomber killed five and wounded 15 in an attack on a mobile telephone communications centre. Anbar remains one of the main battlegrounds for U.S. forces, who have also poured thousands of extra soldiers into Baghdad in an attempt to quell violence between majority Shi&#39;ites and minority Sunni Arabs once dominant under Al Qaeda is waging a campaign of bombings against Sunni Arab tribes who have formed an alliance against them in Anbar. The Sunni insurgent group the Islamic Army in Iraq also opposes al Qaeda&#39;s indiscriminate killings. On Thursday militants from the two groups turned the streets of Amiriya in southwestern Baghdad into a battleground, residents said. Frightened residents gave varying death tolls. Many fled on foot and merchants shuttered their shops. (Additional reporting by Ross Colvin, Aseel Kami and Mussab Al-Khairalla in Baghdad) Iraq bomber kills 20, Sunni militants clash Reuters, 22 minutes ago 25 minutes ago Where life is cheap and easy to take at Daily Telegraph (UK), May 30 Life in a remote US Army outpost in Iraq: IEDs, DVDs, and A/C The Christian Science Monitor Many killed in Iraq suicide bomb continues for Iraq Britons Hard Truth About Leaving Iraq RealClearPolitics at The New York Times patient ID'd as Atlanta attorney, 31 U.S. has triggered new arms race Most Viewed: Top Stories All aboard for the Harry Potter rollercoaster U.S. "imperialism" means new arms race: Putin says fourth Iranian American detained in Iran May toll for U.S. soldiers in Iraq climbs to 122 Punta Gorda: 3 Years Later AM ET hours, 20 minutes ago New Study Links Cancer To Ground Zero Toxins CBS 2 New York AM ET Panda dies after release from captivity AP AM ET An Iraqi soldier frisks a motorist at a checkpoint in Baghdad, May 30, 2007. (Namir... Turkish buildup on Iraqi border &raquo; More Reuters video &raquo; Show all news video & Osama bin Laden An answer for my critics Hershey Vs. Pot Dealer in Trademark Suit The Christian Science Monitor Tasks for next World Bank chief: heal rifts, tackle poverty video puts a blogger behind bars. Kevin Sites in the Hot Zone An Afghan child bride gets help from Hot Zone readers. Limited. or redistribution of Reuters content is expressly prohibited of Reuters. Reuters shall not be liable for any errors or delays in the content, or for any actions taken in
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/topstories/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/nm/20070531/ts_nm/weather_hurricanes_colorado_dc Nine Atlantic hurricanes expected in &#39;07 Atlantic hurricanes expected in &#39;07 2 hours, 41 minutes ago MIAMI (Reuters) - The Colorado State University hurricane research team renewed its forecast for an "above average" 2007 Atlantic storm season on Thursday and predicted 17 tropical storms, with nine growing to hurricane strength. Of those, five would grow into major hurricanes of Category 3 or higher with winds over 110 mph (177 kph), the team founded by forecast pioneer William Gray said in its revised forecast. The updated forecast issued on Thursday was unchanged from the team&#39;s April 3 forecast for the six-month storm season that starts on Friday. The researchers said there was a 74 percent chance that at least one major hurricane would hit the U.S. coastline in 2007, with a 50 percent chance that would happen on the U.S. Atlantic Coast and a 49 percent chance on the Gulf of Mexico coast. An average season brings 11 tropical storms, with six reaching hurricane wind speed of 74 mph (119 kph) and two growing into major hurricanes. Other private and government weather researchers have also predicted a more active season than average. But so far none have forecast anything like a repeat of record-breaking 2005, when 28 tropical storms spawned 15 hurricanes, including Katrina which flooded New Orleans and parts of the Gulf coast. patient ID'd as Atlanta attorney, 31 U.S. has triggered new arms race Most Viewed: Top Stories All aboard for the Harry Potter rollercoaster U.S. "imperialism" means new arms race: Putin says fourth Iranian American detained in Iran May toll for U.S. soldiers in Iraq climbs to 122 Punta Gorda: 3 Years Later AM ET hours, 20 minutes ago New Study Links Cancer To Ground Zero Toxins CBS 2 New York AM ET Panda dies after release from captivity AP AM ET File photo shows Key West resident Gregorio Nodal walks in the flooded North Roosevelt coast... and Tropical Storms An answer for my critics Hershey Vs. Pot Dealer in Trademark Suit The Christian Science Monitor Tasks for next World Bank chief: heal rifts, tackle poverty video puts a blogger behind bars. Kevin Sites in the Hot Zone An Afghan child bride gets help from Hot Zone readers. Limited. or redistribution of Reuters content is expressly prohibited of Reuters. Reuters shall not be liable for any errors or delays in the content, or for any actions taken in
http://news.yahoo.com/s/nm/20070531/pl_nm/climate_bush_dc Deborah Zabarenko and Caren Bohan 1 hour, 55 minutes ago a long-term strategy on climate change on Thursday, with plans to gather the countries that emit the most greenhouse gases and set a global emissions goal. Bush would also cut tariff barriers to sharing environmental technology as part of a strategy announced as he prepared to attend a Group of Eight summit in Germany next weekly likely to be dominated by addressing global climate change. The U.S. strategy calls for consensus on long-term goals for reducing the greenhouse gases that spur global warming, but not before the end of 2008, White House spokeswoman Dana Perino said. Bush plans in the fall to convene the first in a series of meetings on ways to limit global emissions by a set amount by about 2050. About 15 countries would be invited, including two nations that like the United States are major polluters, China and India. "The United States takes this issue seriously," Bush said. In negotiations before the summit, Washington rejected setting targets to reduce greenhouse gases, championed by other participants. The plan calls for eliminating tariff barriers within six months, freeing up the distribution of new environmentally friendly technology. The gathering of the biggest greenhouse gas countries -- those that spew a combined 80 percent of the world&#39;s emissions -- should take place in the United States this fall, the official said. The meeting will likely include the G8 developed countries, fast-developing China and India, and Brazil, Australia, South Africa, Mexico, Perino made clear the United States would continue to reject a European push for a proposal aimed at addressing global climate change through Kyoto-style caps on carbon emissions. "We do not endorse global carbon trading," Perino said. Full Coverage: Climate Change Bush calls for global emissions goals AP, 22 minutes ago Bush unveils new climate change plan AFP, 22 minutes ago Global carbon emissions in overdrive The Christian Science Monitor Leo and 'The 11th Hour' at The Los Angeles Times US urges new greenhouse gas goals ice forest melting due to global warming, says Greenpeace at The Guardian (UK)., May 30 Lead or Step Aside, EPA at The Washington Post Climate and the UN: A new bid for control? Bush calls for global emissions goals Edwards wants probe of high gas prices sees South Korea model for Iraq Sen. Clinton defends private jet travel Cease-fire eyed to stop violence in Iraq Sen. Clinton defends private jet travel Rice holds line on Iran nuclear program Bush sees South Korea model for Iraq Thompson moves toward White House bid Bush asks for global emission goals by 2008 AP minutes ago CNN minutes ago Stephanopoulos on Fred Thompson AM ET Raw Politics: Watchdogs barking CNN AM ET Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? Calculate new payment. Refinance and Save $1,000S $150,000 Mortgage for $483/month. Compare up to 4 free quotes. Refinance with Bad Credit Compare up to 4 free quotes. Serious refinance requests only. Traffic passes through a haze of smog in downtown Los Angeles in this November 19,... urges 15 nations to set global emissions goal Brinkley Describes Reagan&#39;s Inner Narrative Bush calls for global emissions goals "What would you include in legislation to address global warming?" Offer your ideas. SEND US YOUR PHOTOS! Following the presidential campaign? Submit pictures of candidates, supporters, and events to You Witness News. Featured IN YAHOO! NEWS Election coverage and analysis from Congressional Quarterly. Quarterly blogger makes waves, and enemies, on Capitol Hill. All news on Chief Justice Roberts, Samuel Alito's nomination, and more. &raquo; All Court Coverage Yahoo! News Search Now Contains Blogs Find the latest posts about what's in the news. Limited. or redistribution of Reuters content is expressly prohibited of Reuters. Reuters shall not be liable for any errors or delays in the content, or for any actions taken in
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/topstories/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_bi_go_ec_fi/economy JEANNINE AVERSA, AP Economics Writer 1 hour, 40 minutes ago WASHINGTON - The economy with growth slowing to a pace of just 0.6 percent. That was the worst three-month showing in over four years. The new reading on the gross domestic product, released by the Thursday, showed that economic growth in the January-through-March quarter was much weaker. Government statisticians slashed by more than half their first estimate of a 1.3 percent growth rate for the quarter. The main culprits for the downgrade: the bloated trade deficit and businesses cutting investment in supplies of the goods they hold in inventories. "We are still keeping our head above water &#151; barely," said economist Ken Mayland of ClearView Economics. For nearly a year, the economy has been enduring a stretch of subpar economic growth due mostly to a sharp housing slump. That in turn has made some businesses act more cautiously in their spending and investing. The economy's 0.6 percent growth rate in the opening quarter of this year marked a big loss of momentum from the 2.5 percent pace logged in the final quarter of last year. Chairman Ben Bernanke doesn't believe the economy will slide into recession this year, nor do Bush administration officials. But ex-Fed chief has put the odds at one in three. On Wall Street, investors took the weak showing in stride. The Dow Jones industrials were up 22 points and the Nasdaq gained 14 points in morning trading. The first-quarter's performance was the weakest since the final quarter of 2002, when the economy was recovering from a recession. At that time, GDP eked out a 0.2 percent growth rate. Economists were predicting the first-quarter performance this year would be downgraded, but not as much as it did. They were calling for a 0.8 percent pace. GDP measures the value of all goods and services produced in the United States. It is considered the best measure of the country's economic fitness. In other economic news, the Labor Department reported that fewer people signed up for unemployment benefits last week. New filings dropped by 4,000 to 310,000. That suggests the employment climate is weathering well the economy's sluggish spell. Another report showed that construction spending edged up by 0.1 percent in April, down from a 0.6 percent gain in the previous month. Spending by private builders on nonresidential projects and spending by the government on big projects each climbed to all time highs in April but that strength was tempered by continued weakness in residential construction. In the GDP report, many economists believe the first quarter will be the low point for this year. They expect growth will improve but still be sluggish. The National Association for Business Economics predicts the economy will expand at a 2.3 percent pace in the April-to-June quarter. In the first quarter, there was a larger trade deficit than first thought. That ended up shaving a full percentage point from the GDP. Businesses cut back on inventory investment as they tried to make sure unsold stocks of goods didn't get out of whack with customer demand. That lopped off nearly a percentage point to first quarter GDP. Those were the biggest factors behind the government slicing its initial GDP estimate released a month ago by as much as it did. The sour housing market also restrained overall economic activity. Investment in home building was cut by 15.4 percent, on an annualized basis, However, that wasn't as deep a cut as the 17 percent annualized drop initially estimated. And, it wasn't as severe as the 19.8 percent annualized drop seen in the final quarter of last year. Even so, there is no doubt that troubled housing market is one of the biggest problems for the economy. Although some businesses tightened the belt consumers did not. That helped to prevent the economy from stalling out altogether. Consumers boosted their spending by a 4.4 percent growth rate the most in a year. Consumer spending accounts for a major chunk of economic activity. Some economists wonder how much interest consumers will have in continued brisk spending, however, given rising gasoline prices that have topped $3 a gallon in many markets. More money spent filling up the gas tank leaves less to spend on other things. One of the reasons consumers have stayed so resilient even as the housing market has been stuck in a rut for a year is because the job market has been good. Employers &#151; still enjoying profits &#151; are keeping a close watch on spending but they are not drastically clamping down on hiring. Companies profits gained a bit of ground One measure showed after tax profits rising by 1 percent, up from 0.8 percent in the fourth quarter. An inflation gauge tied to the GDP report and closely watched by the Fed showed that core prices &#151; excluding food and energy &#151; rose at a rate of 2.2 percent That was unchanged from an initial estimate but up from a 1.8 percent pace in the fourth quarter. The Federal Reserve's key interest rate has been at 5.25 percent for nearly a year. Many economists predict the rate probably will stay right where it is through the rest of this year. Full Coverage: U.S. Economy Stocks up after takeover news, GDP data AP, 15 minutes ago First-quarter growth weak, future looks brighter Reuters, 37 minutes ago Dollar buying ever less of world's goods The Christian Science Monitor Why Wall Street is worried at The Guardian (UK)., Mar 14 Economic Growth Stalls in First Quarter at The Washington Post U.S. Economic Growth Weakest in Over 4 Years at The New York Times The Upside of Recession? at Newsweek via MSNBC, Apr 24 The scientific way to beat the market at The Los Angeles Times (reg. req'd), Mar 22 Wachovia to buy A.G. Edwards for &#36;6.8B Northwest exits bankruptcy protection Stocks up after takeover news, GDP data FDA nixes fast track for cancer vaccine First-quarter growth weak, future looks brighter Wellpoint CFO ousted, violated code of conduct Wachovia to buy A.G. Edwards for $6.8 billion Leaner Northwest Airlines exits bankruptcy First-quarter growth weak, future looks brighter Northwest exits bankruptcy protection Wal-Mart Report Spells Trouble AM ET Dell to sell &#39;in Wal-Mart&#39; BBC AM ET College Loan Rates to Increase AM ET Traders floored by NYSE change CNN - Wed May 30, 10:05 PM ET Make Money in Growth Stocks. We have a Winner for You. Chase® Home Equity Loan Low rates. No closing costs. No app fee. No annual fees. Apply online. Online Currency Trading - Free Demo 24-Hour trading, award-winning software, charts and more from GFT. GM plant is nation&#39;s most productive Silicon Insider: High Tech Labor Day S&P&#39;s run: A record for a new era Optimists take charge, and summer interns rule. &raquo; Read Today's Column Get advice on how to manage the outcome of your income. Finance Get the latest news, features and photos.
http://news.yahoo.com/s/afp/20070531/ts_afp/russiabritainspy Russian suspect says British secret service killed Litvinenko suspect says British secret service killed Litvinenko MOSCOW (AFP) - The chief suspect in the murder of Russian ex-agent Alexander Litvinenko on Thursday accused the British secret service of being behind the killing and said Litvinenko himself had been spying for MI6. Andrei Lugovoi, a former KGB agent whom Britain has charged with the London murder, spun a tale of intrigue and espionage during a media conference in Moscow that only deepened the mysteries surrounding the most lurid spy tale since the Cold War. The radiation poisoning of Litvinenko last November "couldn&#39;t have taken place outside the control of Great Britain&#39;s special services," he said at the conference broadcast live on state-run television. Asked whether there was evidence of their direct involvement in the murder, Lugovoi said: "There is". Though he would give no details, the charge was likely to send already chilly relations between Moscow and London to a new low. A British Foreign Office spokesman gave a terse response to Lugovoi&#39;s charges, telling AFP: "This is a criminal matter and not an issue about intelligence." Speaking in Paris, Litvinenko&#39;s widow Marina rejected the new accusations as "disinformation and provocation." The murder in November was a catalogue of political scandal: Litvinenko was a political asylum seeker-turned British citizen who was killed on British soil. He was poisoned with a radioactive isotope in what some commentators called the world&#39;s first act of nuclear terrorism. The sensitivity of the case -- and its role in Russia&#39;s deteriorating relations with much of the West -- were reflected when Washington threw its weight behind Britain&#39;s push to extradite Lugovoi. Russia&#39;s FSB secret services told AFP they would carry out a legal analysis of comments by Lugovoi relating to "possible damage to the security of the Russian Federation." Lugovoi, who came to the conference with a detail of hulking bodyguards, said that either Britain&#39;s MI6 intelligence agency, the Russian mafia, or fugitive Kremlin opponent Boris Berezovsky had carried out the killing. "The main role," he said, "is played by the British special services and their agents." He suggested a motive by claiming that both Berezovsky and Litvinenko, a former Russian intelligence agent turned critic of President , were working for MI6. "It is hard to escape the thought that Litvinenko had become an agent who had escaped the control of the special services and they took him out." Lugovoi also claimed MI6 had attempted to recruit him to gather compromising material on Putin and his family, and that Litvinenko had given him a book by a popular Russian author to use for secret communications. "He said that now, like in the spy films, we should use a cipher -- code the text by page number, paragraph and line." Marina Litvinenko, meanwhile, said Lugovoi&#39;s story "contradicts what the Russians have said before." She said her husband was "a high-level specialist in the fight against organised crime. He had no secrets." In London, Berezovsky dismissed Lugovoi&#39;s press conference as a piece of theatre stage-managed by the Russian government. "It is now clearer than ever that the Kremlin is behind the murder of Alexander Litvinenko," the exiled businessman said in a statement sent to AFP. "Everything about Mr Lugovoi&#39;s words and presentation made it obvious that he is acting on Kremlin instruction," he added, while denying that he is a British M16 agent. Suspicion fell on Lugovoi, together with his associate Dmitry Kovtun, as Britain&#39;s probe into the poisoning unfolded late last year. Both met with Litvinenko in an upmarket London hotel on November 1, the day Litvinenko fell ill, and both left traces of the radioactive isotope used to poison him in various locations while returning to Russia. Litvinenko died in agony 22 days after the meeting. British prosecutors charged Lugovoi with the murder last week, though Russia refused to extradite him even before Britain had filed a formal request, saying its constitution forbids the extradition of its citizens. Lugovoi and Kovtun, who work together in a private security firm, have consistently denied any wrongdoing in the case. Full Coverage: Russian Spy Death Russian suspect says British secret service killed Litvinenko AFP, 27 minutes ago Suspect: U.K. involved in ex-spy's death AP, 1 hour, 38 minutes ago Excerpts: Lugovoi news conference The Economist, May 29 UK 'behind Litvinenko poisoning' Suspect Claims British Involved in Poisoning at The Washington Post It was murder, but calling it such will change nothing at Daily Telegraph (UK), May 24 Lugovoy charge will cause huge fallout at The London Times, May 22 patient ID'd as Atlanta attorney, 31 U.S. has triggered new arms race Most Viewed: Top Stories All aboard for the Harry Potter rollercoaster U.S. "imperialism" means new arms race: Putin says fourth Iranian American detained in Iran May toll for U.S. soldiers in Iraq climbs to 122 Punta Gorda: 3 Years Later AM ET hours, 21 minutes ago New Study Links Cancer To Ground Zero Toxins CBS 2 New York AM ET Panda dies after release from captivity AP AM ET File picture shows a Russian FSO (Federal Security Service, former part of KGB) agent standing... Former Russian spy poisoned Lugovoi: British involved in spy&#39;s death The Russian businessman whom Britain has named as a suspect in the killing of ex-KGB agent Alexander Litvinenko claims he has evidence of British special services&#39; involvement in the poisoning death. (May 31) &raquo; More AP video &raquo; Show all news video An answer for my critics Hershey Vs. Pot Dealer in Trademark Suit Ala. students graduate in wake of vicious storm video puts a blogger behind bars. Kevin Sites in the Hot Zone An Afghan child bride gets help from Hot Zone readers. . France Presse.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/topstories/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_re_mi_ea/iraq SINAN SALAHEDDIN, Associated Press Writers BAGHDAD - A battle raged in west Baghdad on Thursday after residents rose called for U.S. military help to end random gunfire that forced people to huddle indoors and threats that kept students from final exams, a member of the district council said. Elsewhere, a suicide bomber hit a police recruiting center in Fallujah, killing as many as 25 people, police said. The U.S. military said only one policeman was killed and eight were wounded. The American military also reported the deaths of three more soldiers, two killed Wednesday in a roadside bombing in Baghdad and one who died of wounds from a roadside bomb attack northwest of the capital Tuesday. At least 122 American forces have died in May, the third-deadliest month of the U.S. forces backed by helicopter gunships clashed with suspected al-Qaida gunmen in western Baghdad's primarily Sunni Muslim Amariyah neighborhood in an engagement that lasted several hours, said the district councilman, who would not allow use of his name for fear of al-Qaida retribution. Casualty figures were not immediately available and there was not immediate word from the U.S. military on the engagement. But the councilman said the al-Qaida leader in the Amariyah district, known as Haji Hameed, was killed and 45 other fighters were detained. Members of al-Qaida, who consider the district part of their so-called Islamic State of Iraq, were preventing students from attending final exams, shooting randomly and forcing residents to stay in their homes, the councilman said. U.S. forces also continued a search for five Britons who were kidnapped Tuesday in Baghdad, as well as for two of its soldiers who have been missing since a May 12 ambush south of the capital. The Fallujah suicide bomber killed at least 10 policemen in the attack, which occurred about 11 a.m., according to a police official in the city who spoke on condition of anonymity because he was not authorized to release the information. The rest of the dead were civilians, many of them in line seeking jobs as policemen. He said as many as 50 were wounded. Fallujah General Hospital had received 15 bodies and 10 wounded, according to a doctor there, who would not allow the use of his name because he feared retribution. The physician said he believed other casualties were taken to the nearby Jordanian Hospital and private clinics. A member of the Fallujah city council, who also asked for anonymity for fear of attack by insurgents, said there were at least 20 killed and 25 injured. The coordination of information in Fallujah was particularly difficult because the mobile telephone system has been working only sporadically. Maj. Jeff Pool of the Multi-National Force-West said the Anbar province governor's office and the provincial police put the total number of dead at one Iraqi policeman, with six police and two civilians wounded in Fallujah, 40 miles west of Baghdad. Police said the bomber detonated explosives in his vest at the third of four checkpoints, standing among recruits who were lining up to apply for jobs on the force. The center had only opened Saturday in a primary school in eastern Fallujah. The U.S. military and Iraqi army and police were running the center along with members of Anbar Salvation Council, a loose grouping of Sunni tribes that have banded together to fight al-Qaida. Police stations and recruiting posts have been a favorite target of Sunni insurgents and al-Qaida throughout the war. U.S. forces, meanwhile, pressed on with the search for five kidnapped Britons, and a procession of mourners, some of them women wailing and beating their chests, marched through Sadr City behind a small bus carrying the coffins of two people who police said were killed in a U.S. helicopter strike before dawn. The U.S. military said it had no report of airstrikes in Sadr City and that there were no civilian casualties in the second day of a search for the Britons, who were abducted Tuesday from a Finance Ministry data processing building in eastern Baghdad. A U.S. military statement, however, said U.S. and Iraqi forces had arrested two "members of the secret cell terrorist network" in Sadr City. There was no mention of fatalities. AP Television News videotape from Sadr City showed the coffins of the victims atop a small bus with men and women walking behind, crying. A young boy could be seen sitting next to the coffins. A car in the area was punctured with big holes, as if hit by an airstrike. A police officer in Sadr City, who refused to allow use of his name because he feared retribution, said the helicopter hit a house and car at 4:30 a.m., killing two elderly people sleeping on the roof of their home &#151; a common practice in Iraq's extreme heat through late spring and summer. The officer said a 13-year-old boy was wounded. Also in Sadr City raids, which the U.S. has been conducting with a select unit of Iraqi army forces, Shiite cleric Abdul-Zahra al-Suwaidi claimed his home was raided and ransacked by American forces at 3 a.m. Thursday. The military said it had no report of the incident. Al-Suwaidi, who runs the Sadr City political office of radical cleric Muqtada al-Sadr, said he was sleeping elsewhere at the time of the raid, expecting that he would be targeted. He said his home was badly damaged and a small amount of money was taken. Dozens of U.S. Humvees and Bradley fighting vehicles had taken up positions around Sadr City at nightfall Wednesday. The five kidnapped Britons included four bodyguards working for the Montreal-based security firm GardaWorld and one employee of BearingPoint, a U.S.-based management consulting firm. In Washington, Brig. Gen. Perry Wiggins, deputy director of operations for the Joint Chiefs of Staff, said the military believed a helicopter that crashed Monday north of Baghdad was brought down by small-arms fire. The Islamic State of Iraq, an al-Qaida front group, claimed responsibility. Wiggins also said that more than 100 patrols a day were being launched to search for two missing troops who vanished after a May 12 ambush near Mahmoudiya, south of Baghdad. Four Americans and one Iraqi soldier were killed in the attack and the body of another American was later found in the Euphrates River. "Our determination and resolve to locate our missing soldiers is unwavering," Wiggins said. Iraq bomber kills 20, Sunni militants clash Reuters, 29 minutes ago 32 minutes ago Where life is cheap and easy to take at Daily Telegraph (UK), May 30 Life in a remote US Army outpost in Iraq: IEDs, DVDs, and A/C The Christian Science Monitor Many killed in Iraq suicide bomb continues for Iraq Britons Hard Truth About Leaving Iraq RealClearPolitics at The New York Times Hezbollah, Syria denounce U.N. tribunal Suspect: U.K. involved in ex-spy's death U.S.: Dead detainee was of high value Blair: G-8 must keep pledges to Africa London shares close higher Panda released into wild found dead Putin: U.S. has triggered new arms race There&#39;s something in the air in Rome: cocaine Putin issues sharp warning to US, vows to counter &#39;imperialism&#39; Suspect: U.K. involved in ex-spy's death Captive Panda Found Dead in Wild minutes ago Removal of Bullet Alleviates Headache minutes ago Spain fights for rights to shipwreck booty AP minute ago minutes ago Vonage - Official Site Save $300 a year on your phone bill. A better phone service for less. Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? Calculate new payment. Refinance and Save $1,000S $150,000 Mortgage for $483/month. Compare up to 4 free quotes. Residents of Sadr city, Baghdad inspect a damaged car after a joint U.S.-Iraqi forces raid,... Turkish buildup on Iraqi border &raquo; More Reuters video &raquo; Show all news video East News - AP Al-Qaida & Osama bin Laden elects surgeon as president Ex-KGB spy: UK tried to recruit me Missing Girl&#39;s Parents Blessed By Pontiff Diverse views on news from the right, left, and center
http://news.yahoo.com/s/nm/20070531/ts_nm/albania_bush_insult_dc Some Albanians insulted by Bush security measures Albanians insulted by Bush security measures TIRANA (Reuters) - An Albanian government decree allowing U.S. Marines to be the only armed corps guarding a visit next week has been seen by some in Albania as an insult to their security forces. Albania has been looking forward to Bush&#39;s visit on June 10, the first by a U.S. president. He will be staying for seven hours as part of a regional tour. As part of preparations, parliament on Thursday approved an act that allows more than 500 combat-ready U.S. troops entry into the country, and sanctions their use of "force proportionate to any possible threat." Albania&#39;s formal elite escort for visiting dignitaries, the Republican Guard, will not be allowed to carry guns on the day. "I abstain from voting because it is discriminatory for the Defense Ministry and the people," said Bashkim Fino, a former prime minister and opposition MP. "I see no reason for American forces to come and guarantee security." Parliament passed the decree unanimously, though 53 MPs were not present at the time.# "Please Occupy Us," ran a headline in the top-selling Korrieri above an article saying the decision meant Albanians were "unworthy of being masters of their own house." But the debate was unlikely to dent the excitement over Bush. Albania, one of Europe&#39;s poorest countries, is fervently pro-Western after four decades of Stalinist rule ended in 1990. It aims for eventual membership but reserves special affection for the United States for helping to stop the slaughter of its ethnic brothers in The breakaway territory in Serbia is expected to get independence this year over the objections of Belgrade. Albania&#39;s Defense Ministry has defended the government&#39;s move, saying it would plug security holes in areas were the Albanian forces had little experience. Local police will still be on high alert during Bush&#39;s visit, reinforcing security measures at foreign embassies, schools and markets and will have plain-clothes policemen in the city. patient ID'd as Atlanta attorney, 31 U.S. has triggered new arms race Most Viewed: Top Stories All aboard for the Harry Potter rollercoaster U.S. "imperialism" means new arms race: Putin says fourth Iranian American detained in Iran May toll for U.S. soldiers in Iraq climbs to 122 Punta Gorda: 3 Years Later AM ET hours, 21 minutes ago New Study Links Cancer To Ground Zero Toxins CBS 2 New York AM ET Panda dies after release from captivity AP AM ET at the media after arriving back at the White House... An answer for my critics Hershey Vs. Pot Dealer in Trademark Suit Ala. students graduate in wake of vicious storm video puts a blogger behind bars. Kevin Sites in the Hot Zone An Afghan child bride gets help from Hot Zone readers. Limited. or redistribution of Reuters content is expressly prohibited of Reuters. Reuters shall not be liable for any errors or delays in the content, or for any actions taken in
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/topstories/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_re_eu/russia_putin Putin: U.S. has triggered new arms race U.S. has triggered new arms race By VLADIMIR ISACHENKOV, Associated Press Writer 1 hour, 58 minutes ago said Thursday that tests of new Russian missiles were a response to the planned deployment of U.S. missile defense installations and other forces in Europe, suggesting Washington has triggered a new arms race. In a clear reference to the United States, he harshly criticized "imperialism" in global affairs and warned that Russia will strengthen its military potential to maintain a global strategic balance. "It wasn't us who initiated a new round of arms race," Putin said when asked about Russia's missile tests at a news conference after talks in the Kremlin with Greek President Karolos Papoulias. Putin described Tuesday's tests of a new ballistic missile capable of carrying multiple nuclear warheads and a new cruise missile as part of the Russian response to the planned deployment of new U.S. military bases and missile defense sites in ex-Soviet satellites in Central and Eastern Europe. He assailed the United States and other members for failing to ratify an amended version of the 1990 Conventional Forces in Europe (CFE) treaty, which limits the deployment of heavy non-nuclear weapons around the continent. "We have signed and ratified the CFE and are fully implementing it. We have pulled out all our heavy weapons from the European part of Russia to (locations) behind the Ural Mountains and cut our military by 300,000 men," Putin said. "And what about our partners? They are filling Eastern Europe with new weapons. A new base in Bulgaria, another one in Romania, a (missile defense) site in Poland and a radar in the Czech Republic," he said. "What we are supposed to do? We can't just sit back and look at that." Putin and other Russian officials have repeatedly rejected U.S. assurances that the planned missile defense installations are meant to counter a potential threat from nations such as and pose no danger to Russia. Putin reaffirmed his warning that Russia would opt out of the CFE treaty altogether if NATO nations fail to ratify its amended version. "Either you ratify the treaty and start observing it, or we will opt out of it," Putin said. In remarks clearly directed against Washington, Putin blasted those "who want to dictate their will to all others regardless of international norms and law." "It's dangerous and harmful," he added. "Norms of the international law were replaced with political expediency. We view it as diktat and imperialism." Russia this week initiated an international conference to be held in Austria in early June to discuss the situation around the CFE treaty. Putin described the tests of new missiles conducted by Russia on Tuesday as a necessary response to the Western action. "There is no reason to fear these actions by Russia, they aren't aggressive. It's merely a response to tough and unfounded unilateral actions by our partners," he said. "These actions are aimed at preserving a global balance." In one missile test Tuesday, a prototype of new Russia's intercontinental ballistic missile, called the RS-24, was fired from a mobile launcher at the Plesetsk launch site in northwestern Russia and its test warhead landed on target 3,400 miles away on the Far Eastern Kamchatka Peninsula, officials said. Russia's military also tested a new cruise missile based on the existing short-range Iskander missile. "We will keep modernizing our potential," Putin said. Russian suspect says British secret service killed Litvinenko AFP, 29 minutes ago Suspect: U.K. involved in ex-spy's death AP, 1 hour, 39 minutes ago Project born in the Cold War at Daily Telegraph (UK), May 29 Wealth gap leaves rural Russia behind Russia blames US in missile row Accuses British in Spy's Death at The New York Times Killing the Russian Media at The New York Times at The Economist, Apr 26 Syria denounce U.N. tribunal Suspect: U.K. involved in ex-spy's death U.S.: Dead detainee was of high value Blair: G-8 must keep pledges to Africa Panda released into wild found dead There&#39;s something in the air in Rome: cocaine Putin issues sharp warning to US, vows to counter &#39;imperialism&#39; U.K. involved in ex-spy's death Captive Panda Found Dead in Wild minutes ago Removal of Bullet Alleviates Headache minutes ago Spain fights for rights to shipwreck booty AP minute ago minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? Calculate new payment. Refinance and Save $1,000S $150,000 Mortgage for $483/month. Compare up to 4 free quotes. Refinance with Bad Credit Compare up to 4 free quotes. Serious refinance requests only. Russian President Vladimir Putin, left, speaks at a news conference after a meeting with Greek... Russian President Vladimir Putin News - AP elects surgeon as president Ex-KGB spy: UK tried to recruit me Missing Girl&#39;s Parents Blessed By Pontiff Diverse views on news from the right, left, and center
http://news.yahoo.com/s/afp/20070531/pl_afp/usclimatepoliticsbush Bush unveils new climate change plan unveils new climate change plan WASHINGTON (AFP) - US Thursday he would urge major industrialized nations at a summit next week to join a new global framework for fighting climate change after the Kyoto Protocol lapses. "The United States will work with other nations to establish a new framework on greenhouse gas emissions for when the Kyoto Protocol expires in 2012," he said in a speech laying out his agenda for the June 6-8 G8 summit in Germany. "My proposal is this: By the end of next year, America and other nations will set a long-term global goal for reducing greenhouse gases" in consultation with major greenhouse gas-producing nations, including fast-growing India and China, and industry leaders, over the next 18 months, Bush said. Countries would also set "mid-term national targets and programs" depending on "their own mix of energy sources and future energy needs," he said, adding that there would be a "strong and transparent" method to assess progress. "It&#39;s important to assure that we get results," said Bush, who made the initiative a key goal of his talks next week with leaders from Europe, where critics have accused Washington of dragging its feet on climate change. The US president said he would push G8 leaders to boost investment in research and development of environment-friendly technologies and help poor countries acquire such cutting-edge science. "We&#39;re also going to work to conclude talks with other nations on eliminating tariffs and other barriers to clean energy technologies and services by the end of this year," he said. "If you&#39;re truly committed to helping the environment, nations need to get rid of their tariffs, need to get rid of those barriers that prevent new technologies from coming into their countries," he said. "We&#39;ll help the world&#39;s poorest nations reduce emissions by giving them government-developed technologies at low cost or in some case no cost at all," said Bush. The US proposal risks worsening a row with Germany, the current G8 president, which is seeking a strong resolution on fighting climate change at the summit and wants to bring as many nations as possible to the table. Greenpeace spokesman Joerg Feddern criticized recent media reports on the US proposal as an attempt to undermine the &#39; Kyoto process with its mandatory restrictions on greenhouse gas emissions. "This is fatal for climate protection," Feddern told AFP. Under the Kyoto Procotol, 35 industrialized nations that have signed and ratified the pact are required to make targeted cuts in emissions of greenhouse gases, including carbon dioxide (CO2). The United States, the world&#39;s number one emitter of greenhouse gases, has refused to ratify the protocol and abide by the Kyoto process. China and India&#39;s status as developing nations exempts them from mandatory targets on greenhouse gas output, though they are fast becoming big emitters of greenhouse gases as they burn oil, gas and coal to power their economies. The US administration has cited this as a reason for not submitting the protocol for ratification by the Senate. This week China and India both signalled that they were not ready to accept binding targets on cutting emissions in the post-Kyoto era either. UN negotiations on a new protocol on climate change will begin in earnest at a conference in Bali in December. Washington strongly objects to a draft declaration on climate change that Chancellor Angela Merkel wants world leaders to adopt at the Group of Eight summit in Heiligendamm in northern Germany. The text calls for a commitment to cutting global greenhouse gas emissions to 50 percent below 1990 levels by 2050 and limiting the worldwide temperature rise this century to two degrees Celsius (3.6 degrees Fahrenheit). Bush calls for global emissions goals sees South Korea model for Iraq Sen. Clinton defends private jet travel Thompson moves toward White House bid Cease-fire eyed to stop violence in Iraq Sen. Clinton defends private jet travel Boost biofuels, cut U.S. farm aid: ex-Senate leaders Rice holds line on Iran nuclear program Bush sees South Korea model for Iraq Bush asks for global emission goals by 2008 AP minutes ago CNN minutes ago Stephanopoulos on Fred Thompson AM ET Raw Politics: Watchdogs barking CNN AM ET Vonage - Official Site Save $300 a year on your phone bill. A better phone service for less. Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? Calculate new payment. Refinance and Save $1,000S $150,000 Mortgage for $483/month. Compare up to 4 free quotes. US seen here 30 May 2007, said Thursday he would urge... urges 15 nations to set global emissions goal Brinkley Describes Reagan&#39;s Inner Narrative Bush calls for global emissions goals "What would you include in legislation to address global warming?" Offer your ideas. SEND US YOUR PHOTOS! Following the presidential campaign? Submit pictures of candidates, supporters, and events to You Witness News. Featured IN YAHOO! NEWS Election coverage and analysis from Congressional Quarterly. Quarterly blogger makes waves, and enemies, on Capitol Hill. All news on Chief Justice Roberts, Samuel Alito's nomination, and more. &raquo; All Court Coverage Yahoo! News Search Now Contains Blogs Find the latest posts about what's in the news. . France Presse.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/topstories/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_hi_te/spam_arrest Man described as a top spammer arrested described as a top spammer arrested By GENE JOHNSON, AP Legal Affairs Writer AM ET SEATTLE - A 27-year-old man described as one of the world's most prolific spammers was arrested Wednesday, and federal authorities said computer users across the Web could notice a decrease in the amount of junk e-mail. Robert Alan Soloway is accused of using networks of compromised "zombie" computers to send out millions upon millions of spam e-mails. "He's one of the top 10 spammers in the world," said Tim Cranton, a Microsoft Corp. lawyer who is senior director of the company's Worldwide Internet Safety Programs. "He's a huge problem for our customers. This is a very good day." A federal grand jury last week returned a 35-count indictment against Soloway charging him with mail fraud, wire fraud, e-mail fraud, aggravated identity theft and money laundering. Soloway pleaded not guilty Wednesday afternoon to all charges after a judge determined that &#151; even with four bank accounts seized by the government &#151; he was sufficiently well off to pay for his own lawyer. He has been living in a ritzy apartment and drives an expensive Mercedes convertible, said prosecutor Kathryn Warma. Prosecutors are seeking to have him forfeit $773,000 they say he made from his business, Newport Internet Marketing Corp. A public defender who represented him for Wednesday's hearing declined to comment. Prosecutors say Soloway used computers infected with malicious code to send out millions of junk e-mails since 2003. The computers are called "zombies" because owners typically have no idea their machines have been infected. He continued his activities even after Microsoft won a $7 million civil judgment against him in 2005 and the operator of a small Internet service provider in Oklahoma won a $10 million judgment, prosecutors said. U.S. Attorney Jeff Sullivan said Wednesday that the case is the first in the country in which federal prosecutors have used identity theft statutes to prosecute a spammer for taking over someone else's Internet domain name. Soloway could face decades in prison, though prosecutors said they have not calculated what guideline sentencing range he might face. The investigation began when the authorities began receiving hundreds of complaints about Soloway, who had been featured on a list of known spammers kept by The Spamhaus Project, an international anti-spam organization. The Santa Barbara County, Calif., Department of Social Services said it was spending $1,000 a week to fight the spam it was receiving, and other businesses and individuals complained of having their reputations damaged when it appeared spam was originating from their computers. "This is not just a nuisance. This is way beyond a nuisance," Warma said. Soloway used the networks of compromised computers to send out unsolicited bulk e-mails urging people to use his Internet marketing company to advertise their products, authorities said. People who clicked on a link in the e-mail were directed to his Web site. There, Soloway advertised his ability to send out as many as 20 million e-mail advertisements over 15 days for $495, the indictment said. The Spamhaus Project rejoiced at his arrest. "Soloway has been a long-term nuisance on the Internet &#151; both in terms of the spam he sent, and the people he duped to use his spam service," organizers wrote on Spamhaus.org. Soloway remained in federal detention pending a hearing Monday. Full Coverage: Internet and WWW Apple to put YouTube on Apple TV Reuters, Wed May 30, 8:16 PM ET Viacom welcomes licensing opportunity from Apple TV Reuters, Wed May 30, 8:05 PM ET Coping with death on the web Online, GOP Is Playing Catch-Up at The Washington Post Connecticut To Require Sex Offender E-Mail Registration NewsFactor Web 2.0 'distracts good design' A shameful surrender to pornographers at Christian Science Monitor, Apr 02 Step cautiously into an online bank at Christian Science Monitor, Apr 02 Chip sales expected to grow by 2.5 pct. Five cos. win gov't telecom contract Japanese robot dances to iPod music Gates, Jobs make rare joint appearance U.S. soldiers face tough VOIP call Google takes big step to make Web work offline Hong Kong cracks down on spam Web site error rocks global oil markets Gates, Jobs make rare joint appearance Five cos. win gov't telecom contract Technology & Health Video Captive Panda Found Dead in Wild minutes ago Apple says YouTube coming to Apple TV AP minutes ago Palm unveils new laptop-like gadget AP minutes ago Convertible crash test results CNN AM ET Vonage - Official Site Save $300 a year on your phone bill. A better phone service for less. Learn More About the Hitachi Hybrid & Hold Two Camcorders in One Hand. Nationwide Onsite Service & Support Troubleshooting, Upgrades, Training troubleshooting, Training, Networking, Upgrades, Graphics, Database, Digital Video. A 27-year-old man described as one of the world's most prolific spammers was arrested Wednesday,... coffee table computer &#39;I Became My Own Big Brother&#39; Swedes open embassy in Second Life See what's new in Windows Vista. The day's most popular tech news. grandson team soothes souls with online hugs.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/topstories/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_sp_te_ga_su/ten_french_open Lleyton Hewitt advances at French Open Hewitt advances at French Open By CHRIS LEHOURITES, AP Sports Writer 1 hour, 29 minutes ago PARIS - Lleyton Hewitt rallied from two sets down for the fourth time in his career Thursday and beat 2004 champion Gaston Gaudio 4-6, 3-6, 6-2, 6-4, 6-2 in the second round of the Hewitt, a two-time Grand Slam champion, missed two months because of a back injury and returned at the Rome Masters in early May. He broke his Argentine opponent in the third and seventh games of the third set, and then again to open each of the two remaining sets. "He's got to be one of the toughest second-round players to play," said Hewitt, who lost to Gaudio in the 2004 French Open quarterfinals. "The first two sets he played fantastic." The 14th-seeded Australian made 25 unforced errors sets, but limited that to 19 in the final three. He also had 20 aces, while Gaudio double-faulted 13 times. "I felt like I had a lot of opportunities to go up a break Hewitt said. Hewitt stayed on course for a fourth-round rematch with two-time defending champion Rafael Nadal at Roland Garros. He lost to Nadal at the same stage last year. Hewitt has won the and reached the final at the . He has made the quarterfinals twice at the French Open, the last time losing to eventual champion Gaudio in 2004. Gaudio, who had reached the third round in Paris for five straight years, has only once won consecutive matches this year. Maria Sharapova, who missed nearly two months of the season because of an injured right shoulder, advanced to the third round in the women's draw, easily beating Jill Craybas of the United States 6-2, 6-1. "I feel it at times in the match," Sharapova said. "I try not to think about it." Up 2-1 at the start, Craybas held three break points at love-40. But Sharapova won the next 11 points, holding serve with the help of three forehand winners in a row, then breaking Craybas at love when the American dumped a volley into the net with the entire court open. In the second set, Craybas broke the second-ranked Russian in the sixth game, smiling and raising her hands after the winning point to accept the crowd's applause. But Sharapova broke right back to advance. Australian Open champion Serena Williams raced through the first set but was stretched in the second against Milagros Sequera, finally winning 6-0, 7-6 (3). No. 7 Ana Ivanovic defeated Sania Mirza 6-1, 6-4. No. 14 Patty Schnyder, No. 17 Katarina Srebotnik and No. 25 Lucie Safarova also advanced. On the men's side, No. 6 Novak Djokovic also reached the third round, beating Laurent Recouderc of France 6-3, 3-6, 6-3, 6-1. No. 16 Marcos Baghdatis, the 2006 Australian Open finalist, No. 7 Ivan Ljubicic and No. 20 Jarkko Nieminen also won. "Everybody now expects me to be the guy who can hurt the best two players in the world," said Djokovic, who has won three titles this year &#151; including one on clay. Later Thursday, Nadal was to face Flavio Cipolla in the second round. Amelie Mauresmo also was scheduled to play. On Wednesday, top-ranked Roger Federer advanced to the third round, stopping Thierry Ascione of France 6-1, 6-2, 7-6 (8). The 10-time Grand Slam champion breezed through the first two sets, but as conditions worsened and the sun began to fade, so did his control of the match. "I know that they want to get their match over and done with," Federer said. Organizers have been trying to squeeze in extra matches because of the rain delays on the first two days of the tournament. "What I don't like is if they think ... I'm the favorite, I should win this in straight sets," said Federer, who finally walked off court at 9:15 p.m. "What about if it doesn't turn out this way?" Michelle Wie withdraws from Ginn Tribute Spurs top Jazz to make NBA finals Ducks win to get halfway to Stanley Cup Kobe demands, retracts trade request NFL veterans seek help for dementia Rodriguez courts controversy in win Kobe demands, retracts trade request Spurs top Jazz to make NBA finals NFL veterans seek help for dementia 'Stray-Rod?' Tabloid pounces on A-Rod Dover 200 at Dover Int'l Busch Series on ESPN. Saturday, June 2nd, 2: 30PM EST on ESPN2. Reebok Run Easy, Learn What It's About Map your favorite runs, meet runners. Share playlist, photos and more. Special savings on Hertz rentals. Reserve online for our best rates. Australia's Lleyton Hewitt backhands to Argentina's Gaston Gaudio during their second round match of the... Star Lends Hand to Virginia Tech Veteran Detroit is suddenly in search of poise Sports news stories and photos &raquo; All Most Popular SOCCER ON Y! SPORTS Get the latest news, photos and schedules. Sports MLB ON Y! SPORTS Get the latest on winter meetings, trades and news. Sports Get the latest news, analysis and more. Sports
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/topstories/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/nm/20070531/pl_nm/climate_bush_dc Deborah Zabarenko and Caren Bohan 1 hour, 56 minutes ago a long-term strategy on climate change on Thursday, with plans to gather the countries that emit the most greenhouse gases and set a global emissions goal. Bush would also cut tariff barriers to sharing environmental technology as part of a strategy announced as he prepared to attend a Group of Eight summit in Germany next weekly likely to be dominated by addressing global climate change. The U.S. strategy calls for consensus on long-term goals for reducing the greenhouse gases that spur global warming, but not before the end of 2008, White House spokeswoman Dana Perino said. Bush plans in the fall to convene the first in a series of meetings on ways to limit global emissions by a set amount by about 2050. About 15 countries would be invited, including two nations that like the United States are major polluters, China and India. "The United States takes this issue seriously," Bush said. In negotiations before the summit, Washington rejected setting targets to reduce greenhouse gases, championed by other participants. The plan calls for eliminating tariff barriers within six months, freeing up the distribution of new environmentally friendly technology. The gathering of the biggest greenhouse gas countries -- those that spew a combined 80 percent of the world&#39;s emissions -- should take place in the United States this fall, the official said. The meeting will likely include the G8 developed countries, fast-developing China and India, and Brazil, Australia, South Africa, Mexico, Perino made clear the United States would continue to reject a European push for a proposal aimed at addressing global climate change through Kyoto-style caps on carbon emissions. "We do not endorse global carbon trading," Perino said. Full Coverage: Climate Change Bush calls for global emissions goals AP, 22 minutes ago Bush unveils new climate change plan AFP, 22 minutes ago Global carbon emissions in overdrive The Christian Science Monitor Leo and 'The 11th Hour' at The Los Angeles Times US urges new greenhouse gas goals ice forest melting due to global warming, says Greenpeace at The Guardian (UK)., May 30 Lead or Step Aside, EPA at The Washington Post Climate and the UN: A new bid for control? Bush calls for global emissions goals Edwards wants probe of high gas prices sees South Korea model for Iraq Sen. Clinton defends private jet travel Cease-fire eyed to stop violence in Iraq Sen. Clinton defends private jet travel Boost biofuels, cut U.S. farm aid: ex-Senate leaders Rice holds line on Iran nuclear program Bush sees South Korea model for Iraq Bush asks for global emission goals by 2008 AP minutes ago CNN minutes ago Stephanopoulos on Fred Thompson AM ET Raw Politics: Watchdogs barking CNN AM ET Vonage - Official Site Save $300 a year on your phone bill. A better phone service for less. Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? Calculate new payment. Refinance and Save $1,000S $150,000 Mortgage for $483/month. Compare up to 4 free quotes. Traffic passes through a haze of smog in downtown Los Angeles in this November 19,... urges 15 nations to set global emissions goal Brinkley Describes Reagan&#39;s Inner Narrative Bush calls for global emissions goals "What would you include in legislation to address global warming?" Offer your ideas. SEND US YOUR PHOTOS! Following the presidential campaign? Submit pictures of candidates, supporters, and events to You Witness News. Featured IN YAHOO! NEWS Election coverage and analysis from Congressional Quarterly. Quarterly blogger makes waves, and enemies, on Capitol Hill. All news on Chief Justice Roberts, Samuel Alito's nomination, and more. &raquo; All Court Coverage Yahoo! News Search Now Contains Blogs Find the latest posts about what's in the news. Limited. or redistribution of Reuters content is expressly prohibited of Reuters. Reuters shall not be liable for any errors or delays in the content, or for any actions taken in
http://news.yahoo.com/i/716 The top news headlines on current events from Yahoo! News hour, 41 minutes ago WASHINGTON - The economy with growth slowing to a pace of just 0.6 percent. That was the worst three-month showing in over four years. TB patient ID'd as Atlanta attorney, 31 U.S. has triggered new arms race 1 hour, 59 minutes ago PEOPLE OF THE WEB A violent video puts a blogger behind bars. THE WEEK IN PHOTOS View a selection of the week's best photos. An Iowa resident describes his state's unusual political scene. 60 MINUTES ON YAHOO! NEWS Two years in Iraq The story of one battalion and their families at home. Five cos. win gov't telecom contract WASHINGTON - Five companies &#151; AT&T, Level 3 Communications Inc., Qwest Communications, Sprint Nextel and Verizon &#151; on Thursday were awarded a federal telecommunications contract worth up to $20 billion over 10 years. Man described as a top spammer arrested AM ET SEATTLE - A 27-year-old man described as one of the world's most prolific spammers was arrested Wednesday, and federal authorities said computer users across the Web could notice a decrease in the amount of junk e-mail. Japanese robot dances to iPod music AM ET TOKYO - A new Japanese robot twists and rolls to iPod tunes in an intricate dance based on complex mathematics, a technology developers said will one day enable robots to move about spontaneously instead of following preprogrammed motions. Harry Potter theme park headed to Fla. 1 hour, 2 minutes ago LONDON - Universal Studios is opening up a Harry Potter theme park in Florida &#151; complete with the Hogwarts School of Witchcraft and Wizardry, the Forbidden Forest and Hogsmeade village. Lleyton Hewitt advances at French Open 1 hour, 29 minutes ago PARIS - Lleyton Hewitt rallied from two sets down for the fourth time in his career Thursday and beat 2004 champion Gaston Gaudio 4-6, 3-6, 6-2, 6-4, 6-2 in the second round of the French Open. U.S. "imperialism" means new arms race: Putin 1 hour, 54 minutes ago MOSCOW (Reuters) - Russian President Vladimir Putin launched a scathing attack on the West on Thursday, accusing Washington of imperialism and of starting a new arms race. hour, 56 minutes ago WASHINGTON (Reuters) - a long-term strategy on climate change on Thursday, with plans to gather the countries that emit the most greenhouse gases and set a global emissions goal. U.S. spars with Iran before Iran-EU nuclear talks MADRID (Reuters) - The United States told Iran on Thursday it must change its nuclear course or be isolated, but Tehran remained defiant as it held talks on its atomic program with the European Union. Iraq bomber kills 20, Sunni militants clash FALLUJA, Iraq (Reuters) - A suicide bomber killed up to 20 men queuing at a police recruitment centre west of Baghdad on Thursday, police said, and al Qaeda militants battled a rival Sunni Arab faction in the south of the capital. Syria may trouble Lebanon after U.N. vote: Hariri BEIRUT (Reuters) - Syria could spark trouble in Lebanon in response to a U.N. Security Council vote to set up a tribunal to try the killers of Rafik al-Hariri, the former prime minister&#39;s son said on Thursday. Litvinenko suspect says British spies real killers AM ET MOSCOW (Reuters) - The man charged by Britain with murdering former Russian agent Alexander Litvinenko denied involvement on Thursday, saying British intelligence and a self-exiled Russian multi-millionaire were far more likely suspects. Nine Atlantic hurricanes expected in &#39;07 2 hours, 42 minutes ago MIAMI (Reuters) - The Colorado State University hurricane research team renewed its forecast for an "above average" 2007 Atlantic storm season on Thursday and predicted 17 tropical storms, with nine growing to hurricane strength. Some Albanians insulted by Bush security measures TIRANA (Reuters) - An Albanian government decree allowing U.S. Marines to be the only armed corps guarding a visit next week has been seen by some in Albania as an insult to their security forces. Bush unveils new climate change plan WASHINGTON (AFP) - US Thursday he would urge major industrialized nations at a summit next week to join a new global framework for fighting climate change after the Kyoto Protocol lapses. Russian suspect says British secret service killed Litvinenko MOSCOW (AFP) - The chief suspect in the murder of Russian ex-agent Alexander Litvinenko on Thursday accused the British secret service of being behind the killing and said Litvinenko himself had been spying for MI6. Blair urges greater efforts to combat poverty in Africa AM ET JOHANNESBURG (AFP) - The world&#39;s richest nations need to show greater commitment towards Africa, British Prime Minister Tony Blair said Thursday, amid concern that pledges on aid and development were falling short. Whaling commission meeting faces another row on final day ANCHORAGE, United States (AFP) - The polarized International Whaling Commission wraps up another stormy annual meeting Thursday as it considers Japan&#39;s bid to lift a ban to allow coastal communities to hunt whales. Putin issues sharp warning to US, vows to counter &#39;imperialism&#39; 2 hours, 23 minutes ago MOSCOW (AFP) - President Vladimir Putin issued an acerbic warning Thursday to the United States, saying the recent test of a new Russian missile was a direct response to US actions and condemning "imperialism" in world affairs. Calls for Iranian flexibility at nuclear talks with EU MADRID (AFP) - EU foreign policy chief Javier Solana and top Iranian negotiator Ali Larijani began talks here Thursday aimed at ending an increasingly tense standoff over Tehran&#39;s contested nuclear programme. US economy slows to crawl, but some see rebound 1 hour, 16 minutes ago WASHINGTON (AFP) - The US economy weakened with a sluggish 0.6 percent growth pace, data showed Thursday, but many analysts said they see signs of a rebound ahead. Most Popular Top Stories All aboard for the Harry Potter rollercoaster AM ET LONDON (Reuters) - J.K Rowling, who became the world&#39;s first billion dollar author on the back of Harry Potter&#39;s success, has given the go-ahead for the creation of a Florida theme park dedicated to the schoolboy wizard. U.S. "imperialism" means new arms race: Putin 1 hour, 54 minutes ago MOSCOW (Reuters) - Russian President Vladimir Putin launched a scathing attack on the West on Thursday, accusing Washington of imperialism and of starting a new arms race. U.S. says fourth Iranian American detained in Iran 1 hour, 18 minutes ago WASHINGTON (Reuters) - Iran has detained a fourth Iranian American, California businessman Ali Shakeri, the U.S. State Department said on Thursday, calling his arrest a "disturbing pattern" of harassment of dual citizens. hour, 56 minutes ago WASHINGTON (Reuters) - a long-term strategy on climate change on Thursday, with plans to gather the countries that emit the most greenhouse gases and set a global emissions goal. U.S. ranks low, just above Iran on new peace index Wed May 30, 12:49 PM ET WASHINGTON (Reuters) - The United States is among the least peaceful nations in the world, ranking 96th between Yemen and Iran, according to a new index released on Wednesday that evaluates 121 nations based on their peacefulness. U.S. News & World Report &raquo; Go to this contest on Bix File photo shows security men guarding the China Eastern Airlines&#39; building in Shanghai. China Eastern... Osama bin Laden and al-Qaida &raquo; More Top Stories Photos Get the Untold Story Kevin Sites in the Hot Zone: Covering all of the world's conflicts. &raquo; Kevin Sites in the Hot Zone Freshen up your PC and make it look and run just like new. The latest Iraq news, analysis, photos, video and more. &raquo; More Iraq Coverage about
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/topstories/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_en_mo/harry_potter_park Harry Potter theme park headed to Fla. Potter theme park headed to Fla. By LINDSEY TOLER, Associated Press Writer 1 hour, 2 minutes ago LONDON - Universal Studios is opening up a theme park in Florida &#151; complete with the Hogwarts School of Witchcraft and Wizardry, the Forbidden Forest and Hogsmeade village. "The Wizarding World of Harry Potter," will open in late 2009 in Orlando, officials said Thursday. "The plans I've seen look incredibly exciting, and I don't think fans of the books or films will be disappointed," said author , who has been working with a creative team to make sure the park resembles the books and films. More than a dozen artists and designers lead by Stuart Craig, the production designer of the movies, have set up house in the studio where the movies are being filmed to make sure every detail is considered, according to Scott Trowbridge of Universal. "We're really going to the people who know this world best to ensure that level of authenticity," he said. The Potter park will allow visitors to view the iconic locations in Rowling's magical world, like Dumbledore's office in Hogwarts and the shops in Hogsmeade. Some locations may be in upcoming books, Trowbridge said. Trowbridge said while there would not be any character lookalikes at the park, fans wanting to see Harry Potter and his magical friends wouldn't leave disappointed. "This is Harry's world," said Trowbridge. "Most every fan wants to have an encounter with the star of the show." The Harry Potter book series has been translated into 65 languages with more than 325 million copies sold in over 200 territories around the world. The fifth film in the series, "Harry Potter and the Order of the Phoenix," will be released in theatres on 13 July. The seventh and final book of the series will be released on 21 July. Harry Potter theme park headed to Fla. Richie fears she may go to jail too Lohan's dad: Lindsay hooked on OxyContin New 'Potter' to open sooner than planned Thompson won't be back on 'Law & Order' Lovitz, Laugh Factory make lifelong deal Lohan's dad: Lindsay hooked on OxyContin New 'Potter' to open sooner than planned Thompson won't be back on 'Law & Order' WOMAN OUT OF WHEELCHAIR IS IGNORED BY PASSERS-BY Lohan&#39;s dad: Lindsay hooked on OxyContin AP - 39 minutes ago Jackson items under hammer BBC AM ET Thursday&#39;s live music lineup CNN AM ET Theme park for Potter fans BBC AM ET Find Adventure at Disney® Experience a Disney Vacation. Order a Free Vacation Planning DVD. Buy a Universal Orlando Vacation, Get 7 days of Unlimited Admission. 1000 Raffle Tickets - $45, Free Shipping 500 for $40, 1000 for $45, 2000 for $75, 3000 for $105, 4000 for $135, 5000 for $16.5, additional 1000s only $27. Custom printed & shipped free within 24 hrs. Ask about next day delivery. Hogwarts Castle - 'The Wizarding World of Harry Potter' will be anchored by the most... Theme park for Potter fans A theme park based on the boy wizard Harry Potter is to be built in Orlando, Florida. &raquo; More BBC video &raquo; Show all news video News - AP builds a living out of LEGO How Do You Spell Success? Can you wrap your head around the bandanna? Vote for your favorite movie spoof. Whitney Matheson blogs on showbiz. &raquo; Entertainment on USAToday PEOPLE OF THE WEB One-time child star Kirk Cameron goes online to save souls.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/topstories/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_sc/suriname_new_species Scientists find 24 species in Suriname - Yahoo! News Scientists find 24 species in Suriname By ARNY BELFOR, Associated Press Writer PARAMARIBO Suriname - A frog with fluorescent purple markings and 12 kinds of dung beetles were among two dozen new species discovered in the remote plateaus of eastern Suriname, scientists said Monday. The expedition was sponsored by two mining companies hoping to excavate the area for bauxite, the raw material used to make aluminum, and it was unknown how the findings would affect their plans. Scientists discovered the species during a 2005 expedition led by the U.S.-based nonprofit Conservation International in rainforests and swamps about 80 miles southeast of Paramaribo, the capital of the South American country, organization spokesman Tom Cohen said. Among the species found were the atelopus frog, which has distinctive purple markings; six types of fish; 12 dung beetles, and one ant species, he said. The scientists called for better conservation management in the unprotected, state-owned areas, where hunting and small-scale illegal mining is common. The study was financed by Suriname Aluminum Company LLC and BHP Billiton Maatschappij Suriname. Suriname Aluminum, which has a government concession to explore gold in the area, will include the data in its environmental assessment study, said Haydi Berrenstein, a Conservation International official in Suriname, which borders Brazil, Guyana and French Guiana. About 80 percent of Suriname is covered with dense rainforest. Thousands of Brazilians and Surinamese are believed to work in illegal gold mining, creating mercury pollution that has threatened the health of Amerindians and Maroons in Suriname's interior. Associated Press writer Danica Coto in San Juan, Puerto Rico, contributed to this report. Indonesian kangaroos to gain freedom Probe passing Venus on way to Mercury China won't adopt caps on gas emissions Israel Museum displays rare manuscript Weather around the U.S.A. Most Viewed - Science New Depression Rx: Get Married Purple frog among 24 new species found in Suriname Man says he captured Loch Ness on film Sharks Use Strange Trick to Hunt Prey Blame coal: Texas leads carbon emissions Weather & Science Video AccuWeather - AM ET Live in Mississippi: The first to rebuild after Katrina weather.com - AM ET AccuWeather - AM ET weather.com - AM ET Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Vonage - Official Site Talk all you want for just $24.99 per month & get 1 month free. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. In this photograph released by Conservation International on Monday, June 4, 2007, an Atelopus frog... New species found in Suriname Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) Animals & Pets News &raquo; More News Feeds Elsewhere on the Web Divers dismantle artificial tire reef New insights into earliest trees uncovered Study: Climate change models overstate droughts SEND US YOUR PHOTOS! Are cicadas crawling out of the ground at your house? Submit your photos to You Witness News. Track innovations in science, health and technology. Explore the world's wonders and the battle to save them. The most popular science news stories and photos. &raquo; All Most Popular Copyright &copy; 2007 The Associated Press. All rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of The Associated Press.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/topstories/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_re_la_am_ca/terrorism_plot_trinidad Group denies link to NYC terror plot - Yahoo! News Group denies link to NYC terror plot By TONY FRASER, Associated Press Writer PORT-OF-SPAIN, Trinidad - The leader of a radical Trinidadian Muslim group denied Monday that his organization had any connection to four men accused of planning to attack New York's John F. Kennedy International Airport. Yasin Abu Bakr, the leader of Jamaat al Muslimeen, told The Associated Press he knew "nothing" about the alleged plan to bomb a fuel pipeline feeding the airport, a plot authorities say was hatched by a group that included a former Guyanese politician. U.S. authorities claim the alleged plotters sought support in Trinidad from Jamaat al Muslimeen, which staged a deadly coup attempt in the Caribbean nation in 1990. The men did not receive such support, according to court documents. But the documents also say that Abdel Nur, a Guyanese suspect thought to be still at large in Trinidad, said he met in May with Abu Bakr at his compound in Trinidad and the Islamic leader suggested that he return later with others involved "to discuss the plan in detail." Nur allegedly said the Jamaat al Muslimeen leader also wanted to do further checks on Russell Defreitas, the 63-year-old accused mastermind of the plot, and an unidentified confidential informant who had infiltrated the group, the documents said. Abu Bakr declined to say if he knew the men, but also denied any involvement. "I know nothing about these men, and I have nothing to do with whatever they are being charged for," he said in his first public comments since U.S. authorities disclosed the plot on Saturday. Two of the suspects &#151; Abdul Kadir, a former member of Guyana's parliament, and Kareem Ibrahim of Trinidad &#151; are in custody in Trinidad. Nur was being sought by Trinidadian authorities. Defreitas, a U.S. citizen native to Guyana and former JFK air cargo employee, was jailed in the United States. Abu Bakr's group, often accused of aiming to create an Islamic state in Trinidad, describes itself simply as a religious organization. The group stormed Parliament and took the prime minister and his Cabinet hostage in a 1990 rebellion that left 24 dead &#151; the only Islamic revolt in the Western Hemisphere. The rebels eventually surrendered and were later pardoned. It is not known to have international reach, although a member was convicted of trying to smuggle 70 assault rifles to Trinidad from Florida in 2005. Abu Bakr faces charges stemming from a 2005 sermon in which he called for war against rich Muslims who refuse to pay zakaat, an Islamic tithe used to alleviate poverty. The following week, he was arrested by police who razed the group's compound and charged him with sedition and incitement to violence. "You know why they are linking me with this so-called plot is to bias the minds of jurors who will be sitting in my case," he said. Separately, a lawyer for the two men held in Trinidad said they would fight extradition to the United States. Ibrahim and Kadir made their initial court appearance Monday for extradition on one count each of conspiracy to commit a terrorist act against the U.S. government. "We will be opposing extradition," said Rajid Persad, a lawyer who represents both men. The judge set another hearing for June 11 to consider bail and scheduled an extradition hearing for Aug. 2. Farid Scoon, another lawyer for the men, said they intend to seek bail. The extradition fight could be a drawn-out affair. Ibrahim and Kadir could appeal all the way to the Privy Council in Britain, the highest court of appeal for the former British territory. Full Coverage: Terrorism & 9/11 29 minutes ago Group denies link to NYC terror plot AP, 32 minutes ago One Had Stature and One Didn't, but Neither Seemed an Extremist at The New York Times (reg. req'd), Jun 04 This terror plot was homegrown at Newsday, Jun 03 Hunt for fourth man in NY airport terror plot at The Guardian (UK)., Jun 04 The Christian Science Monitor via Yahoo! News, Jun 04 Terrorists, Chemicals and Trains at The New York Times (reg. req'd), Jun 04 Break up the FBI at The Los Angeles Times (reg. req'd), Mar 21 Group claims captured troops were killed Square survivors seek reform Putin attacks West ahead of G-8 summit Bramble and Sibierski join Wigan on free transfers Most Viewed - World Group claims captured troops were killed Would-be suicide bomber dies in Somalia Musharraf tightens media regulations Russia warns U.S. about missile system Bush heads to G8 Summit AP - 41 minutes ago Chinese energy plan reject caps on greenhouse gases CBC.ca - 1 hour, 40 minutes ago Video claims missing U.S. soldiers are dead AP minutes ago Judge in Guantanamo drops charges against Khadr CBC.ca minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Vonage - Official Site Talk all you want for just $24.99 per month & get 1 month free. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. Trinidadian Kareem Ibrahim, 56, arrives to the Magistrate Court for an extradition hearing in downtown... Drug convict helped bust JFK plot A convicted drug dealer secretly fed information to federal investigators, playing a key role in exposing a terrorism plot against JFK airport. (June 4) &raquo; More AP video &raquo; Show all news video Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) World - AP Latin America &raquo; More News Feeds Elsewhere on the Web Missing word sees Gitmo charges dismissed European Protests as Bush Heads for G-8 Summit Diverse views on news from the right, left, and center Copyright &copy; 2007 The Associated Press. All rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of The Associated Press.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/topstories/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/nm/20070604/pl_nm/bush_dc Bush begins European trip, facing tense G8 summit - Yahoo! News Bush begins European trip, facing tense G8 summit 1 hour, 30 minutes ago began an eight-day trip to Europe on Monday with his popularity at home at a low point over the war and tensions abroad over global warming and missile defense. The centerpiece will be the Group of Eight summit in Germany, where Bush will hold a closely watched meeting with Russian President amid deteriorating U.S.-Russian ties. Tensions will also run high on climate change. German Chancellor Angela Merkel had hoped to forge an agreement on the issue at the summit, a goal put in doubt when Bush proposed a new strategy on global warming last week. "If you couple Bush&#39;s weak position at home with this unpopularity in much of Western Europe, Bush is probably not relishing this trip," said Charles Kupchan, director of Europe Studies at the Council on Foreign Relations. "Particularly on the question of climate change, he will find himself isolated." Bush made the Czech Republic his first stop. In picturesque Prague on Tuesday, he will address an international conference of human rights and democracy activists. Ahead of the G8 summit, Europeans gave a cool reception to Bush&#39;s plan to bring together the world&#39;s biggest polluting countries by year-end to explore ways of limiting emissions and agree on a long-term goal by the end of 2008. Some portrayed it as a defeat for Merkel, who wants the G8 to agree now on cutting emissions of greenhouse gases about 50 percent by 2050. , Bush&#39;s national security adviser, told reporters on the president&#39;s plane: "This is not about upstaging Angela Merkel. Quite the contrary ... it is an effort to identify a way forward." Kupchan said the general view in Europe was, "Let&#39;s be patient, November 2008 is coming," referring to the next U.S. presidential election, which will herald the end of Bush&#39;s term. The weeklong tour, with stops in the Czech Republic, Poland, Italy, Albania and Bulgaria, includes several firsts. Bush will meet new French President Nicolas Sarkozy in Germany and Putin has warned that Russia will go back to its Cold War stance of aiming missiles at Europe if Washington pursues its plan for a missile defense shield near Russia&#39;s borders. Hadley said Putin&#39;s comments were "not helpful" and the United States wanted a constructive dialogue. Putin sees the missile shield as a threat to Russia. Washington insists it is intended to protect against potential threats from states like In a preemptive move that could take some of the tension out of the session, Bush has invited Putin to his family&#39;s retreat in Maine next month for two days of talks. Hadley said that at the democracy conference on Tuesday, Bush would speak about the "challenge of promoting democracy" in countries such as Russia and China. U.S. officials have accused Putin of backsliding on reforms and have also pressed China for increased democratic freedoms. His visit to Albania comes amid U.S.-Russian disagreement over statehood for , which is majority ethnic Albanian. Washington backs a U.N. proposal for Kosovo independence under international supervision. Russia opposes it. Full Coverage: Bush Administration Bush opens Europe trip on jarring note AP, 35 minutes ago Bush begins European trip, facing tense G8 summit Reuters, 1 hour, 23 minutes ago White House follows new path to secrecy AP via Yahoo! News, Jun 01 Q&A: President Bush's climate goals at BBC, May 31 Bush shelters from Putin's rhetoric at Financial Times, Jun 04 Bush Goes to Europe in Wake of Putin' Threat at The New York Times (reg. req'd), Jun 04 at The New York Times (reg. req'd), Jun 04 Hang in there, America: Competent leadership is just 600-plus days away at McClatchy Newspapers, May 17 Rep. Jefferson indicted in bribery probe Bush opens Europe trip on jarring note Analysis: The 2008 authenticity race Romney clash over immigration Most Viewed - Politics Feds say La. congressman to be indicted Democratic congressman indicted in bribery probe Bush opens Europe trip on jarring note Robberies surge on violent crime survey U.S. cuts back climate checks from space minutes ago Bush heads to G8 Summit AP - 41 minutes ago The &#39;Internet War&#39;: Blogging From Iraq minutes ago Cold War Rhetoric: Building Missile Defenses minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. Refinance with Bad Credit Compare up to 4 free quotes. Serious refinance requests only. President Bush boards Air Force One at Andrews Air Force Base, Maryland, June 4, 2007.... President Plays Nice Before G-8 Initiatives by Bush in Sudan, the environment, AIDS relief anticipate the G-8. &raquo; More ABC News video &raquo; Show all news video Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) &raquo; More News Feeds Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Family ties at issue as Senate returns to immigration The Note: Meet The New John Edwards Poll: Opinions go against immigration measure SEND US YOUR PHOTOS! Following the presidential campaign? Submit pictures of candidates, supporters, and events to You Witness News. Featured IN YAHOO! NEWS Election coverage and analysis from Congressional Quarterly. &raquo; More from Congressional Quarterly People of the Web A gay blogger makes waves, and enemies, on Capitol Hill. All news on Chief Justice Roberts, Samuel Alito's nomination, and more. &raquo; All Court Coverage Yahoo! News Search Now Contains Blogs Find the latest posts about what's in the news. Copyright &copy; 2007 Reuters Limited. All rights reserved. Republication or redistribution of Reuters content is expressly prohibited without the prior written consent of Reuters. Reuters shall not be liable for any errors or delays in the content, or for any actions taken in
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_en_mo/people_mike_tyson Mike Tyson wants to do Bollywood movies - Yahoo! News Mike Tyson wants to do Bollywood movies MUMBAI, India - Mike Tyson wants to try something new &#151; acting in Bollywood movies. Tyson said the energy on the sets of a music video he recently shot for a new comedy got him thinking about trying to do more Bollywood work, The Times of India reported Monday. The former heavyweight boxing champion said in an interview that Firoz Nadiadwala, producer of "Fool n Final," had approached him with a script. "Firoz has discussed a movie with me," the newspaper quoted Tyson as saying. "We seriously intend to work toward it," he said, without disclosing any details. Tyson, 40, danced to Bollywood music at a two-day shoot in Las Vegas last month for a music video to promote "Fool n Final," about a diamond heist. "The atmosphere was very congenial, happy and energetic," the newspaper quoted Tyson as saying. Tyson plays himself in the music video, set for release later this month. He said Nadiadwala explained the concept of the music video to him earlier this year. "I was, anyway, in that phase when I didn't mind trying out something different," he said. "The script seemed very interesting, with lots of excitement thrown in." Tyson said there are similarities between acting and boxing. "In both the fields, in order to survive and triumph, you need focus and to be highly disciplined and determined," he said. A judge in Phoenix gave Tyson permission to travel to Las Vegas to shoot the music video. Tyson is facing charges of drug possession and driving under the influence of drugs for an arrest in Scottsdale last year. Tyson had been expected to travel to India this summer to film the dance sequence, but the scene was shot in Las Vegas due to security reasons, director Ahmed Khan has said. Seacrest a laughmaker in `Knocked Up' NBC's Silverman to keep name on ABC show Hilton completes first night in LA jail Appeals court hands broadcasters a win Spoleto festival to honor Menotti Hilton completes first night in LA jail NBC's Silverman to keep name on ABC show As `Sopranos' end nears, so does Tony's Seacrest a laughmaker in `Knocked Up' LEAKING FAUCETS ARE TORTURE FOR WIFE MARRIED TO BIG DRIP Web Extra: Paris Hilton Statue Gets Jail Suit WCCO Minneapolis - 46 minutes ago A Very Simple Life: Paris Hilton Checks Into Jail CBS 2 / KCAL 9 Los Angeles - 1 hour, 48 minutes ago Check out highlights from the MTV Movie Awards AP minutes ago Paris Hilton gets no respect from fellow celebs AP minutes ago Mike Tyson Career DVD Box Set Every Fighter Every Fight. Free Shipping worldwide. Lifetime Warranty. Order a Free Vacation Planning DVD. See All the Magic of Disney Parks. Mountain Dew® Transform Your Summer Transformers Movie Sweepstakes. Protect. Destroy. July 4, 2007. Former heavyweight boxing champion Mike Tyson spars during a training exhibition in Las Vegas in... Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) Movie News - AP &raquo; More News Feeds Elsewhere on the Web Living in a porn-driven, &#39;look-at-me&#39; culture Send Joel Siegel Your Movie Reviews and Watch to See If You Make the Cut! Oh, what a night for the first live MTV set Whitney Matheson blogs on showbiz. &raquo; Entertainment on USAToday PEOPLE OF THE WEB One-time child star Kirk Cameron goes online to save souls. Copyright &copy; 2007 The Associated Press. All rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of The Associated Press.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/topstories/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_re_la_am_ca/guantanamo_trials Yahoo! News ANDREW O. SELSKY, Associated Press Writer GUANTANAMO BAY NAVAL BASE, Cuba - A military judge dismissed terrorism-related charges Monday against a prisoner charged with killing an American soldier in , delivering a blow to the Bush administration's attempt to try Guantanamo detainees in military courts. The ruling raised questions about whether the U.S. would have to further revise procedures for prosecuting prisoners, leading to major delays. The chief of military defense attorneys at Guantanamo Bay argued that the ruling could spell the end of the war-crimes trial system set up last year by Congress and after the Supreme Court threw out the previous system. But a law professor said it appeared the judge left open the possibility of filing new charges. A military prosecutor said the ruling would be appealed, and the U.S. military entity responsible for holding the military trials said it believed Congress intended to grant jurisdiction to try suspected Taliban and al-Qaida members and supporters. Canadian detainee Omar Khadr, who was 15 when he was captured after a deadly firefight in Afghanistan and who is now 20, will remain at the remote U.S. military base along with some 380 other men suspected of links to al-Qaida and the Taliban. The judge, Army Col. Peter Brownback, said he had no choice but to throw out the Khadr case because he had been classified as an "enemy combatant" by a military panel years earlier &#151; and not as an "alien unlawful enemy combatant." The Military Commissions Act, signed by Bush last year, says only those classified as "unlawful" enemy combatants can face war trials here, Brownback noted during the arraignment in a hilltop courtroom. Later Monday, a lawyer representing the only other detainee charged with war crimes, Salim Ahmed Hamdan, asked another military judge to throw out that case, based on the Khadr ruling. The judge, Navy Capt. Keith Allred, called a recess before the prosecutor could make a statement. Marine Col. Dwight Sullivan, head of the Guantanamo defense attorneys, said the dismissal in the Khadr case would have "huge" impact because none of the detainees held at this isolated military base in southeast Cuba has been found to be an "unlawful" enemy combatant. "It is not just a technicality; it's the latest demonstration that this newest system just does not work," Sullivan told journalists. "It is a system of justice that does not comport with American values." Sullivan said that in order to reclassify the detainees as "unlawful" combatants, the whole review system would have to be overhauled, a time-consuming act. said the issue was little more than semantics. A spokesman said the system was not dealing with lawful combatants, who fight in uniform for a national army. It was set up to determine if a detainee acted as an "unlawful enemy combatant" who was not in an internationally recognized military, did not wear a uniform or rank insignia, did not carry arms openly and was not a party to the Geneva Conventions, he said. "It is our belief that the concept was implicit that all the Guantanamo detainees who were designated as `enemy combatants' ... were in fact unlawful," Navy Cmdr. Jeffrey Gordon told The Associated Press. Carl Tobias, a law professor at the University of Richmond, said that because Brownback dismissed the case without prejudice, the U.S. may be able to retry Khadr. He also said it is unclear whether all detainees would have to be reclassified. A military spokeswoman, Army Maj. Beth Kubala, said the prosecution had five days in which to file an appeal. But Sullivan said the court designated to hear any appeal &#151; known as the court of military commissions review &#151; doesn't even exist. Kubala told AP Television News that Brownback's ruling underscored the fairness of the system. "The military commissions procedures and rules are robust and grant significant rights to the accused," she said. The only other Guantanamo detainee currently charged with crimes is Hamdan, who is accused of chauffeuring and being the al-Qaida chief's bodyguard. The third detainee charged under the new system, Australian David Hicks, pleaded guilty in March to providing material support to al-Qaida and is serving a nine-month sentence in Australia. Brownback's ruling came just minutes into Khadr's arraignment on charges he committed murder in violation of the law of war, attempted murder in violation of the law of war, conspiracy, providing material support for terrorism and spying. Khadr allegedly killed a U.S. Army soldier with a grenade in the firefight, in which he was wounded. He appeared in the courtroom with a beard and wearing an olive-green prison uniform. "The charges are dismissed without prejudice," Brownback pronounced as he adjourned the proceeding. A prosecutor, Army Capt. Keith Petty, said he had been prepared to show Khadr was an unlawful combatant because he fought for al-Qaida, and videotapes showed Khadr making and planting explosives targeting American soldiers. Khadr seemed oblivious to the ruling. He calmly watched the judge throw out the case &#151; looking not at Brownback but at a computer screen at the defense table that showed a live TV broadcast of the proceedings. Khadr could see himself on the screen The U.S. military has hoped to accelerate its prosecutions of Guantanamo detainees, with the Pentagon saying it expects to eventually charge about 80 of the 380 prisoners held at this isolated base, but questions lingered about the legitimacy of the process. The Supreme Court, ruling in favor of a lawsuit brought by Hamdan, last June threw out a previous military tribunal system that was set up in the wake of the Sept. 11, 2001, attacks, calling it unconstitutional. Congress responded with new guidelines for war-crimes trials and Bush signed them into law. Hamdan's attorney, Navy Lt. Cmdr. Charles Swift, told The Associated Press that he will challenge the new system as unconstitutional. For example, the Military Commissions Act retroactively made certain acts, such as conspiracy a crime, Swift said. "This case raises significant questions" about the separation of powers, Swift said. "Congress cannot violate the Constitution to fix things ... but they are backdating anything and making it a crime." Hamdan is charged with conspiracy &#151; centered on his alleged membership in al-Qaida and purported role in plotting to attack civilians and civilian targets &#151; and with providing material support for terrorism. As part of the second charge, Hamdan is accused of transporting at least one SA-7 surface-to-air missile to shoot down U.S. and coalition military aircraft in Afghanistan in November 2001. The son of an alleged al-Qaida financier, Khadr is accused of killing U.S. Army Sgt. Christopher Speer with a grenade during a firefight in Afghanistan on July 27, 2002. Khadr's attorneys said he was a child soldier and should be rehabilitated, not imprisoned. "The U.S. will be the first country in modern history to try an individual who was a child at the time of the alleged war crimes," the attorneys said in a joint statement in April. Full Coverage: Guantanamo Detainees 25 minutes ago Judge&#39;s ruling may halt all Guantanamo trials Reuters, 31 minutes ago at The Guardian (UK)., Jun 04 at The Economist, Mar 30 Guantanamo Canadian case dropped at BBC, Jun 04 Detainee Found Dead in Guantnamo Cell at The New York Times (reg. req'd), May 31 at Boston Globe, May 03 Gitmo: still a 'legal black hole' at The Los Angeles Times (reg. req'd), May 01 Group claims captured troops were killed Group denies link to NYC terror plot Tiananmen Square survivors seek reform Putin attacks West ahead of G-8 summit Bramble and Sibierski join Wigan on free transfers Most Viewed - World Group claims captured troops were killed Would-be suicide bomber dies in Somalia Group denies link to NYC terror plot Pakistan&#39;s Musharraf tightens media regulations Russia warns U.S. about missile system Bush heads to G8 Summit AP - 41 minutes ago Chinese energy plan reject caps on greenhouse gases CBC.ca - 1 hour, 40 minutes ago Video claims missing U.S. soldiers are dead AP minutes ago Judge in Guantanamo drops charges against Khadr CBC.ca minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Vonage - Official Site Talk all you want for just $24.99 per month & get 1 month free. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. In this courtroom sketch reviewed and cleared for release by U.S. Military officials, Guantanamo detainee... Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) World - AP Latin America Al-Qaida & Osama bin Laden &raquo; More News Feeds Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Missing word sees Gitmo charges dismissed European Protests as Bush Heads for G-8 Summit Diverse views on news from the right, left, and center Copyright &copy; 2007 The Associated Press. All rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of The Associated Press.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/topstories/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/nm/20070604/ts_nm/usa_plot_trinidad_dc JFK airport plot suspects appear in Trinidad court - Yahoo! News JFK airport plot suspects appear in Trinidad court PM ET PORT OF SPAIN (Reuters) - Two suspects in a foiled plot to blow up New York&#39;s John F. Kennedy International Airport appeared in court in Trinidad and Tobago on Monday and were accused of conspiring to commit terrorism. Abdul Kadir, a citizen of Guyana and former member of its parliament, and Kareem Ibrahim, a citizen of Trinidad and Tobago, are among four suspects in the case, which has brought attention to a sun-drenched Caribbean region previously not associated with Islamic radicalism. They were led into a packed Port of Spain court in handcuffs at about 9:30 a.m. EDT (1330 GMT) for a brief initial appearance before Chief Magistrate Sherman McNichols. "They have been accused of an offense to commit a terrorist act under the laws of the United States," David West, an attorney representing the U.S. government, told the judge. Kadir and Ibrahim, bearded and clad in loose-fitting traditional Muslim clothing like many of the courtroom spectators, looked calm and kept mostly silent during the 20-minute hearing in which McNichols told them they faced possible extradition to the United States. Formal extradition proceedings won&#39;t take place until a hearing set by McNichols for August 2. There was no request for bail at Monday&#39;s hearing and Rajiv Persad, a lawyer for the defense, said he needed more time to prepare the case. A third suspect, Russell Defreitas, a U.S. citizen and native of Guyana, was arrested in New York. U.S. authorities said he was a former airport employee who conducted surveillance for the group, using his knowledge of the site to identify targets and escape routes. U.S. authorities have said Kadir and a fourth suspect, Abdel Nur of Guyana, who was believed to be at large in Trinidad, were associates of Jamaat al Muslimeen, a Muslim group behind a 1990 coup attempt in Trinidad, but did not have links to al Qaeda. Trinidadian Police Commissioner Trevor Paul was expected to provide an update Monday afternoon on the search for Nur. The group has not yet commented on the plot to blow up Kennedy airport&#39;s jet fuel tanks and part of the 40-mile (64-km) pipeline feeding them. This twin-island southern Caribbean nation of 1.3 million people is almost equally divided between descendants of African slaves and Indian laborers sent to the Caribbean by the British in the 19th century. Muslims comprise 6 percent to 8 percent of the population and most are descended from the Indian laborers but the small Jamaat sect is mostly made up of Islamists of African descent. In his brief remarks in court, Ibrahim acknowledged under questioning from McNichols that he was Winston Kingston before he took his Muslim name. He said he was also known as Amir Karim. Full Coverage: Terrorism & 9/11 23 minutes ago Group denies link to NYC terror plot AP, 26 minutes ago One Had Stature and One Didn't, but Neither Seemed an Extremist at The New York Times (reg. req'd), Jun 04 This terror plot was homegrown at Newsday, Jun 03 Hunt for fourth man in NY airport terror plot at The Guardian (UK)., Jun 04 The Christian Science Monitor via Yahoo! News, Jun 04 Terrorists, Chemicals and Trains at The New York Times (reg. req'd), Jun 04 Break up the FBI at The Los Angeles Times (reg. req'd), Mar 21 Group claims captured troops were killed Rep. Jefferson indicted in bribery probe Bush opens Europe trip on jarring note denies link to NYC terror plot Most Viewed: Top Stories Insurgent video shows IDs of missing soldiers Danish artist to paint Mont Blanc red Iraq Qaeda group says killed captured U.S. troops Taylor boycotts war crimes trial Judge&#39;s ruling may halt all Guantanamo trials Plane Crashes Into California Homes minutes ago The &#39;Internet War&#39;: Blogging From Iraq minutes ago Andrew Speaker&#39;s Parents and In-Laws AM ET When Good Baseball Managers Go Bad minutes ago Police Commissioner of New York City Raymond Kelly speaks about four people, who have been... Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) &raquo; More News Feeds Elsewhere on the Web Initial tests negative for lawyer with TB Poll: Bush Base Erodes on Immigration Debate Personal histories shape immigration views People of the Web A violent video puts a blogger behind bars. Kevin Sites in the Hot Zone An Afghan child bride gets help from Hot Zone readers. Copyright &copy; 2007 Reuters Limited. All rights reserved. Republication or redistribution of Reuters content is expressly prohibited without the prior written consent of Reuters. Reuters shall not be liable for any errors or delays in the content, or for any actions taken in
http://news.yahoo.com/s/nm/20070604/pl_nm/usa_crime_congressman_dc Democratic congressman indicted in bribery probe - Yahoo! News Democratic congressman indicted in bribery probe 1 hour, 15 minutes ago WASHINGTON (Reuters) - U.S. Democratic Rep. William Jefferson ( ) was indicted on Monday on 16 criminal counts for conspiring to solicit bribes and pay off a Nigerian official, with &#36;90,000 of an intended bribe found hidden in his home freezer wrapped in aluminum foil. The 94-page indictment also charges the Louisiana lawmaker with racketeering, soliciting bribes for himself and his family, fraud, money laundering, obstruction of justice, conspiracy and violating the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act. Jefferson, 63, a member of Congress since 1991 whose district includes New Orleans, faces a maximum of 235 years in prison if convicted. He has denied any wrongdoing. The investigation has centered on whether Jefferson used his position to promote the sale of telecommunications equipment and services offered by a Louisville-based firm to Nigeria, Ghana, and possibly other African nations in return for stock and cash payments. Jefferson won re-election to a ninth term in Congress in November, when voters shrugged off the federal bribery investigation. The indictment provided some new details about the lengthy probe, including commentary from a witness cooperating with the on July 30, 2005, who gave Jefferson &#36;100,000 in cash that was intended as a bribe to the unnamed Nigerian official. It said Jefferson put in his home freezer &#36;90,000 of the cash, which was separated in &#36;10,000 amounts, wrapped in aluminum foil and concealed inside various frozen food containers. Jefferson instructed the bribes to be funneled through companies controlled by staffers and relatives. "I&#39;m in the shadows behind the curtain somewhere," the indictment quoted him as saying. In November, Democrats won control of the U.S. Congress from Bush&#39;s Republicans, promising to end a "culture of corruption." Most of the scandals that have rocked Capitol Hill in recent years involved Republicans, many of them briberies tied to now-convicted lobbyist Jack Abramoff. Former Republican Rep. Bob Ney of Ohio pleaded guilty last year in the Abramoff scandal. In a separate case, former California Rep. Randy Cunningham pleaded guilty to bribery charges. Two former associates of Jefferson have pleaded guilty to bribery charges and have been cooperating in the investigation, which also included an unprecedented search by FBI agents of his congressional office last year. The indictment says the bribery conspiracy began in 2001. It said the purpose of the conspiracy was "to provide for the unjust enrichment of defendant Jefferson and his family members by corruptly seeking, soliciting and directing that things of value be paid to him and his family members in return for ... Jefferson&#39;s performance of official acts." Meredith McGehee, policy director for the Campaign Legal Center, an ethics watchdog group, said Jefferson&#39;s indictment should serve as a clarion call for Congress to follow through on its promise to "drain the swamp." (additional reporting by Thomas Ferraro and Andy Sullivan) Rep. Jefferson indicted in bribery probe Bush opens Europe trip on jarring note Analysis: The 2008 authenticity race Romney clash over immigration Most Viewed - Politics Feds say La. congressman to be indicted Bush opens Europe trip on jarring note Robberies surge on violent crime survey McCain, Romney clash over immigration U.S. cuts back climate checks from space minutes ago Bush heads to G8 Summit AP - 42 minutes ago The &#39;Internet War&#39;: Blogging From Iraq minutes ago Cold War Rhetoric: Building Missile Defenses minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Vonage - Official Site Talk all you want for just $24.99 per month & get 1 month free. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. Congressman William Jefferson (D-LA) speaks to reporters after arriving at Reagan National Airport in Washington,... Rep. William Jefferson Indicted Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Family ties at issue as Senate returns to immigration The Note: Meet The New John Edwards Poll: Opinions go against immigration measure SEND US YOUR PHOTOS! Following the presidential campaign? Submit pictures of candidates, supporters, and events to You Witness News. Featured IN YAHOO! NEWS Election coverage and analysis from Congressional Quarterly. &raquo; More from Congressional Quarterly People of the Web A gay blogger makes waves, and enemies, on Capitol Hill. All news on Chief Justice Roberts, Samuel Alito's nomination, and more. &raquo; All Court Coverage Yahoo! News Search Now Contains Blogs Find the latest posts about what's in the news. Copyright &copy; 2007 Reuters Limited. All rights reserved. Republication or redistribution of Reuters content is expressly prohibited without the prior written consent of Reuters. Reuters shall not be liable for any errors or delays in the content, or for any actions taken in
http://news.yahoo.com/s/afp/20070604/ts_afp/g8summitusbush Bush faces heat over climate change and Russia at G8 - Yahoo! News Bush faces heat over climate change and Russia at G8 PM ET WASHINGTON (AFP) - US left for Europe and the G8 summit on Monday, facing a growing rift with his Russian counterpart and searching questions over his new initiative on climate change. As well as the gathering of leaders of the Group of Eight industrialized nation in Germany, Bush has stops planned in the Czech Republic, Poland, Bulgaria and Italy. The summit has been partly overshadowed by an increasingly bitter row with Russia over US plans to deploy elements of a missile defence shield in Central Europe. Bush continues to call a "friend," despite the Russian president&#39;s harsh verbal attacks against US "imperialism" and warnings that Washington is instigating a fresh arms race. Putin stepped up the Cold War-style rhetoric on Sunday, threatening to point Russian missiles at European targets if the US expands its nuclear defences near its borders. In recent days, Bush has recognized disagreements with Moscow and raised questions about the state of democracy in Russia. But he repeated that "the Cold War is over," and the bilateral relationship was "firm" and based on "respect." Bush will hold bilateral talks on the sidelines of the G8 summit with Putin, as well as staunch ally, British Prime Minister , and new French President Nicolas Sarkozy. It will probably be the last encounter between Bush and Blair, who is about to leave office. But it will be the first meeting with Sarkozy since he succeeded Jacques Chirac, with whom Bush had a chilly relationship over France&#39;s opposition to the US-led invasion of Climate change will be high on the G8 agenda, and Bush&#39;s 11th-hour initiative unveiled last week looks set to raise the temperature on the debate over how best to keep the planet from overheating. His call for a "new framework" in which the world&#39;s biggest carbon polluters will set long-term goals for curbing greenhouse gases was especially unsettling for summit host German Chancellor Angela Merkel, who is seeking to forge a binding pact to cap world temperature rises. Both Merkel and Blair have given guarded welcomes to the Bush proposals as a significant shift in US policy, but made clear that they do not go far enough. Analysts point out that Bush is mindful of his legacy once he leaves office and has backtracked on some issues during recent months in a bid to accommodate his international partners. They also point to a White House desire to show that the president still has a major global role to play through the end of his term in January 2009. Bush and Putin are scheduled to follow up their G8 talks with a meeting next month at the Bush family residence in Kennebunkport, Maine, where the president is again expected to underline the US argument that extending the missile defense shield to Europe poses no threat to Russia. But political analyst Simon Serfaty said Bush&#39;s pre-G8 stopovers in the Czech Republic and Poland -- which would play host to the extended missile system -- made Washington&#39;s default position very clear. "The message is that we&#39;re going to do what we&#39;re going to do," Serfaty said. The missile defense plan as well as US attempts to enlarge have also caused alarm among some European states, including Germany, which are reluctant to infuriate the Russians. In this respect, Serfaty underscored the importance of personal relationships in the international arena. Bush emphasizes his friendly ties with Merkel, whereas his relations with her predecessor, , were strained because of the war in Iraq. But a more flexible attitude will unlikely be enough to win Bush a more positive reception abroad in the court of public opinion. Bush remembers the violence that accompanied the summit in Italy in 2001 and expects new ones. But he said he welcomed "going to a society where people are free to speak." Group claims captured troops were killed Rep. Jefferson indicted in bribery probe Bush opens Europe trip on jarring note denies link to NYC terror plot Most Viewed: Top Stories Insurgent video shows IDs of missing soldiers JFK airport plot suspects appear in Trinidad court Danish artist to paint Mont Blanc red Iraq Qaeda group says killed captured U.S. troops Taylor boycotts war crimes trial Plane Crashes Into California Homes minutes ago The &#39;Internet War&#39;: Blogging From Iraq minutes ago Andrew Speaker&#39;s Parents and In-Laws AM ET When Good Baseball Managers Go Bad minutes ago US and First Lady Laura Bush wave while boarding Air Force... Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) &raquo; More News Feeds Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Initial tests negative for lawyer with TB Poll: Bush Base Erodes on Immigration Debate The Christian Science Monitor In nouveau riche India, even the poor show off People of the Web A violent video puts a blogger behind bars. Kevin Sites in the Hot Zone An Afghan child bride gets help from Hot Zone readers. . All rights reserved. The information contained in the AFP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of Agence France Presse.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/topstories/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/nm/20070604/ts_nm/guantanamo_tribunals_khadr_dc Judge&#39;s ruling may halt all Guantanamo trials - Yahoo! News Judge&#39;s ruling may halt all Guantanamo trials GUANTANAMO BAY U.S. NAVAL BASE, Cuba (Reuters) - The U.S. war crimes tribunals at Guantanamo came to a screeching halt on Monday when a military judge dropped all the charges against a young Canadian in a ruling that could preclude trying any of the 380 prisoners. Army Col. Peter Brownback, the judge, said the military tribunal lacked jurisdiction over Canadian Omar Khadr because he did not meet the definition of those subject to trial under a law the U.S. Congress drafted last year. "It&#39;s not a technicality. It&#39;s another demonstration that the system simply doesn&#39;t work," said the tribunal&#39;s chief defense counsel, Marine Col. Dwight Sullivan. "Fundamentally it is a system of justice that does not comport with American values." The judge said a military review board had labeled Khadr an "enemy combatant" during a 2004 hearing in Guantanamo. But the Military Commissions Act adopted by the U.S. Congress in 2006 said only "unlawful enemy combatants" could be tried in the Guantanamo tribunals. Brownback said Khadr did not meet that strict definition because there had been no formal proceeding designating him as unlawful. Because none of the 380 foreign captives held at Guantanamo have been designated in that way, lawyers said they could not be tried unless they first faced proceedings reclassifying them as unlawful enemy combatants. Brownback dismissed the charges against Khadr, but left open the possibility that charges could be re-filed if Khadr went back before a review board and was formally reclassified. This was the latest setback for the Bush government&#39;s efforts to put the Guantanamo detainees through some form of judicial process. It was forced to rewrite the rules last year after the deemed the old tribunals illegal. Khadr, who was captured in a firefight in at age 15, was accused of killing a U.S. soldier with a grenade and wounding another in a battle at a suspected al Qaeda compound in Afghanistan in 2002. He was also charged with conspiracy and providing material support for terrorism along with murder, attempted murder and spying, for allegedly conducting surveillance of U.S. military convoys in Afghanistan. Khadr, now 20 and said by his family to be in poor health, wore a tan prison uniform and a shaggy beard during the brief hearing and showed no reaction to the surprise ruling. Khadr&#39;s sister, Zaynab Khadr, told CBC television in Canada, the ruling was surprising. "Nobody expected it .... I hope my brother can come home." HALT TO TRIALS URGED One of the prosecutors, Army Capt. Keith Petty, said Khadr clearly met the definition of an unlawful combatant because he fought for al Qaeda, which was not part of the regular, uniformed armed forces of any nation. He said he was prepared to produce a video of Khadr wearing civilian clothes while planting a roadside bomb, as evidence he was an unlawful combatant. But Brownback said the 2006 law authorizing the tribunals barred him from proceeding unless Khadr was formally declared to be unlawful. Congress wrote the law after the U.S. Supreme Court struck down an earlier version of the tribunals established by to try terrorism suspects at Guantanamo. Brownback gave prosecutors 72 hours to appeal his ruling, but the appeals court authorized under the 2006 law has not been set up and it was unlikely it could be created that quickly. Sullivan said that rather than putting the 380 prisoners through another review to change their status, the United States should scrap the military tribunals and move the trials to the regular U.S. federal courts, he said. "We don&#39;t need any more evidence that it&#39;s a failure," Sullivan said. "This system should just stop." Another prisoner, Salim Ahmed Hamdan of Yemin, was scheduled to appear before a different military judge on Monday for arraignment on charges of conspiracy and providing material support for terrorism. That judge was expected to drop the charges against Hamdan, who is accused of driving and acting as his bodyguard. Group claims captured troops were killed Rep. Jefferson indicted in bribery probe Bush opens Europe trip on jarring note denies link to NYC terror plot Most Viewed: Top Stories Insurgent video shows IDs of missing soldiers JFK airport plot suspects appear in Trinidad court Danish artist to paint Mont Blanc red Iraq Qaeda group says killed captured U.S. troops Taylor boycotts war crimes trial Plane Crashes Into California Homes minutes ago The &#39;Internet War&#39;: Blogging From Iraq minutes ago Andrew Speaker&#39;s Parents and In-Laws AM ET When Good Baseball Managers Go Bad minutes ago Undated family photo of Omar Khadr who is being detained by United States forces at... Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Initial tests negative for lawyer with TB Poll: Bush Base Erodes on Immigration Debate Personal histories shape immigration views People of the Web A violent video puts a blogger behind bars. Kevin Sites in the Hot Zone An Afghan child bride gets help from Hot Zone readers. Copyright &copy; 2007 Reuters Limited. All rights reserved. Republication or redistribution of Reuters content is expressly prohibited without the prior written consent of Reuters. Reuters shall not be liable for any errors or delays in the content, or for any actions taken in
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_bi_st_ma_re/wall_street Stocks eke out gain despite China drop - Yahoo! News Stocks eke out gain despite China drop By JOE BEL BRUNO, AP Business Writer NEW YORK - Wall Street recovered from a mostly down session Monday, eking out a gain as investors brushed off another slide in Chinese stocks. The market had little in the way of corporate or economic news to give it direction, but while it was in negative territory for much of the day, in the end it shook off an 8.3 percent slide in the benchmark Shanghai Composite Index. The Chinese index had its biggest one-day drop since the Feb. 27 plunge that set off a brief global market selloff as the Chinese government attempts to cool the country's market boom. Investors used Monday to adjust positions after both the Standard & Poor's 500 index and Dow Jones industrial average surged to record closes in the previous session. The market was encouraged by economic data released last week that suggested the economy was slowing, but not too quickly, and inflation remained in check. reported Monday that orders to U.S. factories were weaker than expected in April. Investors might find some information to trade with the release of the Institute of Supply Management's service sector index on Tuesday, but not much other information is expected. "I think you're seeing a combination of investors wanting to take some profit on a Monday morning, and some fear because of what happened in China," said Ryan Detrick, a senior technical strategist for Schaffer's Investment Research. "There's really no major drivers in the market, so we're really just meandering along." According to preliminary calculations, the Dow rose 8.21, or 0.06 percent, to 13,676.32. Broader stock indicators also narrowly mixed. The S&P 500 index rose 2.84, or 0.18 percent, to 1,539.18, and the Nasdaq composite index rose 4.37, or 0.17 percent, to 2,618.29. The Dow and S&P again snagged record closes Monday, and the S&P moved closer to its trading high of 1,552.87, set in March 2000. Last week, the Dow posted a 1.19 percent gain; the S&P 500 index rose 1.36 percent; and the Nasdaq composite index added 2.22 percent. The bond market moved higher, with the yield on the 10-year Treasury falling to 4.93 percent from 4.96 percent late Friday. The Commerce Department report had some impact on the bond market on hopes weaker data will mean an interest rate cut this year. The report showed 0.3 percent in manufacturing growth in April, and economists expected a rise of 0.7 percent after a 3.1 percent jump in March. The dollar slipped against other major currencies, while gold prices rose. Oil prices rose after a Nigerian militant group announced a one-month cease-fire, and a U.S. gasoline pipeline was restarted. A barrel of light sweet crude rose $1.13 to $66.21 a barrel on the New York Mercantile Exchange. The dollar was mixed against other major currencies, while gold slipped. Michael Sheldon, chief market strategist at Spencer Clarke, said the near term will be dominated by higher energy prices and bond yields &#151; two catalysts that could cause the equities market to pull back. He believes there's complacency among investors, and that the market will need a correction before resuming an advance later in the summer. "As investors look ahead, we're past the earnings season, the Fed seems to be out of the way for the moment, and we've had a run-up in equities prices over the past few months," he said, referring to the 's current policy of stable interest rates. "Given continued uncertainty in the housing sector, and rising energy and food prices, it appears likely to us that we should have a period of consolidation or profit taking before the market turns higher again." In corporate news, dealmaking activity continued this week. Smartphone maker Palm Inc. said Monday it got $325 million from private equity firm Elevation Partners and announced a shakeup on its board. Palm spiked $1.48, or 9.2 percent, to $17.57. Publisher Dow Jones & Co. fell $1.04 to $60.16 as the owner of The Wall Street Journal met with Rupert Murdoch about the possibility of an acquisition. Murdoch's News Corp. has offered $5 billion for the company. Oil and natural gas producer Anadarko Petroleum Corp. said late Sunday it is selling natural gas gathering systems and associated processing plants to Atlas Pipeline Partners LP for $1.85 billion. Anadarko rose $2.30, or 4.6 percent, to $51.95; Atlas shares rose $8.14, or 22.9 percent, to $39.56. Solectron Corp. rose 51 cents, or 15.2 percent, to $3.88 after rival Flextronics International Ltd. said it would by the contract electronics maker for about $3.6 billion in cash and stock. Flextronics fell 16 cents at $11.54. Apple Inc.'s highly anticipated iPhone will be available June 29, according to both TV commercials broadcast Sunday night and a company spokesman. Shares of the technology company rose $2.93, or 2.5 percent, to $121.33. And Wal-Mart Stores Inc. rose $1.74, or 3.5 percent, to $51.21 after being upgraded by analysts at Wachovia Corp. and JPMorgan Chase & Co. Advancing issues outnumbered decliners by about 4 to 3 on the New York Stock Exchange New York Stock Exchange , where volume came to 1.34 billion shares, compared to 1.48 billion on Friday. The Russell 2000 index of smaller companies was up 1.68, or 0.20 percent, at 855.09. Overseas, Japan's Nikkei stock average closed up 0.08 percent. At the close, Britain's FTSE 100 was down 0.19 percent, Germany's DAX index dropped 0.14 percent, and France's CAC-40 shed 0.69 percent. New York Stock Exchange: Factory orders post weak advance Palm sells 25 percent stake Krispy Kreme widens 1Q losses Hyundai grabs lead in auto quality study Interest rates down at Treasury auction Most Viewed - Business Ex-Enron executive sentenced to 2 years in prison 'Piggybacking' roils credit industry Oil at $70 as cyclone nears Mideast Gulf Krispy Kreme widens 1Q losses Loews bets on natural gas in $4 billion Dominion deal Middle-class America in peril CNN - PM ET Life after work: Sharing a legacy CNN - Fri Jun 1, 8:06 PM ET Save Money on Airfare! Jun 1, 7:38 PM ET May: a Great Month for Jobs Jun 1, 6:03 PM ET Make Money in Growth Stocks. We have a Winner for You. Chase® Home Equity Loan Low rates. No closing costs. No app fee. No annual fees. Apply online. Online Currency Trading - Free Demo 24-Hour trading, award-winning software, charts and more from GFT. A stock broker monitors prices before the start of trading at the New York Stock... Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) &raquo; More News Feeds Get an alert when there are new stories about: New York Stock Exchange Elsewhere on the Web Spotlight on cancer: Drugs, new studies China Goes Decadent With &#39;Millionaire Fair&#39; Dow Jones owners seen on the defensive Investors get nervous in China, and Murdoch makes nice. &raquo; Read Today's Column Get advice on how to manage the outcome of your income. &raquo; More from Yahoo! Finance Get the latest news, features and photos. Copyright &copy; 2007 The Associated Press. All rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of The Associated Press.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/topstories/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_go_co/congressman_probe Rep. Jefferson indicted in bribery probe - Yahoo! News Rep. Jefferson indicted in bribery probe By LARA JAKES JORDAN, Associated Press Writer WASHINGTON - Rep. William Jefferson ( ), D-La., was indicted Monday on federal charges of racketeering, money-laundering and soliciting more than $400,000 in bribes in connection with years of trying to broker business deals in Africa. The charges came almost two years after investigators raided Jefferson's home in Washington and found $90,000 in cash stuffed in a box in his freezer. The indictment in federal court in Alexandria, Va., lists 16 alleged violations with prison terms totaling as much as 235 years. Jefferson is charged with racketeering, soliciting bribes, wire fraud, money laundering, obstruction of justice and conspiracy. He is the first sitting congressman to face charges under the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act, which prohibits corporate bribery overseas. Jefferson is to be arraigned Friday in U.S. District Court in Alexandria. Jefferson is accused of soliciting bribes from 11 different companies for himself and his family, and also of bribing a Nigerian official. The scheme was complicated and Jefferson set up a front company to hide the money, prosecutors said. "But the essence of the charges are really very simple: Mr. Jefferson corruptly traded on his good office and on the Congress," said Chuck Rosenberg, the U.S. attorney for eastern Virginia. The 60-year-old Jefferson, whose Louisiana district includes New Orleans, has said little about the case publicly but has maintained his innocence. He was re-elected last year despite the investigation. Joseph Persichini, who leads 's Washington field office, called on the public to "take the time, read this charging document line by line, scheme by scheme, count by count. This case is about greed, power and arrogance." Jefferson, in New Orleans on Monday, could not immediately be reached for comment. His lawyer was planning an afternoon news conference. House Speaker Nancy Pelosi ( ) is expected to push this week for Jefferson to be stripped of his seat on the Small Business Committee, according to a leadership aide who spoke on condition of anonymity because the decision had not yet been announced. "If these charges are proven true, they constitute an egregious and unacceptable abuse of public trust and power," said Pelosi, D-Calif. "Democrats are committed to upholding a high ethical standard and eliminating corruption and unethical behavior from the Congress." House Republican Leader John Boehner ( ) of Ohio said Jefferson should be expelled from Congress if he is found guilty and refuses to resign. "The American people rightfully expect the highest ethical standards from their elected leaders," Boehner said. Two of Jefferson's associates have struck plea bargains with prosecutors and have been sentenced. Brett Pfeffer, a former congressional aide, admitted soliciting bribes on Jefferson's behalf and was sentenced to eight years in prison. Another Jefferson associate, Louisville, Ky., telecommunications executive Vernon Jackson, pleaded guilty to paying between $400,000 and $1 million in bribes to Jefferson in exchange for his assistance securing business deals in Nigeria and other African nations. Jackson was sentenced to more than seven years in prison. Both Pfeffer and Jackson agreed to cooperate in the case against Jefferson. The impact of the case has stretched across continents and even roiled presidential politics in Nigeria. According to court records, Jefferson told associates he needed cash to pay bribes to the country's vice president, Atiku Abubakar. Abubakar denied the allegations, which figured prominently in that country's presidential elections in April. He ran for the presidency and finished third. The indictment does not name Abubakar. But it describes Jefferson's dealings with an unnamed "Nigerian Official A" who was a high-ranking official in Nigeria's executive branch who had a spouse in Potomac, Md. One of Abubakar's wives lived in that Washington suburb. Rosenberg would not confirm that person was Abubakar. In Lagos, Nigeria, Abubakar spokesman Garba Shehu said the former vice president "has always denied wrongdoing in the matter." "He has only had official interaction with the congressman, who the vice president felt deserved a hearing because he was a ranking member of the U.S. Congress," Shehu said. "The vice president was in no way cited in this thing, so we feel vindicated." Court records indicate Jefferson was videotaped taking a $100,000 cash bribe from an FBI informant. Most of that money later turned up in the freezer in Jefferson's home. In May 2006, the FBI raided Jefferson's congressional office, the first such raid on a congressman's Capitol office. That move sparked a constitutional debate over whether the executive branch stepped over a boundary. The raid's legality is still being argued on appeal. House leaders objected to the search, saying it was an unconstitutional intrusion on the lawmaking process. The FBI said the raid was necessary because Jefferson and his legal team had failed to respond to requests for documents. Some but not all the documents seized in the raid have been turned over Justice Department prosecutors. Assistant Attorney General Alice Fisher said the documents helped being the case against Jefferson. "Some of those documents that we were able to obtain through the process have indeed supported the charges that are presented today," Fisher said. Associated Press writers Cain Burdeau in New Orleans, Matthew Barakat in McLean, Va., and Edward Harris in Lagos, Nigeria, contributed to this report. Full Coverage: U.S. Congress Members of Congress charged with crimes AP, 3 minutes ago Wyoming senator in serious condition AP, 6 minutes ago Congress' vote on Iraq war is only a prelude to a longer struggle at The Los Angeles Times (reg. req'd), Apr 30 Liberal lawmakers may sway key vote on Iraq war at The Los Angeles Times (reg. req'd), Mar 15 House GOP Uses Procedural Tactic To Frustrate Democratic Majority at The Washington Post (reg. req'd), May 19 GOP Crowd Forming for Shot at Freshman Walz in Minnesota 1 CQPolitics.com via Yahoo! News, May 09 at The Washington Post (reg. req'd), May 21 Beyond the Bush veto at Boston Globe, May 01 Bush opens Europe trip on jarring note Analysis: The 2008 authenticity race Romney clash over immigration U.S. cuts back climate checks from space Most Viewed - Politics Feds say La. congressman to be indicted Democratic congressman indicted in bribery probe Bush opens Europe trip on jarring note Robberies surge on violent crime survey McCain, Romney clash over immigration minutes ago Bush heads to G8 Summit AP - 42 minutes ago The &#39;Internet War&#39;: Blogging From Iraq minutes ago Cold War Rhetoric: Building Missile Defenses minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Vonage - Official Site Talk all you want for just $24.99 per month & get 1 month free. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. Rep. William Jefferson, D-La., makes a statement upon his arrival at Washington's National Airport in... Rep. William Jefferson Indicted Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) U.S. Government - AP &raquo; More News Feeds Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Family ties at issue as Senate returns to immigration The Note: Meet The New John Edwards Poll: Opinions go against immigration measure SEND US YOUR PHOTOS! Following the presidential campaign? Submit pictures of candidates, supporters, and events to You Witness News. Featured IN YAHOO! NEWS Election coverage and analysis from Congressional Quarterly. &raquo; More from Congressional Quarterly People of the Web A gay blogger makes waves, and enemies, on Capitol Hill. All news on Chief Justice Roberts, Samuel Alito's nomination, and more. &raquo; All Court Coverage Yahoo! News Search Now Contains Blogs Find the latest posts about what's in the news. Copyright &copy; 2007 The Associated Press. All rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of The Associated Press.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/topstories/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_re_mi_ea/missing_soldiers_video Group claims captured troops were killed - Yahoo! News Group claims captured troops were killed By ANNA JOHNSON, Associated Press Writer CAIRO, Egypt - Al-Qaida linked insurgents killed three American soldiers after capturing them last month in , according to a militant video released Monday that claimed to show footage of the ambush. The video offered no proof for its claims. The clip, which was made available to The Associated Press by the Washington-based SITE Institute, showed confused and jerky night battle scenes, and later offered close-ups of two identification cards. It did not show the soldiers. "The Americans sent 4,000 soldiers looking for them," said an unidentified voice on the video, which featured the logo of the media production house of the Islamic State of Iraq. "They were alive and then dead." The body of one of the soldiers was found in Iraq's Euphrates River, but the other two remain missing. Family friends of the missing men said the U.S. military briefed relatives about the video over the weekend. The U.S. military insisted the search for the two missing soldiers would continue. "We condemn the tactics used by these terrorists, and are using all means available to pursue those responsible," said Brig. Gen. Kevin Bergner, the chief military spokesman in Baghdad. "We continue to search and hope that our two missing soldiers will be found alive and in good health. " The video offered no proof for its claims that the soldiers had been killed and buried. The voiceover blamed their deaths on "the American Army and their leaders, who do not care for the feelings of the soldiers' mothers." "And as you refused to deliver the bodies of our killed people, we will not deliver the bodies of your dead, and their end will be beneath the ground, Allah willing," the voice said. A body found May 23 in the Euphrates River was identified by the U.S. military as Pfc. Joseph Anzack Jr., 20, of Torrance, Calif. The missing soldiers have been identified as Spc. Alex R. Jimenez, 25, of Lawrence, Mass., and of Pvt. Byron W. Fouty, 19, of Waterford, Mich. The three vanished after their combat team was ambushed May 12 about 20 miles outside Baghdad. Five others, including an Iraqi, were killed in the ambush, subsequently claimed by al-Qaida. The attack triggered a massive search in the area south of Baghdad known as the "triangle of death" for the rampant insurgent activity there. Gordon Dibler, Fouty's stepfather, said he was holding out hope for the soldiers' safe return: "We're praying, and so far, we don't know for certain that they aren't alive." At the end of the 10-minute 41-second video, the identification cards of the two missing soldiers were shown, with the headline: "Bush is the reason of the loss of your POWs" written on the screen above the cards. SITE, an organization that monitors terrorist groups, did not say how it obtained the video. A card belonging to Anzack was not shown. Along with the identification cards, the footage also showed credit cards, American and Iraqi money and other personal items the militants called "booty." Bergner, the U.S. spokesman, said the footage "doesn't appear to contain any definitive evidence indicating the status of our missing soldiers." The video also showed footage, apparently taken before the ambush, of three masked men standing around a stand displaying a sketch of the area, mapping out the attack plan. One of the three men, who were all dressed in black, talked to the camera and pointed to the sketch. Another stood by him carrying a gun. "I have urged you to bring me American prisoners," said the man, whose name was not given but was identified as one of the militant group's leaders. A Islamic Web site that commonly posts videos from militant groups including the Islamic State of Iraq said in a banner headline that it would show the video within hours, but the video has not yet appeared. After the soldiers disappeared, the Islamic State of Iraq issued Web statements warning the Americans to call off the hunt "if you want their safety." Associated Press writer David N. Goodman contributed to this report from Detroit. Full Coverage: U.S. Armed Forces China&#39;s military must be more transparent: Pace AFP, AM ET US military analysis says troop &#39;surge&#39; in Iraq short of goal AFP, AM ET Lessons from the Great War at The Chicago Tribune (reg. req'd), May 28 Another Memorial Day Marks Grief's Journey at The Washington Post (reg. req'd), May 28 2 Marines Deny Suspecting Haditha War Crime at The New York Times (reg. req'd), May 31 Record Turnout Marks Rolling Thunder Ride's 20th Anniversary at The Washington Post (reg. req'd), May 28 Memorial Day is a chance to reflect Blame politicians, not those fighting at L.A. Daily News, May 28 denies link to NYC terror plot Tiananmen Square survivors seek reform Putin attacks West ahead of G-8 summit Bramble and Sibierski join Wigan on free transfers Most Viewed - World Would-be suicide bomber dies in Somalia denies link to NYC terror plot Pakistan&#39;s Musharraf tightens media regulations Russia warns U.S. about missile system Bush heads to G8 Summit AP - 42 minutes ago Chinese energy plan reject caps on greenhouse gases CBC.ca - 1 hour, 40 minutes ago Video claims missing U.S. soldiers are dead AP minutes ago Judge in Guantanamo drops charges against Khadr CBC.ca minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. Refinance with Bad Credit Compare up to 4 free quotes. Serious refinance requests only. This is an image made from video obtained by the Washington-based SITE Institute showing the... Video claims missing U.S. soldiers are dead A new militant video claims that three U.S. soldiers captured after an ambush are dead; one soldier&#39;s body has been found, but the U.S. military says it will continue to search for the two others. (June 4) &raquo; More AP video Soldiers&#39; ID cards online The military ID cards of two soldiers missing in Iraq have appeared on an Islamic web site. CNN&#39;s Barbara Starr reports. &raquo; More CNN video &raquo; Show all news video Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) Middle East News - AP &raquo; More News Feeds Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Missing word sees Gitmo charges dismissed European Protests as Bush Heads for G-8 Summit Diverse views on news from the right, left, and center Copyright &copy; 2007 The Associated Press. All rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of The Associated Press.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/topstories/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/nm/20070604/ts_nm/iraq_dc Top general says too early to judge Iraq plan - Yahoo! News Top general says too early to judge Iraq plan PM ET CAMP ANACONDA, Iraq (Reuters) - The U.S. commander in , General David Petraeus, said on Monday it was too early to judge whether a Baghdad security crackdown was successful because the last of five extra brigades had yet to be deployed. Earlier, U.S. military spokesman Lieutenant-Colonel Christopher Garver said U.S. and Iraqi troops controlled only about a third of the Iraqi capital. U.S. troops are dying at rates not seen for more than two years, almost four months after Washington began to send thousands more troops to Iraq in a last-ditch attempt to drag the country back from the brink of all-out sectarian civil war. "You have not even seen the start of real operations," Petraeus told reporters on the sidelines of a medal ceremony at a U.S. air base near Balad, 80 km (50 miles) north of Baghdad. A military spokesman said earlier an extra 18,000 U.S. troops, and many more Iraqi soldiers and police, had already been deployed since the start of the crackdown in the Iraqi capital in mid-February. "The surge has not truly reached the full number on the ground. We still have an additional brigade just coming into Iraq," said Petraeus. He and the U.S. ambassador to Iraq, Ryan Crocker, are due to give a progress report to in September that Petraeus promised would be a "forthright snapshot" that would include their thoughts on various options. "We would not be doing this if we did not think this was doable. This is a doable mission," said Petraeus. Bush won a bruising battle with a Democrat-controlled Congress for war funding but is under growing pressure, including from within his own Republican Party, to show progress in the unpopular war or start bringing troops home. The crackdown in Baghdad and other areas is designed to buy time for Prime Minister Nuri al-Maliki&#39;s government to meet a set of political targets set by Washington aimed at promoting national reconciliation. The benchmarks, including a revenue-sharing oil law and constitutional reform, are meant to draw minority Sunni Arabs, dominant under , away from the insurgency and back into the political process alongside the majority Shi&#39;ites. The New York Times reported on Monday that according to an internal military assessment and local commanders, U.S. and Iraqi troops "maintain physical influence over" 146 of Baghdad&#39;s 457 neighborhoods, with resistance still met in the other 311. With Sunni al Qaeda militants and the insurgents trying to derail the crackdown and wreck political progress, Bush and military leaders have warned that bloody months lie ahead. "It&#39;s going to get harder before it gets easier," Garver said. "We know it&#39;s going to be a tough fight over the summer." Casualty figures bear out that assessment, with June already showing similar rates to May. Seventeen U.S. soldiers were killed in the first three days of June. May, when 127 were killed, was the third worst month for U.S. troops since the invasion to topple Saddam in March 2003. The worst months were November 2004 when 137 were killed and April the same year when 135 died. "It is happening because we are going into areas where the enemy has sanctuaries," said Petraeus. "The enemy is not going to allow us to do that without a fight. They certainly are trying to ramp up their activities." Garver said thousands more troops were moving out of bases into command outposts, known as joint security stations, leaving them more exposed to attack in the short term. Tens of thousands of Iraqis have been killed in the same period. While there was a significant reduction in the number of targeted sectarian killings early on in the security crackdown, those numbers have risen again, with dozens of bodies being found in Baghdad almost every day. "We got that number down and it just came back up. We are trying to push it down," said Petraeus. (Additional reporting by Paul Tait in Baghdad) Three missing US troops all killed: Iraq insurgents AFP, 47 minutes ago Iraq Qaeda group says killed captured U.S. troops Reuters, 48 minutes ago A teen's flight from Iraq at Christian Science Monitor, Jun 04 America's Iraq strategy boosts US combat losses The Christian Science Monitor via Yahoo! News, Jun 01 Missing US soldiers' IDs on video at BBC, Jun 04 Commanders Say Push in Baghdad Is Short of Goal at The New York Times (reg. req'd), Jun 04 The Hard Truth About Leaving Iraq RealClearPolitics via Yahoo! News, May 30 Looking back, the Iraq Study Group report is even worse than we thought at The Daily Star (Lebanon), May 23 Group claims captured troops were killed Rep. Jefferson indicted in bribery probe Bush opens Europe trip on jarring note denies link to NYC terror plot Most Viewed: Top Stories Insurgent video shows IDs of missing soldiers JFK airport plot suspects appear in Trinidad court Danish artist to paint Mont Blanc red Iraq Qaeda group says killed captured U.S. troops Taylor boycotts war crimes trial Plane Crashes Into California Homes minutes ago The &#39;Internet War&#39;: Blogging From Iraq minutes ago Andrew Speaker&#39;s Parents and In-Laws AM ET When Good Baseball Managers Go Bad minutes ago An Iraqi soldier directs traffic while a fellow soldiers checks a vehicle at a checkpoint... Iraqi Army Not Ready Until 2008 Iraqi president says U.S. troops need to help until the end of next year. &raquo; More ABC News video 15 U.S. soldiers die in Iraq in 3 days No let-up yet in the soaring U-S death toll in Iraq as the military reports 15 more soldiers killed over the past three days. The deaths follow the third most costly months for U-S troops since the war began. (June 3) &raquo; More AP video &raquo; Show all news video Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) &raquo; More News Feeds Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Initial tests negative for lawyer with TB Poll: Bush Base Erodes on Immigration Debate Personal histories shape immigration views People of the Web A violent video puts a blogger behind bars. Kevin Sites in the Hot Zone An Afghan child bride gets help from Hot Zone readers. Copyright &copy; 2007 Reuters Limited. All rights reserved. Republication or redistribution of Reuters content is expressly prohibited without the prior written consent of Reuters. Reuters shall not be liable for any errors or delays in the content, or for any actions taken in
http://news.yahoo.com/s/nm/20070604/ts_nm/iraq_qaeda_video_dc Iraq Qaeda group says killed captured U.S. troops - Yahoo! News Iraq Qaeda group says killed captured U.S. troops DUBAI (Reuters) - An al Qaeda-led group in signaled in a Web video on Monday that it had killed three U.S. soldiers after capturing them last month, showing only pictures of ID cards of two missing U.S. soldiers. "Fearing the occupying army will continue its searches, harming our Muslim brothers ... (the Islamic State in Iraq) decided to settle the matter and announced the news of their killing to cause bitterness to God&#39;s enemies," said a speaker on the video. "The three soldiers were captives, then dead bodies." The 10-minute video carried a picture of the U.S. Army identification cards of Byron Fouty and Alex Jimenez, with the caption: "(President George W.) Bush is the cause of the loss of your captives." The video, posted on Web sites often used by al Qaeda and other Islamists, did not provide clear evidence that the two were dead. In Baghdad, the U.S. military said it was studying the video. "We are further analyzing the video, however it doesn&#39;t appear to contain any definitive evidence indicating the status of our missing soldiers," Brigadier General Kevin Bergner said in a statement. The U.S. military has carried out an intensive search and found the body of one of the three U.S. soldiers missing after an attack south of Baghdad last month. "As you refuse to hand over the bodies of our killed, we shall not deliver the bodies of your dead," the off-camera speaker said on the video which also showed credit cards and what it said were other belongings of the two soldiers. The U.S. military has said it believed the three had been taken by al Qaeda or others associated with the militant group, after the Islamic State in Iraq group said it was holding the soldiers. The video also showed a group of masked insurgents planning an attack and shaky night footage of what it said was the raid on a U.S. patrol which led to the capture of the three. The insurgent group, formed last year by al Qaeda&#39;s wing in Iraq and several smaller Sunni insurgent groups, has claimed responsibility for mass kidnappings and a series of major attacks. Group claims captured troops were killed Rep. Jefferson indicted in bribery probe Bush opens Europe trip on jarring note denies link to NYC terror plot Most Viewed: Top Stories Insurgent video shows IDs of missing soldiers JFK airport plot suspects appear in Trinidad court Danish artist to paint Mont Blanc red Taylor boycotts war crimes trial Judge&#39;s ruling may halt all Guantanamo trials Plane Crashes Into California Homes minutes ago The &#39;Internet War&#39;: Blogging From Iraq minutes ago Andrew Speaker&#39;s Parents and In-Laws AM ET When Good Baseball Managers Go Bad minutes ago U.S. soldiers patrol a village south of Baghdad, May 29, 2007. An al Qaeda-led group... Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) Al-Qaida & Osama bin Laden &raquo; More News Feeds Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Initial tests negative for lawyer with TB Poll: Bush Base Erodes on Immigration Debate The Christian Science Monitor Climate debate heats up G-8 People of the Web A violent video puts a blogger behind bars. Kevin Sites in the Hot Zone An Afghan child bride gets help from Hot Zone readers. Copyright &copy; 2007 Reuters Limited. All rights reserved. Republication or redistribution of Reuters content is expressly prohibited without the prior written consent of Reuters. Reuters shall not be liable for any errors or delays in the content, or for any actions taken in
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_sp_fo_ne/fbn_bears_tank_johnson_suspended NFL suspends Tank Johnson for 8 games - Yahoo! News NFL suspends Tank Johnson for 8 games By DAVE GOLDBERG, AP Football Writer NEW YORK - Tank Johnson of the was suspended by the NFL for the first eight games of the 2007 regular season for violating the league's new personal conduct policy. The defensive tackle recently served a two-month jail stint on a probation violation on gun-related charges. He's the third player suspended by commissioner Roger Goodell in little more than a month for off-field behavior. In April, Goodell suspended defensive back Adam "Pacman" Jones for the entire 2007 season and wide receiver Chris Henry for eight games. Jones is appealing his suspension. Goodell said Johnson's suspension could be reduced to six games if he has no further involvement with law enforcement and undergoes counseling. Johnson stands to lose $255,000, based on his salary for next season of $510,000, if the suspension lasts the entire eight games. After meeting with Goodell upon his release last month, Johnson said he was ready to accept whatever punishment Goodell handed down and that he wants to become the NFL's "Man of the Year," the player honored for being its best citizen. There was no statement from the league other than the short announcement of the suspension. It said Goodell would review Johnson's status before Oct. 1 to determine whether to reduce his suspension by two games. Last December, police raided the 300-pound defensive tackle's suburban Chicago home and found six unregistered firearms &#151; a violation of his probation on an earlier gun charge. That charge stemmed from Johnson's 2005 arrest after a Chicago nightclub valet reported seeing Johnson with a handgun in his SUV. He subsequently pleaded guilty to a misdemeanor charge. Two days after the raid, Willie B. Posey, Johnson's bodyguard who had been arrested after the raid, was shot and killed in an early-morning fight while he and Johnson were at a Chicago nightclub. Johnson was suspended by the Bears for one game for being at the club. He played with the team in the Super Bowl. In March, Johnson began his jail term for violating his probation. Last month, he pleaded guilty to a misdemeanor weapons charge as part of a deal with prosecutors that kept him from serving more time in jail. He was ordered to serve 45 days, which he was able to serve concurrently with the sentence for violating his probation. Johnson met with Goodell for 90 minutes in New York on May 18. "I feel like whatever sanction he imposes, I'm man enough to take it and I know that once I get back on the field, that chapter of my life is closed and I can move on with a sense of closure," Johnson said after the meeting. He called the commissioner "a fair man" and added: "One day I want to be the face of the league for guys who have come through adversity, came through it and ultimately became the Man of the Year in the NFL. That would be a tremendous ending to the story." Truex takes first career win at Dover Source: Donovan wants out of Magic deal Nadal advances to French Open quarters Former NASCAR chairman Bill France dies Broncos sign mammoth tackle Sam Adams Most Viewed - Sports Donovan wants out of deal with Magic Source: Donovan wants out of Magic deal Former NASCAR chairman Bill France dies Truex takes first career win at Dover Donovan having second thoughts over Orlando job: report Vonage - Official Site A better phone service for less. Just $24.99 per month + 1 month free. Chicago Bears Tickets - Huge Selection Browse through the Internets complete collection of tickets available. Reebok Run Easy, Learn What It's About Map your favorite runs, meet runners. Share playlist, photos and more. Chicago Bears defensive lineman Tank Johnson speaks at a news conference at the Bears football... Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Minor League Coach Has Major Meltdown News and notes on the PGA Tour&#39;s top 20 golfers Sports news stories and photos &raquo; All Most Popular SOCCER ON Y! SPORTS Get the latest news, photos and schedules. &raquo; More from Y! Sports MLB ON Y! SPORTS Get the latest on winter meetings, trades and news. &raquo; More from Y! Sports Get the latest news, analysis and more. &raquo; More from Y! Sports Copyright &copy; 2007 The Associated Press. All rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of The Associated Press.
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_re_eu/bush Bush opens Europe trip on jarring note - Yahoo! News Bush opens Europe trip on jarring note By TERENCE HUNT, AP White House Correspondent PRAGUE, Czech Republic - 's European trip was jarred as it began Monday by deteriorating relations with Russia and threatening words from President Bush and Putin will see each other at the annual summit of industrialized nations, beginning Wednesday at the Baltic Sea resort city of Heiligendamm, Germany. In a diplomatic poke in the eye at Putin, Bush bracketed the summit with stops in the Czech Republic and Poland &#151; the two countries where the United States wants to build a missile defense system for Europe. Already complaining of being encircled by 's expansion, Putin said putting missile defenses on Russia's doorstep would ignite a new arms race. He threatened to retarget Russia's missiles toward Europe. Bush says the anti-missile program is intended to protect Europe from states like , but Putin said neither country possesses the rockets the American system is intended to shoot down. "It's a defense against something which does not exist," the Russian president said. "It would be funny if it was not so sad." Flying to Europe with Bush, National Security Adviser Steve Hadley reacted cautiously to Putin. "There has been some escalation in the rhetoric," he said. "We think that is not helpful. We would like to have a constructive dialogue with Russia on this issue. We have in the past." urged Putin to cool down. "This isn't the Soviet Union and we need to drop the rhetoric that sounds like what the United States and the Soviet Union used to say about each other and realize it is the United States and Russia in a very different period," Rice said on the way to an Organization of American States meeting in Panama City, Panama. "It doesn't really help anybody to start threatening the Europeans," she said. "You cannot launch a threat at Europe that is separable from the United States." Bush and his wife, Laura, arrived late Monday evening. In his only address of an eight-day trip through six countries, Bush will make a speech on Tuesday about supporting global democratic aspirations. Hadley said Russia, accused of backpedaling on democracy, would come up in that speech because "there are no exceptions to the freedom agenda." "So obviously when we look for the progress of freedom and democracy we look for the progress of freedom and democracy in Russia and China," Hadley said. Putin's sharp words at Washington &#151; and Britain, as well &#151; set an unusually chilly tone for the three-day summit in Heiligendamm. Leaders of the eight participating countries &#151; the United States, Britain, Russia, France, Germany, Italy, Canada and Japan &#151; typically mask their differences in statements that have been watered down to find consensus. "The most interesting issue on the agenda, to me, is Russia and how the other seven will handle Mr. Putin, who is really the elephant in the room," said Simon Serfaty, a senior adviser to the Europe program at the Center for Strategic and International Studies. Aside from his sharp words at Washington, Putin also took a slap at Britain for seeking the extradition of a Russian businessman who is a suspect in the killing of former KGB agent Alexander Litvinenko. Putin called London's move "stupidity." German Chancellor Angela Merkel also had a run-in with Putin last month, criticizing Russia's crackdown on political opponents. In interviews before the trip, Bush called Putin "my friend" but said the U.S.-Russian relationship was complicated. "Vladimir Putin will tell me that Russia is a democracy and that he's advancing democracy," Bush said. "We have got some questions about that, of course." There is a growing list of irritants in the U.S.-Russian relationship. Russia is unhappy about a U.S.-backed bid for independence for . The United States wants Putin to do more to press Iran to abandon its suspected nuclear weapons program. Seeking a better footing in the relationship, Putin has accepted Bush's invitation for a July 1-2 meeting at his family's compound in Kennebunkport, Maine. Bush was expected to face pressure in Heiligendamm over what is widely perceived as U.S. footdragging in combatting global warming. But the president tried to pre-empt critics with his proposal last week challenging major polluting countries to agree on a target for reducing greenhouse gases. Still, Bush's proposal to let each country decide how much to do leaves a gap between Washington on one side and Merkel and the on the other. Merkel had hoped that concrete goals to reduce emissions would be a centerpiece of her leadership of the G-8. Hadley gave Merkel a diplomatic nudge to support Bush's stand. "It's not about upstaging Angela Merkel. Quite the contrary," Hadley said. "It is not an alternative to anybody's plan, but it is an effort to identify a way forward and, quite frankly, it's an opportunity for Angela Merkel to preside over a very successful G-8." Along with his stops in Prague, Poland and Heiligendamm, Bush will visit Italy, Albania and Bulgaria. Full Coverage: Bush Administration Bush opens Europe trip on jarring note AP, 42 minutes ago Bush begins European trip, facing tense G8 summit Reuters, 1 hour, 30 minutes ago White House follows new path to secrecy AP via Yahoo! News, Jun 01 Q&A: President Bush's climate goals at BBC, May 31 Bush shelters from Putin's rhetoric at Financial Times, Jun 04 Bush Goes to Europe in Wake of Putin' Threat at The New York Times (reg. req'd), Jun 04 at The New York Times (reg. req'd), Jun 04 Hang in there, America: Competent leadership is just 600-plus days away at McClatchy Newspapers, May 17 Group claims captured troops were killed denies link to NYC terror plot Tiananmen Square survivors seek reform Putin attacks West ahead of G-8 summit Most Viewed - World Group claims captured troops were killed Would-be suicide bomber dies in Somalia denies link to NYC terror plot Pakistan&#39;s Musharraf tightens media regulations Bush heads to G8 Summit AP - 42 minutes ago Chinese energy plan reject caps on greenhouse gases CBC.ca - 1 hour, 40 minutes ago Video claims missing U.S. soldiers are dead AP minutes ago Judge in Guantanamo drops charges against Khadr CBC.ca minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. Refinance with Bad Credit Compare up to 4 free quotes. Serious refinance requests only. Connecticut Governor Jodi Rell listen as U.S. speaks during a meeting... Riots at German rally before G8 German police battle hundreds of protesters at an anti-globalisation march ahead of next week&#39;s G8 summit. &raquo; More BBC video Bush heads to G8 Summit President Bush heads to the G8 Summit in Germany this week, aiming to convince U.S. allies he&#39;s serious about tackling global warming. (June 4) &raquo; More AP video &raquo; Show all news video G-8 protesters, police clash in Germany Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) White House News - AP &raquo; More News Feeds Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Missing word sees Gitmo charges dismissed European Protests as Bush Heads for G-8 Summit Diverse views on news from the right, left, and center Copyright &copy; 2007 The Associated Press. All rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of The Associated Press.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/topstories/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/nm/20070604/ts_nm/lebanon_fighting_suburb_dc Bomb explodes in east Beirut, seven wounded - Yahoo! News Bomb explodes in east Beirut, seven wounded PM ET BEIRUT (Reuters) - A bomb exploded next to an empty bus in a Christian suburb in east Beirut on Monday, lightly wounding seven people, a military source said. The bomb blast occurred near a commercial centre and church, the source said. It was the fourth bomb in less than a month in and around the Lebanese capital. The other three bombs have killed one person and wounded dozens. Group claims captured troops were killed Rep. Jefferson indicted in bribery probe Bush opens Europe trip on jarring note denies link to NYC terror plot Most Viewed: Top Stories Insurgent video shows IDs of missing soldiers JFK airport plot suspects appear in Trinidad court Danish artist to paint Mont Blanc red Iraq Qaeda group says killed captured U.S. troops Taylor boycotts war crimes trial Plane Crashes Into California Homes minutes ago The &#39;Internet War&#39;: Blogging From Iraq minutes ago Andrew Speaker&#39;s Parents and In-Laws AM ET When Good Baseball Managers Go Bad minutes ago A bus owner reacts after an explosion next to his bus in Bouchrieh, east Beirut... Elsewhere on the Web Initial tests negative for lawyer with TB Poll: Bush Base Erodes on Immigration Debate Personal histories shape immigration views People of the Web A violent video puts a blogger behind bars. Kevin Sites in the Hot Zone An Afghan child bride gets help from Hot Zone readers. Copyright &copy; 2007 Reuters Limited. All rights reserved. Republication or redistribution of Reuters content is expressly prohibited without the prior written consent of Reuters. Reuters shall not be liable for any errors or delays in the content, or for any actions taken in
http://news.yahoo.com/s/afp/20070604/wl_afp/warcrimesliberia Liberia&#39;s Taylor boycotts his landmark war crimes trial - Yahoo! News Liberia&#39;s Taylor boycotts his landmark war crimes trial by Stephanie van den Berg THE HAGUE (AFP) - The landmark war crimes trial of Charles Taylor got off to a dramatic start Monday when the former Liberian president boycotted the opening session, saying he would never receive a fair hearing and dismissing his lawyer. Judge Julia Sebutinde, presiding over the trial before the UN-backed Special Court for Sierra Leone (SCSL) -- specially moved to -- ordered the trial to go ahead in his absence. The first African head of state to stand trial for war crimes before an international tribunal, Taylor is accused of controlling rebels in neighbouring Sierra Leone that went on a blood diamond-financed rampage of rape and mutilation. In the opening statement prosecutor Mohamed Bangula said Taylor, 59, waged a "campaign of terror" against the civilian population "fueled by diamonds". "One of the haunting images of the war in Sierra Leone is that of children carrying guns bigger than they are," prosecutor Bangula said, stressing that rebel groups under the defendant&#39;s control routinely used boys and girls under 15 years of age as fighters. In a letter read out in the court room by his defence lawyer Karim Khan, Taylor, who has been in custody in The Hague for the past year, explained why he was boycotting the proceedings. "I am driven to conclude that I will not receive a fair trial before the Special Court at this time and I must decline to attend hearings," he said, arguing that he had only one counsel compared to nine for the prosecution. The ex-president added that he had dismissed his lawyers and wanted to represent himself. To allow the prosecution to go ahead with Monday&#39;s opening statement, the bench appointed a special stand-by defence counsel, Charles Jalloh. Khan told reporters that Taylor felt he was on "a railroad towards conviction". In the run-up to Taylor&#39;s trial, Khan protested the change of venue and repeatedly complained that he did not have enough time or resources to properly prepare. On Monday the Sierra Leone chief prosecutor Stephen Rapp insisted that the trial should move forward, with or without the defendant. "It is not a situation where he can avoid justice by the simple election of staying in his cell ... at the end of the day he is only hurting himself," Rapp told reporters. UN chief Ban Ki-moon hailed the opening of the trial as a major step in the "fight against impunity". The Taylor trial was moved to The Hague after the authorities decided there could be unrest if the case was tried in Freetown, the seat of the special court. However, the court set up a live broadcast of proceedings in the Sierra Leone capital, where Salifu Jalloh, whose hands were chopped off during the civil war, told AFP he was "filled with joy" that the trial had started but "disillusioned" by Taylor&#39;s absence. "I would have liked to see how he looks on the first day," he said. Also in Monrovia, Taylor&#39;s sister Thelma echoed the position of the former leader that he would not get a fair trial. "I think it is in the minds of the court and the judges that Mr Taylor should be guilty," she said. The fact that "they have decided in London the jail he should be in, tells me they have already judged Mr Taylor without trial," she added. Taylor was captured in March last year and flown to the Netherlands from Sierra Leone three months later. He faces 11 charges of crimes against humanity and war crimes committed during the 1991-2001 civil war in Sierra Leone, considered one of the most brutal in modern history. Up to 200,000 people were killed in the fighting and rebels mutilated thousands more, cutting off arms, legs, ears or noses. The former Liberian president allegedly armed, trained and controlled Sierra Leone&#39;s notorious Revolutionary United Front, responsible for many of the mutilations, in exchange for still-unknown amounts of diamonds used to fund warfare, the so-called blood diamonds. Taylor has denied all the charges. The trial now stands adjourned until June 25 when the first witness will testify. In the meantime, judge Sebutinde insisted that the court&#39;s registry take up Taylor&#39;s complaints about his defence. "If we are to pretend this trial is fair we must have equality of arms," she said, warning that Taylor&#39;s defence problems were "fraught with the potential to delay the trial". The case is expected to conclude sometime towards the end of 2008. If convicted, the statute of the Sierra Leone tribunal states that Taylor must be sentenced to "imprisonment for a specified number of years" without giving a maximum. Group claims captured troops were killed denies link to NYC terror plot Tiananmen Square survivors seek reform Putin attacks West ahead of G-8 summit Most Viewed - World Group claims captured troops were killed Would-be suicide bomber dies in Somalia denies link to NYC terror plot Pakistan&#39;s Musharraf tightens media regulations Bush heads to G8 Summit AP - 42 minutes ago Chinese energy plan reject caps on greenhouse gases CBC.ca - 1 hour, 40 minutes ago Video claims missing U.S. soldiers are dead AP minutes ago Judge in Guantanamo drops charges against Khadr CBC.ca minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Vonage - Official Site Talk all you want for just $24.99 per month & get 1 month free. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. Judges of the War Crimes Court take their seats for the start of former Liberian... Former Liberian President Charles Taylor Charles Taylor On Trial &raquo; More Reuters video &raquo; Show all news video Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Missing word sees Gitmo charges dismissed European Protests as Bush Heads for G-8 Summit Diverse views on news from the right, left, and center . All rights reserved. The information contained in the AFP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of Agence France Presse.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/topstories/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/nm/20070604/ts_nm/worldbank_zoellick_dc Zoellick on whirlwind tour for World bank job - Yahoo! News Zoellick on whirlwind tour for World bank job &#39;s nominee to head the , will travel to Africa, Europe and Latin America to lobby for the job starting on Monday, and said he wants to hear directly from governments about their development priorities. "I want to leave no stone unturned in showing people I am serious in reaching out and hearing their perspectives. It shows courtesy and respect," the former deputy secretary of state told reporters during a call before he left for Ghana, his first stop in Africa. His tour will include discussions in Ghana, Ethiopia and South Africa on the needs of the bank&#39;s poorest clients, in Europe with the institution&#39;s largest funders, and in Mexico and Brazil, representing a clutch of emerging economic powers. Zoellick, also a former U.S. Trade Representative, is likely to be confirmed as the next World Bank president this month. He has been praised for his roles in global trade talks and as Washington&#39;s point man on the humanitarian crisis in Darfur and relations with China. He would succeed Paul Wolfowitz, a senior official in both Bush administrations and an architect of the war, who resigned last month amid an ethics scandal involving a high-paid promotion for his female companion. So far, Zoellick is the only candidate for the job and his bid is unlikely to be contested despite a deadline for other nominations by June 15 and a push by some developing countries to open up the selection process to include non-Americans. The head of the World Bank has historically been an American chosen by the White House under an informal agreement with Europe, which picks the head of the As Zoellick embarks on what he calls a "listening and learning" tour paid for by Washington and his own frequent flyer miles, he said he had already consulted with a broad spectrum of people about the job, including U.S. lawmakers, former bank officials and country representatives on the bank&#39;s 24-nation board, which will ultimately decide if he gets it. He said it was too soon to know what strategy he would carve out for the bank and he had encountered a "potpourri" of interests and needs among donors and borrowers alike. Among topics raised were concern for the world&#39;s poorest countries and reaching the 2010 global target of halving poverty, the role of the World Bank in fast-emerging nations such as China, India and Brazil, and its ability to help countries emerging from conflict, he said. "I want to try as quickly as I can to reach out to both developing countries and developed countries and get their sense of priorities, issues in the broader development agenda, and questions related to the World Bank, and get their input and I hope their support," Zoellick said. Zoellick&#39;s nomination comes as the World Bank is in the throes of raising funds for its lending programs and needs broad support from donor countries, notably in Europe. There was special concern within the bank that European nations might withhold funding for World Bank development projects during Wolfowitz&#39;s controversial tenure. "People understand the bank has gone through a difficult period and ... most people are looking ahead," Zoellick said. He added: "I think with most, if not all, of the countries I am going to, (they) have already expressed their support." Group claims captured troops were killed Rep. Jefferson indicted in bribery probe Bush opens Europe trip on jarring note denies link to NYC terror plot Most Viewed: Top Stories Insurgent video shows IDs of missing soldiers JFK airport plot suspects appear in Trinidad court Danish artist to paint Mont Blanc red Iraq Qaeda group says killed captured U.S. troops Taylor boycotts war crimes trial Plane Crashes Into California Homes minutes ago The &#39;Internet War&#39;: Blogging From Iraq minutes ago Andrew Speaker&#39;s Parents and In-Laws AM ET When Good Baseball Managers Go Bad minutes ago (L) listens after announcing that former U.S. Trade Representative Robert Zoellick... Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Initial tests negative for lawyer with TB Poll: Bush Base Erodes on Immigration Debate The Christian Science Monitor Climate debate heats up G-8 People of the Web A violent video puts a blogger behind bars. Kevin Sites in the Hot Zone An Afghan child bride gets help from Hot Zone readers. Copyright &copy; 2007 Reuters Limited. All rights reserved. Republication or redistribution of Reuters content is expressly prohibited without the prior written consent of Reuters. Reuters shall not be liable for any errors or delays in the content, or for any actions taken in
http://news.yahoo.com/i/716 The top news headlines on current events from Yahoo! News Group claims captured troops were killed CAIRO, Egypt - Al-Qaida linked insurgents killed three American soldiers after capturing them last month in Iraq, according to a militant video released Monday that claimed to show footage of the ambush. The video offered no proof for its claims. Video claims missing U.S. soldiers are dead Rep. Jefferson indicted in bribery probe Bush opens Europe trip on jarring note denies link to NYC terror plot PEOPLE OF THE WEB A violent video puts a blogger behind bars. THE WEEK IN PHOTOS View a selection of the week's best photos. An Iowa resident describes his state's unusual political scene. 60 MINUTES ON YAHOO! NEWS Two years in Iraq The story of one battalion and their families at home. Women prosecuted for smuggling children PHOENIX - An increasing number of illegal immigrants who left their children back home are hiring complete strangers to bring the youngsters into this country by bluffing their way past U.S. border inspectors. Scientists find 24 species in Suriname PARAMARIBO Suriname - A frog with fluorescent purple markings and 12 kinds of dung beetles were among two dozen new species discovered in the remote plateaus of eastern Suriname, scientists said Monday. Mike Tyson wants to do Bollywood movies MUMBAI, India - Mike Tyson wants to try something new &#151; acting in Bollywood movies. Tyson said the energy on the sets of a music video he recently shot for a new comedy got him thinking about trying to do more Bollywood work, The Times of India reported Monday. Stocks eke out gain despite China drop NEW YORK - Wall Street recovered from a mostly down session Monday, eking out a gain as investors brushed off another slide in Chinese stocks. NFL suspends Tank Johnson for 8 games NEW YORK - Tank Johnson of the Chicago Bears was suspended by the NFL for the first eight games of the 2007 regular season for violating the league's new personal conduct policy. Iraq Qaeda group says killed captured U.S. troops DUBAI (Reuters) - An al Qaeda-led group in Iraq signaled in a Web video on Monday that it had killed three U.S. soldiers after capturing them last month, showing only pictures of ID cards of two missing U.S. soldiers. Democratic congressman indicted in bribery probe 1 hour, 16 minutes ago WASHINGTON (Reuters) - U.S. Democratic Rep. William Jefferson was indicted on Monday on 16 criminal counts for conspiring to solicit bribes and pay off a Nigerian official, with $90,000 of an intended bribe found hidden in his home freezer wrapped in aluminum foil. Judge&#39;s ruling may halt all Guantanamo trials GUANTANAMO BAY U.S. NAVAL BASE, Cuba (Reuters) - The U.S. war crimes tribunals at Guantanamo came to a screeching halt on Monday when a military judge dropped all the charges against a young Canadian in a ruling that could preclude trying any of the 380 prisoners. Zoellick on whirlwind tour for World bank job WASHINGTON (Reuters) - Robert Zoellick, U.S. nominee to head the World Bank, will travel to Africa, Europe and Latin America to lobby for the job starting on Monday, and said he wants to hear directly from governments about their development priorities. JFK airport plot suspects appear in Trinidad court PM ET PORT OF SPAIN (Reuters) - Two suspects in a foiled plot to blow up New York&#39;s John F. Kennedy International Airport appeared in court in Trinidad and Tobago on Monday and were accused of conspiring to commit terrorism. Top general says too early to judge Iraq plan PM ET CAMP ANACONDA, Iraq (Reuters) - The U.S. commander in Iraq, General David Petraeus, said on Monday it was too early to judge whether a Baghdad security crackdown was successful because the last of five extra brigades had yet to be deployed. Bush begins European trip, facing tense G8 summit 1 hour, 31 minutes ago PRAGUE (Reuters) - began an eight-day trip to Europe on Monday with his popularity at home at a low point over the Iraq war and tensions abroad over global warming and missile defense. Bomb explodes in east Beirut, seven wounded PM ET BEIRUT (Reuters) - A bomb exploded next to an empty bus in a Christian suburb in east Beirut on Monday, lightly wounding seven people, a military source said. Bush faces heat over climate change and Russia at G8 PM ET WASHINGTON (AFP) - US left for Europe and the G8 summit on Monday, facing a growing rift with his Russian counterpart and searching questions over his new initiative on climate change. Liberia&#39;s Taylor boycotts his landmark war crimes trial THE HAGUE (AFP) - The landmark war crimes trial of Charles Taylor got off to a dramatic start Monday when the former Liberian president boycotted the opening session, saying he would never receive a fair hearing and dismissing his lawyer. Deadly clashes spread in Lebanon camps as bomb hits capital 1 hour, 42 minutes ago SIDON, Lebanon (AFP) - Deadly firefights in a Palestinian camp in south Lebanon and a bus bombing in the capital opened new fronts for the army on Monday as it battles to crush an Al-Qaeda-inspired militia in a 16-day standoff in the north of the country. Three missing US troops all killed: Iraq insurgents DUBAI (AFP) - An Al-Qaeda front group said in a video released on Monday that it had killed all three US soldiers whom it captured last month in Iraq triggering a massive search operation by American and Iraqi forces. Setback for US government in surprise Guantanamo ruling 1 hour, 14 minutes ago GUANTANAMO BAY US NAVAL BASE, Cuba (AFP) - The legal front of the US government&#39;s "war on terror" suffered a stunning reversal Monday when a military judge threw out murder charges against a Canadian-born foot-soldier for Al-Qaeda. Murdoch to make Dow Jones pitch to Bancrofts PM ET NEW YORK (AFP) - Rupert Murdoch, the chairman and chief executive of News Corp., will meet members of the Bancroft family Monday in an attempt to persuade them to back the sale of Dow Jones Co., news reports said. Apple iPhone launch set for June 29 1 hour, 26 minutes ago SAN FRANCISCO (AFP) - Apple&#39;s new iPhone, a "smart" mobile phone offering music storage and Internet access, will be launched on June 29, according to television ads by the high-tech group. Most Popular Top Stories Danish artist to paint Mont Blanc red AM ET COPENHAGEN (AFP) - A Danish artist known for his provocative and spectacular projects said Monday he plans to climb France&#39;s Mont Blanc to paint its summit red and establish an independent state. China says climate policy must make room for growth AM ET BEIJING (Reuters) - China went on the global warming offensive on Monday, unveiling a climate change action plan while stressing it will not sacrifice economic ambitions to international demands to cut greenhouse gas pollution. Man shot dead for bad singing in Philippine karaoke bar Thu May 31, 4:21 AM ET MANILA (AFP) - A jobless man was shot dead by a security guard for singing out of tune in a Philippine karaoke bar, police said Thursday. JFK airport plot suspects appear in Trinidad court PM ET PORT OF SPAIN (Reuters) - Two suspects in a foiled plot to blow up New York&#39;s John F. Kennedy International Airport appeared in court in Trinidad and Tobago on Monday and were accused of conspiring to commit terrorism. South Africa&#39;s traditional healers help fight HIV AM ET MTUBATUBA, South Africa (Reuters) - Tryphina Ngwenya slides a pink condom over the magic wooden stick normally used to conjure up ancestral spirits, unleashing a ripple of laughter among her audience of traditional South African healers. U.S. News & World Report &raquo; Go to this contest on Bix File photo shows security men guarding the China Eastern Airlines&#39; building in Shanghai. China Eastern... Osama bin Laden and al-Qaida &raquo; More Top Stories Photos Get the Untold Story Kevin Sites in the Hot Zone: Covering all of the world's conflicts. &raquo; Kevin Sites in the Hot Zone Freshen up your PC and make it look and run just like new. The latest Iraq news, analysis, photos, video and more. &raquo; More Iraq Coverage Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (Learn about My Yahoo! and RSS) &raquo; More News Feeds
http://news.yahoo.com/s/nm/20070604/pl_nm/bush_dc Bush begins European trip, facing tense G8 summit - Yahoo! News Bush begins European trip, facing tense G8 summit 1 hour, 31 minutes ago began an eight-day trip to Europe on Monday with his popularity at home at a low point over the war and tensions abroad over global warming and missile defense. The centerpiece will be the Group of Eight summit in Germany, where Bush will hold a closely watched meeting with Russian President amid deteriorating U.S.-Russian ties. Tensions will also run high on climate change. German Chancellor Angela Merkel had hoped to forge an agreement on the issue at the summit, a goal put in doubt when Bush proposed a new strategy on global warming last week. "If you couple Bush&#39;s weak position at home with this unpopularity in much of Western Europe, Bush is probably not relishing this trip," said Charles Kupchan, director of Europe Studies at the Council on Foreign Relations. "Particularly on the question of climate change, he will find himself isolated." Bush made the Czech Republic his first stop. In picturesque Prague on Tuesday, he will address an international conference of human rights and democracy activists. Ahead of the G8 summit, Europeans gave a cool reception to Bush&#39;s plan to bring together the world&#39;s biggest polluting countries by year-end to explore ways of limiting emissions and agree on a long-term goal by the end of 2008. Some portrayed it as a defeat for Merkel, who wants the G8 to agree now on cutting emissions of greenhouse gases about 50 percent by 2050. , Bush&#39;s national security adviser, told reporters on the president&#39;s plane: "This is not about upstaging Angela Merkel. Quite the contrary ... it is an effort to identify a way forward." Kupchan said the general view in Europe was, "Let&#39;s be patient, November 2008 is coming," referring to the next U.S. presidential election, which will herald the end of Bush&#39;s term. The weeklong tour, with stops in the Czech Republic, Poland, Italy, Albania and Bulgaria, includes several firsts. Bush will meet new French President Nicolas Sarkozy in Germany and Putin has warned that Russia will go back to its Cold War stance of aiming missiles at Europe if Washington pursues its plan for a missile defense shield near Russia&#39;s borders. Hadley said Putin&#39;s comments were "not helpful" and the United States wanted a constructive dialogue. Putin sees the missile shield as a threat to Russia. Washington insists it is intended to protect against potential threats from states like In a preemptive move that could take some of the tension out of the session, Bush has invited Putin to his family&#39;s retreat in Maine next month for two days of talks. Hadley said that at the democracy conference on Tuesday, Bush would speak about the "challenge of promoting democracy" in countries such as Russia and China. U.S. officials have accused Putin of backsliding on reforms and have also pressed China for increased democratic freedoms. His visit to Albania comes amid U.S.-Russian disagreement over statehood for , which is majority ethnic Albanian. Washington backs a U.N. proposal for Kosovo independence under international supervision. Russia opposes it. Full Coverage: Bush Administration Bush opens Europe trip on jarring note AP, 39 minutes ago Bush begins European trip, facing tense G8 summit Reuters, 1 hour, 27 minutes ago White House follows new path to secrecy AP via Yahoo! News, Jun 01 Q&A: President Bush's climate goals at BBC, May 31 Bush shelters from Putin's rhetoric at Financial Times, Jun 04 Bush Goes to Europe in Wake of Putin' Threat at The New York Times (reg. req'd), Jun 04 at The New York Times (reg. req'd), Jun 04 Hang in there, America: Competent leadership is just 600-plus days away at McClatchy Newspapers, May 17 Rep. Jefferson indicted in bribery probe Bush opens Europe trip on jarring note Analysis: The 2008 authenticity race Romney clash over immigration Most Viewed - Politics Feds say La. congressman to be indicted Democratic congressman indicted in bribery probe Bush opens Europe trip on jarring note Robberies surge on violent crime survey McCain, Romney clash over immigration minutes ago Bush heads to G8 Summit AP - 42 minutes ago The &#39;Internet War&#39;: Blogging From Iraq minutes ago Cold War Rhetoric: Building Missile Defenses minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Vonage - Official Site Talk all you want for just $24.99 per month & get 1 month free. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. President Bush boards Air Force One at Andrews Air Force Base, Maryland, June 4, 2007.... President Plays Nice Before G-8 Initiatives by Bush in Sudan, the environment, AIDS relief anticipate the G-8. &raquo; More ABC News video &raquo; Show all news video Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) &raquo; More News Feeds Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Family ties at issue as Senate returns to immigration The Note: Meet The New John Edwards Poll: Opinions go against immigration measure SEND US YOUR PHOTOS! Following the presidential campaign? Submit pictures of candidates, supporters, and events to You Witness News. Featured IN YAHOO! NEWS Election coverage and analysis from Congressional Quarterly. &raquo; More from Congressional Quarterly People of the Web A gay blogger makes waves, and enemies, on Capitol Hill. All news on Chief Justice Roberts, Samuel Alito's nomination, and more. &raquo; All Court Coverage Yahoo! News Search Now Contains Blogs Find the latest posts about what's in the news. Copyright &copy; 2007 Reuters Limited. All rights reserved. Republication or redistribution of Reuters content is expressly prohibited without the prior written consent of Reuters. Reuters shall not be liable for any errors or delays in the content, or for any actions taken in
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/topstories/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_re_us/smuggling_children Women prosecuted for smuggling children - Yahoo! News Women prosecuted for smuggling children By AMANDA LEE MYERS, Associated Press Writer PHOENIX - An increasing number of illegal immigrants who left their children back home are hiring complete strangers to bring the youngsters into this country by bluffing their way past U.S. border inspectors. Typically, the stranger poses as the child's mother or another relative as she drives through a checkpoint. Sometimes the children are given cough syrup to sedate them and ensure they don't say or do anything to make border guards suspicious. U.S. officials say they are seeing more such cases because stepped-up enforcement along the border has made it more dangerous to sneak into the country by trekking across the desert. "People who may be afraid or think it's too dangerous to bring a child through the desert when it's 120 degrees think it's better to place a child in the hands of a total stranger," said Roger Maier, a U.S. Customs and Border Protection spokesman in Texas. U.S. officials warned that entrusting children to a stranger is foolish, too. "There's no guarantee that you're going to be reunited with your child. There's no guarantee that your child is being cared for," said Brian Levin, a U.S. Customs and Border Protection spokesman in Arizona. Nevertheless, officials at the border could not cite a specific case of a child being hurt or stolen in the smuggling scheme. Dozens of U.S. citizens, permanent residents and other women with a legal right to be in this country have been prosecuted in the past few years for trying to smuggle children into the U.S. Border officials said they do not have exact numbers but believe such cases are on the rise. The women are typically poor, and are hired by smugglers for $100 to $500 for the transaction. They are often mothers themselves, and use their own children's birth certificates when they drive through a checkpoint. "They're a vulnerable class of people who get sucked into this," said Joel Parris, an assistant federal public defender in Tucson who has defended several women smugglers. "These women are so focused on surviving and taking care of their own kids, when someone comes with a pity trip, their sympathy is so strong they can't resist." Ana Meza-Montano, a 36-year-old single mother from Agua Prieta, Mexico, across the border from Douglas, Ariz., had a border crossing card that allowed her to enter the United States for short periods to shop and run other errands. Meza-Montano was caught at the Douglas port of entry trying to smuggle a 1-year-old girl who she said was her daughter. Parris, who defended her, said Meza-Montano agreed to the transaction because a smuggler offered to pay off her son's $100 bicycle, which was on layaway at a Wal-Mart. The woman is serving a 15-month prison sentence. Sandra Ramirez, a 24-year-old single mother of four, was caught trying to sneak an 11-year-old boy through the Nogales, Ariz., port of entry, and said a co-worker offered her $1,000 to do it. Now Ramirez is serving a 15-month prison sentence and will be deported to Mexico after she gets out. "This is just one of the most overwhelmingly saddest cases," said Ramirez's lawyer, Stephanie Meade. "She had no idea of the kind of consequences and trouble that she would get in." Officials say the smuggling tactic has become more common partly because more illegal immigrants are deciding to bring their families into the country. In the past, it was more common for men to leave their families behind and return periodically for visits. Also, because of tighter enforcement by the Border Patrol and the National Guard, illegal immigrants who want to sneak across the desert are being forced to make the attempt along more remote, more rugged &#151; and more dangerous &#151; stretches of the border. The U.S. Attorney's Office in Arizona has made prosecuting these child-smuggling cases one of its top priorities. "Children are being put in situations where the risk of something happening to them is high, and we felt that people need to be held accountable for this," spokesman Wyn Hornbuckle said. He added: "There are many examples of how violent these smuggling organizations are and how ruthless they've become, and they'd be the last people I'd entrust my kids to." U.S. Customs and Border Protection: Informant helped bust alleged JFK plot Parents of TB patient are 'in hell' Dallas could elect its first gay mayor Court backs Mo. death penalty procedure Anti-war Marine blasts military Most Viewed - U.S. Vt. secession movement gains traction Informant helped bust alleged JFK plot Parents of TB patient are 'in hell' Paris Hilton begins jail term a day early Public denied access to Calif. beaches Raw video: golf cart driver busted for DUI AP - 56 minutes ago Plane Crashes Into California Homes minutes ago Metal Man Puts Mind Over Matter minutes ago Jury indicts Jefferson in bribery probe AP minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Vonage - Official Site Talk all you want for just $24.99 per month & get 1 month free. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. Attorney Stephanie Meade, shown in her office in Tucson, Ariz., Wednesday, May 30, 2007, represents... Elsewhere on the Web Lawyer with TB apparently not contagious Murder, Robbery Rates Up in Big Cities Personal histories shape immigration views PEOPLE OF THE WEB A convicted felon turns cameras on the cops. Yahoo! News "60 Minutes" He's a human calculator who sees numbers as shapes and colors. Copyright &copy; 2007 The Associated Press. All rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of The Associated Press.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/topstories/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/nm/20070604/pl_nm/usa_crime_congressman_dc Democratic congressman indicted in bribery probe - Yahoo! News Democratic congressman indicted in bribery probe 1 hour, 16 minutes ago WASHINGTON (Reuters) - U.S. Democratic Rep. William Jefferson ( ) was indicted on Monday on 16 criminal counts for conspiring to solicit bribes and pay off a Nigerian official, with &#36;90,000 of an intended bribe found hidden in his home freezer wrapped in aluminum foil. The 94-page indictment also charges the Louisiana lawmaker with racketeering, soliciting bribes for himself and his family, fraud, money laundering, obstruction of justice, conspiracy and violating the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act. Jefferson, 63, a member of Congress since 1991 whose district includes New Orleans, faces a maximum of 235 years in prison if convicted. He has denied any wrongdoing. The investigation has centered on whether Jefferson used his position to promote the sale of telecommunications equipment and services offered by a Louisville-based firm to Nigeria, Ghana, and possibly other African nations in return for stock and cash payments. Jefferson won re-election to a ninth term in Congress in November, when voters shrugged off the federal bribery investigation. The indictment provided some new details about the lengthy probe, including commentary from a witness cooperating with the on July 30, 2005, who gave Jefferson &#36;100,000 in cash that was intended as a bribe to the unnamed Nigerian official. It said Jefferson put in his home freezer &#36;90,000 of the cash, which was separated in &#36;10,000 amounts, wrapped in aluminum foil and concealed inside various frozen food containers. Jefferson instructed the bribes to be funneled through companies controlled by staffers and relatives. "I&#39;m in the shadows behind the curtain somewhere," the indictment quoted him as saying. In November, Democrats won control of the U.S. Congress from Bush&#39;s Republicans, promising to end a "culture of corruption." Most of the scandals that have rocked Capitol Hill in recent years involved Republicans, many of them briberies tied to now-convicted lobbyist Jack Abramoff. Former Republican Rep. Bob Ney of Ohio pleaded guilty last year in the Abramoff scandal. In a separate case, former California Rep. Randy Cunningham pleaded guilty to bribery charges. Two former associates of Jefferson have pleaded guilty to bribery charges and have been cooperating in the investigation, which also included an unprecedented search by FBI agents of his congressional office last year. The indictment says the bribery conspiracy began in 2001. It said the purpose of the conspiracy was "to provide for the unjust enrichment of defendant Jefferson and his family members by corruptly seeking, soliciting and directing that things of value be paid to him and his family members in return for ... Jefferson&#39;s performance of official acts." Meredith McGehee, policy director for the Campaign Legal Center, an ethics watchdog group, said Jefferson&#39;s indictment should serve as a clarion call for Congress to follow through on its promise to "drain the swamp." (additional reporting by Thomas Ferraro and Andy Sullivan) Rep. Jefferson indicted in bribery probe Bush opens Europe trip on jarring note Analysis: The 2008 authenticity race Romney clash over immigration Most Viewed - Politics Feds say La. congressman to be indicted Bush opens Europe trip on jarring note Robberies surge on violent crime survey McCain, Romney clash over immigration U.S. cuts back climate checks from space minutes ago Bush heads to G8 Summit AP - 43 minutes ago The &#39;Internet War&#39;: Blogging From Iraq minutes ago Cold War Rhetoric: Building Missile Defenses minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Vonage - Official Site Talk all you want for just $24.99 per month & get 1 month free. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. Congressman William Jefferson (D-LA) speaks to reporters after arriving at Reagan National Airport in Washington,... Rep. William Jefferson Indicted Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Family ties at issue as Senate returns to immigration The Note: Meet The New John Edwards Poll: Opinions go against immigration measure SEND US YOUR PHOTOS! Following the presidential campaign? Submit pictures of candidates, supporters, and events to You Witness News. Featured IN YAHOO! NEWS Election coverage and analysis from Congressional Quarterly. &raquo; More from Congressional Quarterly People of the Web A gay blogger makes waves, and enemies, on Capitol Hill. All news on Chief Justice Roberts, Samuel Alito's nomination, and more. &raquo; All Court Coverage Yahoo! News Search Now Contains Blogs Find the latest posts about what's in the news. Copyright &copy; 2007 Reuters Limited. All rights reserved. Republication or redistribution of Reuters content is expressly prohibited without the prior written consent of Reuters. Reuters shall not be liable for any errors or delays in the content, or for any actions taken in
